[("I'm a fan of soft serve ice cream and Guptill's Coney Express has delicious ice cream with many flavors.  I've tried Kurver Kreme in Colonie, Tastee Freeze in Delmar and Country Drive Inn in Clifton Park, but I think that this place has the best soft serve ice cream.  The portions are generous and the taste is very rich.  For example, the brownie sundae is decadently delicious but likely too much for one person.  They also have cupcake sundaes which I am looking to try soon!", 'pos'), ('The nurses here were very  attentive and wonderful. I was able to have the same surgical nurse that I had for another procedure a few years ago. The anesthesiologist listened to my concerns and acting skillfully and compassionately. I felt well taken care of there.', 'pos'), ("Pretty great!  Okay, so this place is obviously not Vegan since they have a bunch of cheese and egg offerings, BUT I see that they do offer plenty of vegan alternatives.\n\nI was sort of skeptical being here because the prices were pretty hefty, I felt.  I guess it looked like a fast-food/diner joint, but it charged a little more. \n\nAnyway, their homemade hot sauce is AMAZING.  I got the eggs benedict for dinner and J got an omelet.  Both were really good.  I do love their homefries.. but the next time I come here, I want onion rings or fries.  Those onion rings looked amazing.\n\nLastly, the food came relatively quickly.\n\nNot a fan of the service.  They tried to seat us at this edge facing the stoves, without asking, so I asked for a booth.  Then at the booth, the server didn't refill waters very well but didn't feel bad emphasizing over and over whether or not we wanted their $5-7 desserts.  Honestly, a slice of pie for $6.50?  Veggie Galaxy, you are t r i p p i n !\n\nBut great food! (especially breaky!)", 'pos'), ('The Tale of the 4-Starred, Up Close and Personal Bar.\n\nThe Back Abbey is a bar that is located in the charming West Village part of Claremont. The area resembles the old shopping strip-meets-new shopping strip of San Luis Obispo.  What they did -- or so I\'ve been told -- is that they\'ve managed to preserve the old strip, leaving it looking the way it presumably did in the 70s.  Rhino Records is located in the older part.  The Back Abbey in the new part.  Both distinct areas of their aesthetic and consumer pull. \n\nThe Back Abbey specializes in Belgian draft beer.  They carry some German and English beer, as well.\n\nWow, the selection of beer. Let me tell you! A lof of them I have never heard of. I tasted the Augustijn (Belgian) and the Hofbrau Original (German).  Both were good, but I prefer the Hofbrau.They come in different sized glasses, with the Hofbrau coming in a long glass. The Augustijn was $9, and the Hofbrau $6. The Hofbrau came in the larger glass, so the Augustijn must be considered some premium brew for it to be in a smaller glass and come knocking down doors at a mighty $9.  \n\nI liked the overall aesthetics of the place. There is an up-close-and-personal feel to the bar. Along with the standard bar and barstools set-up, there\'s a long table that goes from one end of the bar to the other. People sit across from each other and, since the tables are not wide, you\'re not far at all from the person sitting in front of you. Like I wrote earlier, up close and personal is what this bar has going for it.\n\nThey have a food menu, as well. Above their draft selection of beer, they have a chalkboard placed high up with a list of what they serve. For those veggies among us, they even make a veggie burger.\n\nLastly, the patrons all seem to know each other. Maybe it\'s the small town mentality. But it\'s not exactly a backwards, hick town. It\'s very much modern in certain ways, and people just love to talk. Couple that with brew, and there\'s a lot of talk going on.\n\nI had a discussion with someone at the bar, who bartends at a bar not too far from The Back Abbey, and he told me that the Augustijn is the oldest beer recipe known to man. (Ah, ok. Old is vintage. Vintage is expensive. Thus, Augustijn is expensive.  And two + two = four. I got this down, partna\'.)   Again, can we give it up for "up close and personal"?\n\nAnd, lastly, the bartenders were very attentive and enjoyed talking about the difference between the brews. The goateed gentlemen was specifically patient in describing which ones were Belgian, German, and English.\n\nThe mantra of this review should be "up close and personal."  This is what this 4-star bar is all about.', 'pos'), ("On a recent visit to SLO, I got taken out to the Natural Cafe, which bears a distinct resemblance to some of the places I remember from growing up in Berkeley. Very natural woodsy, with just enough sprouts on the sandwich to add a little crunch.  It's casual, with counter service only.\n\nMy turkey burger was not too dry, but the guacamole and special sauce helped it along in the moistness department. I didn't walk away from the meal feeling all gross and over full like you would with a normal burger and fries.  Yeah for whole grains and veggies!", 'pos'), ("Great place! \n\nI have to say the menu and the outdoor seating keep us coming back.  The food is good -- had breakfast both times but some friends had lunch items. Definitely a great selection.  We've been at off-peak times so no waiting and better service. \n\nAll in all, it's no DZ Akins but it's definitely worth trying!", 'pos'), ("Went to Rebecca's Cafe today during my lunch break today.  I have to say, my sandwich was delicious!  I had a Chicken Caprese panini (grilled chicken, tomato, mozzarella cheese, spinach, and balsamic vinaigrette).  The staff was friendly and the service was quick, however the price is a little high for my taste ($7 or so for the sandwich only).  Overall, I would definitely go back to try some different items (or even get the same sandwich), but it won't be too often.", 'pos'), ("The only thing I've ever eaten at Time-Out is their ice cream cookie sandwich thing, and that's really all I need.  It's about a half-gallon of ice cream sandwiched between two large-ish chocolate chip cookies.  I don't know if they make it, or if it comes off a truck, or what... but it's frozen so solid you usually have to wait a few minutes before chowing down so you don't break a tooth.\n\nIf nothing else, they are one of the few old standards on Franklin Street that have not succumbed to the high-end shopping takeover, so they are worth being excited about.\n\nDo watch out for drunken Tarheels, though.  This place has more disgusting drunkenness issues late at night than any bar I've been in.", 'pos'), ('Pros: Very clean and pretty little place. Really sweet-natured and attentive servers. Clean bathrooms (Haha it says a lot, ok?) Reasonable prices \n\nCons: Pho broth started ok but after a while starts to taste bitter and weird and left my mouth really dry. Meat is kinda chewy.\n\nThis place could have been SO AWESOME. A pho place so close to campus is one of those "of course!" ideas like Cream that has everything going for it if well-executed, and yet it doesn\'t quite work. We got the pho with everything, which only had slightly more meat than the pho with a fraction of everything? The spring rolls were pretty standard, but the pork one had sausages wrapped inside, rather than ground pork, which was surprising but not unpleasant. \n\nOverall, I\'d come here again if I was in the mood for pho but was too lazy to drive/ too cheap to order from pho me now\n\nP.S the KK stands for the names of the owner\'s sons cuteee :)', 'pos'), ("This is my favorite place of all time. I've driven from LA to SLO just to eat here. The barbecue sauce is AMAZING! Everything here is AMAZING! I can never decide what to get when I go here. Here's what I rotate between; tri tip sandwich, chicken wings and the ABC burger. Their fries are delicious also! Wings are fried and spicy. ABC burger is ten times more delicious then In N Out. I don't even know what to say about the trip tip sandwich. Words can not describe it. If you are a meat eater, you'll love it. It's bread, bbq sauce and like 2 inches of steak. Just amazing! My mouth is watering trying to describe the food.", 'pos'), ('After enduring years of crappy, undercooked, bad pizza in and around Ann Arbor (a la pizza house, cottage inn, and the like), Silvio\'s brings real pizza to town. Real pizza should be thin, have a crispy, bubbly, sourdough crust and be full of flavor, not grease, and this is the only place to get it.\n\nDon\'t be fooled by the "organic" part of the name, it really should be called "Silvio\'s Italian Pizza"\n\nBeware though, the more toppings you get on this pizza, the less well it cooks all the way through, and the less of a full pizza experience you get. The Margherita is a little light on the cheese, my only complaint.', 'pos'), ("The average rating for this place is right on point: a-ok.  We came here with a relatively large group on a Friday night a little after ten o'clock.  The first floor of the place was packed, but we found plenty of space upstairs in the corner, which is a pretty weird room considering how removed it is from everything.  Or waiter was good about taking everyone's drink orders and being patient about it, though at one point he gave the right drinks to the wrong people.  He was also cool about serving us while we played a stupid game with post its on our foreheads.  We didn't order any food, but I was impressed that their kitchen is open so late and the menu is pretty big.  \n\nWe were having a fun time until the band came on down stairs.  The blaring sound was inescapable, even though we were kind of removed from where everything was happening.  The music was so loud it was almost impossible to hear what anyone was saying right next to you.  In case you're planning to pay with Discover, they DO accept it; not so cooperative on the check splitting though.", 'pos'), ("For the grand finale of my LA trip, we head over to Firestone Grill immediately after Splash Cafe.\n\nI like this place for many reasons.  Obviously the tri-tip sandwich was just off da hook delicious even after clam chowder & calamari literally 5 mins ago.  I also think this is one of the largest, most laid back sports bar/grills I've been to.  The ladies at the register and the bartenders were very friendly in answering my questions.  There is a large dining area inside and the humongous patio outside, but I don't doubt that people may end up spilling onto the sidewalk during game days as it was already quite packed for a Sunday evening.  Despite the noise factor, I felt there was good energy from everyone and I was pretty comfortable.  They have plenty of wide screen LCD TVs hung along the walls for your viewing pleasure (and the picture is clear :P).  I don't think they have servers so you have to walk up to the counter or bar for service.  Not a big deal to me IMO.  \n\nSome might say that it was premature to give this a 5 star rating, but I have faith that the next time I visit (and I will go back), I will not be disappointed.", 'pos'), ("I've used this service for years.  The best parts are that it tends to be on time and that there are bike racks on the front of the buses.  Unfortunately the drivers must navigate roads filled with undergraduates on bicycles who think they are immortal.  I've seen some close calls, but the drivers get serious kudos for being able to drive in that environment all day.\n\nThe drivers tend to be helpful and friendly, though some of them don't speak excellent English.  There are a few routes I get a bit car-sick on, but that is due to the twisty roads and frequent stopping-accelerating.  \n\nThe routes change, especially if there is construction going on.  Make sure you check to see what is running during the summer and holidays.  I've waited for shuttles that weren't going to come for days before.", 'pos'), ('We went here a few weeks ago on the premiere weekend of Horrible Bosses.  Loved that movie!  \nMy wife wanted to come to a real movie theater that was more of a classic than one of these "pick one of 30 small screens to watch" types of theater, and this was a great choice!  The inside is HUGE, I heard the manager tell us as we waited in line "There\'s no need to rush once the doors are opened, there are over 740 seats in there.".\nInside is nothing fancy, nowhere near the classic look and feel of the Crest Theater down the street, but it did remind me of theaters I used to go to as a kid.\nSmall snackbar, typical high prices, oh and the weird thing is the bathrooms.  They only have one toilet so it can take a long time to get in and out.  I found this odd for such a huge theater.  There are more upstairs I am told but did not venture there.  \nI am a bit older so seeing a theater fill up with college kids, and loud ones at that, was great but had me a little worried at first because I hoped they would quiet down once the movie started.  They did.\nThe parking here is horrible, just to let you know in advance as I am sure many of you already do know.  Street parking, there are parking  lots, a little pricey and a walk away, but you are in "the village" so there is plenty to see and eat and walk around before or after the movie.\nGreat location, may be back someday.', 'pos'), ("One of the best nights of my life. Hands down.\n\nIt was just amazing... The amount of people that gathered all for the same thing, The music pumping through your body everywhere you walked, The day turned to night, and the fireworks that illuminated the sky as you danced without a care to the blissful beats of Deadmau5 and others. It was a night that I will never forget.\n\nYes, it was not perfect, but what event of that size ever has been. I mean you don't show up to the largest rave in america and not expect there to be a shit load of people there. The numbers have been increasing every year, so why would this one be any different? If not, it would only be even bigger, since the biggest rising dance artist of the year, and the biggest name in trance are headlining...\n\nAnd as for all that crap about fence jumping and people getting hurt, and that one girl even died!.. OK, my condolences go out to that girls family, having a death in the family is hard, i cant even imagine it being your child.... BUT you cannot blame her taking drugs on an event, any more than video-games for kids shooting other kids. Its their own ignorance and apathy. As for all those people who got hurt. More than likely their own fault. Some 250 out of 180,000 people messed up, and now theres this huge dim view on raves. Cause there have been less riots and fights due to hockey, or football, or basketball, etc. right? (note: sarcasm above)\n\nMy final word/opinion: Definitely the best massive I've ever been to. Just as good, if not better than last year! Can't wait for next year!", 'pos'), ("I was in a desperate need of a good falafel and once again Yelp didn't let me down.\n\nOnce in the small deliciously smelling restaurant, I decided to go with the lamb gyro. I read many good things and decided to try it out, and was praying it wouldn't turn my entire mouth yellow(as stated by a few yelpers). \n\nI am happy to report that the gyro was deliciously seasoned and had huge pieces of lamb wrapped up inside. I couldn't tell you if my mouth turned yellow because I made it a point to not look at myself after I was done eating. I figured that if in fact my mouth changed colors, it would also change my overall enjoyable experience at Aladdin's", 'pos'), ("Okay heres the deal when you aint got money like most college kids you go to establishments like this who caters to folks like you. Back through my college years, the gf went to school at UCLA so as broke as I was I always managed to scrounge up a little something something here to buy us an ice cream sandwich I mean for a buck you cant beat that. The cookies are freshly made and the ice cream is dreyers so for the money you can't beat that. They also serve hot dogs for those that are hungry.", 'pos'), ("This place is beautiful and sexy and spacious and I was just feeling the whole vibe jumping off in here.  I was here for a Motorola event and was able to hear a live performance and the sound system is on point.  \n\nI love the decor with the lounge couches and tucked away areas.  I didn't see where a dance floor would be though (problemo!!!).  Maybe it was up those stairs that big, huge bouncer wouldn't let me up.  \n\nAnyway, I will be back here.", 'pos'), ("This is really a 2.5 star review. \n\nI ordered the pancakes with sausage and homefries ( the dish usually comes with eggs but they substituted the homefries free of charge). The food was decent, but nothing to write home about. The pancakes are pretty small and they definitely skimped on the homefries. I will say the kitchen did look dirty, which is ALWAYS a red flag. \n\nAlthough the food is very, very cheap I wouldn't really recommend this place. However, if you want to get breakfast and rent or buy a hookah at the same time, this is your best bet.", 'pos'), ("We had lunch here today and was pleasantly surprised at how good it was. We chose one of the outdoor patios and was immediately greeted by our waitress, Lindsey. My wife ordered the Pub & Cheese and I ordered the Ortega chicken sandwich.\n\n During the short wait for our food, I started to have buyers remorse.  The fish & chips that were delivered to the table next to us looked awesome.... Oh wait... look at the prime rib sandwich... Damn, I should have ordered that.\n\n I shouldn't have worried... My wife's Mac & cheese was out of this world, as was my sandwich. The garlic fries that come with the sandwich were plentiful and cooked to perfection. To top it off, Lindsey had just made salsa and brought some to us with chips, gratis. Wow!\n\nService and food were A+. The Kilt is going to be a regular place for us to eat in SLO.", 'pos'), ('My last trip, I took the SuperShuttle to the airport (4 am departure, blech) and the Flyway home during rush-hour traffic.\n\nThe Flyaway was the clear winner. What would I do without you? Sure, I had to wait a little at LAX, but that is expected. It was still faster, cheaper, and easier than the SuperShuttle.', 'pos'), ("We were served sweet biscuits after we ordered two of the Fried Shrimp Po' Boys and sipped on our Red Stripes.  \n\nThe Po' Boys were served a big roll with tasty  fries on the side (Good sized portions). I enjoyed both the sweet and peppery BBQ sauces on each of the tables.  \n\nI liked my experience at Rack & Soul, my only complaints are it's a bit pricey and it took over a week for my transaction to clear on my debit card... I don't know what was up with that.", 'pos'), ("It's tough to rate a place in the UCSD Price Center, simply for the fact that if you're eating here, it's probably because you did not have better options available, either due to time, transportation, etc.  But, keeping that in mind, let's look at Santorini.\n\nFirst off, the lamb is quite good, and they give you a lot.  I got a plate, and I was very pleased with the amount of meat I got.  However, what's the deal with only one pita?  I ran out of pita before I was halfway done with the lamb.  For something that costs so much less than the meat, why not toss another pita on there?  Pita was fine, very average.\n\nFor sides, I got the fries and the green beans (which come in a tomato sauce).  The green beans were too salty, and the fries not enough.  Fries were nice and crispy, but almost no flavor.  Beans were so-so, tasted like they were probably canned, but not bad.\n\nThis place is a good value, so definitely wins points there - plate was just over $7 with tax, and a good amount of food, plus a beverage.  I'm sure this is mostly because it is one of the newest places in PC, but the line was significantly longer/slower than the other places, which makes it tough on your lunch break, so keep in mind if time is an issue.\n\nOverall, two thumbs up on the meat (+2 stars), and a good value (+1 star), which makes it above average for PC offerings, but that standard is already low, unfortunately.", 'pos'), ("The quesadillas were as good as I expected and my expectations were high for a place called the twisted taco. They have theme nights with djs blasting tunes and wisecracks. Although I wouldn't frequent the establishment every week, it was a pretty decent place to go.", 'pos'), ("New to the Ave, this is a sweet little coffeeshop and Korean cafe.  The interior is colorful and bright and they have fresh bakery items available to have with a latte. I haven't tried their lunch menu but the selections are the usual Korean choices sound very tasty.", 'pos'), ('Good knowledgable bike shop. Friendly helpful staff with a great selection of bikes.', 'pos'), ('It was one of those few days that I was crazy about having dessert in between meals. So a friend told me about this place and we went together. I ordered creme brulee and enjoyed it. The service was ok and the waiter was so friendly.', 'pos'), ("Their website claims that they were named best Thai in NY state, including the city. That claim is definitely false, but they do make an effort. The food was some of the better Thai we've had on this trip... relatively authentic and definitely tasty, although lacking some flavor.\n\nBut the highlights for us were listening to the completely over-educated diners next to us (discussing world travels, of course) and watching our definitely-a-Cornell-student waitress clean tables and carry plates. I guess someone has to do it....", 'pos'), ("I was at the mall last night and saw an add for $1.00 bar menu.\nDecided to go.\nSat at a table in the bar area. There are no items on the bar menu that cost $1.00. The cheapest was $1.99. I know it is still cheap - but why advertise something that clearly you don't have.\n\nI had the pineapple margarita, it was good but had way to much tequilla in it.\n\nOur server was nice, very attentive and super fast.\nWe had the nachos, buffalo bites and spinach spread. All was good and in good portions. We were full.\n\nOur bill came to $27.15 before tip, not bad for drinks and apps.\n\nThe only down side, there was a hair in my drink, a hair in the nachos and a hair tangled in my boyfriend's fork.\n\nI've learned to not freak out about hairs in food that look like they come from the head. But 3 hairs in one sitting.... that is a little much.\n\nBut overall experience was the best I've had at any uno's.\n\nI will go back for the cheap bar menu and a beer.", 'pos'), ('My wife and I had the pleasure of dinner and a show and let me tell you, WOW! The service is top notch, food selection is good (even for the vegiterians), drinks are good too. The performers are wonderful, I have seen CATS at the Pantages and is was good, however the Candlelight Pavilion took  a step further by bringing the show up close and personal. The schedule changes so check the web. I will definitely be coming back for more.', 'pos'), ('A fun night out on the town...', 'pos'), ("Incredibly friendly and helpful staff! I'm a shy person, especially being a guy at a beauty / medical spa, but they make me feel just comfortable. \n\nI came here because of the Yelp reviews (Thanks, yelp!) \nAnna (front desk) is polite and helpful. I just don't talk alot because again i'm generally a quiet person.\nDecor is adorable, very cute (and lots of white paint).\n\nThey have packages + promos from time to time that are worth checking out.\nThanks Elude!", 'pos'), ('One of the only places in the med center that i can my bahn mi fix in the med center.  For 3.50 i recommend the BBQ pork sandwich. The bread has been getting a bit stale when i go.. but nothing that stops me from eating there.', 'pos'), ('I am not a big Whole Foods shopper, especially at this location because the prices at this location tend to be higher than their other locations just a few miles away. I am a huge fan of their hot food section though. When I was going to school/working at UCLA, I enjoyed coming here to grab dinner. The prices were good (as far as Whole Foods is concerned), and you got a quality product for your money. There is even a decent outdoor seating area at the edge of the parking lot if you want to eat there.', 'pos'), ("Fav coffee shop in Cambridge.  Great decor, drink, and people.  You can't lose here ...", 'pos'), ("Lots of stuff on the menu so you'll never get tired of eating there and probably one of the best burgers in town. The portions are HUGE, enough fries and onion rings to cause a blocked artery. Place is a little cramped though but you'll forget about your surroundings after you bite into the burgers there.", 'pos'), ("I've stopped by a few times over the past 5 months, You'll certainly find quite a selection of Hot Dog and Burger options, you're bound to find something you'll like. \n\nI love the hawaiian bread twist to their dogs and burgers, love their tater tots, i'll be back for sure. \n\nNice clean environment, great service, if you love hot dogs and burgers like me this is a must.", 'pos'), ("Plum Blossom is a notch above all of the other local Chinese Restaurants I've tried around here. The restaurant is interior is something to be seen in person. The woodwork is fantastic. It's also by far the cleanest looking Chinese Restaurant I've been into around here. I'm guessing because unlike a lot of the others, it's not a take out based business. They seem to usually have a fairly busy dining room, and on the weekends it's usually packed. Which is probably part of the reason they have such a nice atmosphere.\n\nI've gotten takeout from here a few times and it's usually very quick and the food packed at a hot enough temperature to stay very warm until I get it home and serve it. \n\nThe people who take the phone orders are very nice and always get my requests right. No bean sprouts in my lo mein? Not a problem. No broccoli in the sesame chicken? That's not a problem either.\n\nThe food itself is very tasty. The sesame chicken isn't heavily battered and greasy. It's got a nice crispy, but light texture to it and the chicken is of good quality. I like it. I usually get the chicken lo mein for myself. Not only is it yummy, but I can eat it out of the carton and all I need is a fork. No extra dishes is always a good thing.  \n\nCouple of complaints. One being, the credit card machine has been down twice when I've gone to pickup a to go order. Once they told me this beforehand and the other time, I had to leave, go to the ATM and come back. Not so convenient. Second, they could use a website. I'd like to see the menu before I call in an order. Might inspire me to try some different things.", 'pos'), ('Rivermill Tots:\nTots\nCheese\nBacon\nChives\nOnions\nServed with a side of ranch\n\nCan you possibly create a more delicious combination?  I dare you to try.  In the mean time, Rivermill Tots rule.', 'pos'), ('Ah, Bandido\'s... light of my Mexican life.  I\'ve been going here since I first moved to Chapel Hill, and it\'s an absolute staple of life on or around campus.\n\nIt\'s a tiny hole in the wall place, kind of a cave, really (If you\'re tall, remember to duck when entering the main dining room).  The ambiance is fantastic, everything bright and gaudy and ridiculous, but very charming.\n\nStarting out with the complimentary chips and salsa is neat, mainly because there\'s a do-it-yourself salsa bar so everyone can pick their favorite from a half-dozen types of salsa.  I usually go for the enchiladas, which are excellent.\n\nA couple people I know complain that the food here is "soupy," which is fair to an extent.  Occasionally everything will come out of as a shapeless mass of cheese and chicken so dense that light itself is trapped within.  That being said, things are hot and flavorful, everything that you\'d really expect from low-class Mexican fare.\n\nBeware El Gigante.  It will destroy you.\n\nThe service is adequate at best, but again, that\'s to be expected.  Look elsewhere for beer specials.  Pay in cash and they enter you in a drawing to earn free food.  If you\'re looking to save cash, go for the A la carte selections on the back of the menu... there\'s a decent amount of food there for very little coin.', 'pos'), ("Good selection on beer (for a sports bar) and decent beer prices.  Food is a tad more than I would expect at a sports bar, but it is very good, and definitely worth it.  Lots of TVs, but not all HD (forgivable, I suppose).  Home town bias when it comes to teams and airplay (as it should be).  It's tough to get a certain game on, however, if it doesn't involve a local team.  This is understandable, but I don't see why they can't dedicate one of the smaller ones to other games, and leave the local games on the main/big tvs.  Last thing to add is that it is not really that big, so just keep that in mind.\n\nCurrently my go-to sports bar in Ann Arbor, but it's really the only place I've been to besides Wild Wings, which doesn't count.  (Local bars always trump national chains.)", 'pos'), ('Bel Frites is great for a late night snack after the bars close. The venue is small but the fries are good. Just recently they started to sell burgers which I have not tried.\n\nI would suggest the Thai Tiger seasoning with Mango Chutney sauce.', 'pos'), ("The best late night food in Pittsburgh. The food is good, it tends toward fried and salty but that's fine. Portions are ridiculous. I love mustard, and by far the best mustard I've ever had was here. The pizzas are done well in a brick oven. But even if you hate everything else, the beers alone are worth the trip.", 'pos'), ("I've been to Groove Yoga twice and was very pleased with the studio and classes - I've just been to Naushon's class - she was a very good instructor and I'd like to try some of the other teachers. I'm not a big fan of heated rooms but fortunately it is not TOO hot. Usually 90-93 degrees. The studio is immaculate and it's a nice touch they provide changing rooms, towels, tea and water. I belong to a club which offers yoga classes but the rates at Groove Yoga are reasonable so I probably will buy a 10 class card @ $12/class. Not bad considering other studios in the area charge $15 or more for classes. \n\nAlso, I work at UC Berkeley so it is very convenient to walk over there :)\n\nAddendum: I've been going here for a couple of months and have noticed a lot of small BUGS walking around on the floor (near the edges of the walls)! On several occasions. EWWW!!! :( Maybe they are coming from the plants in the foyer?", 'pos'), ('3.5 stars. Halal meat is served here. Owners are known Muslims. Had food catered from here at a CAL Alumni event. The food was good but not spectacular. The CTM and other chicken dish was pretty watery. Not enough cream in the sauces. Later on at night I went with some friends to get some chai (tea). The tea was good, although not free. Seating inside with some seating available outside as well.', 'pos'), ('I went here today after not having been here in years (due to a bad first few visits, but I heard that its under new management so I decided to give it a try).  \n\nOverall, there are very few T-accessible knitting stores, and this is one of the better ones.  The staff were helpful but not hovering and the guy who rang me up gave me some good tips about the sock flats I was buying.  Yes, the selection is small, but its also about 200 feet from the Red Line train.  Also, they had a good selection of prices, from gorgeous expensive stuff to plenty of options in the $7-$10/skein range.  Yay!  My graduate-student-budget thanks you, Woolcott!', 'pos'), ("I am a really big fan of restaurants where its a hands on experience. \n\nI would suggest not eating lunch before you go. I liked the fact that it wasn't like other Brazilian barbecue places I've been to before, I was impressed mostly by the variety of meats and how fresh it was (right off the grill) to your table. I found that the salad bar was really good as well lots of variety off from traditional Brazilian types of food,This place is definitely a Brazilian/ French fusion restaurant.  In this day and age I think having fresh ideas like Pampa's, is a great way to go. \n\nEverything I had was exceptionally good, the fillet mignon, was either garlic and herb or Parmesan. The chicken hearts  had a strong Madeira taste, the skirt steak and tri tip embodied traditional flavors of the flame, and was even better with the chimchurri , the lamb came with a balsamic reduction which I thought was absolutely delicious, the tabouli and coconut sweet potato puree was excellent, the wide variety of cheeses complimented my wine, and the service... I loved the service, everyone was friendly, knowledgeable, attentive. \n\nSo if you're looking for something different, a little off the beaten path of traditional Brazilian restaurants and you like  to have cheese with your wine before your meal like I do, then I would check this place out.", 'pos'), ("I decided to go here for a quick lunch so I went in around 1:15pm and ordered an omelet. I walked out 10 minutes later with the omelet, a handful of fries, and two pieces of buttered toast. The omelet plain is $4.95 and each topping is $0.55. I wouldn't say it was particularly good - it was exactly something I could have whipped up at home. My real gripe is that the guy didn't ask me if I wanted my toast buttered. I expected just some toasted bread that I would put jam on or something. But, out comes two slices of overly buttered toast; it was practically a butter sandwich.\n\nI guess that's my real problem with the place. It's set up like a diner but it doesn't have the diner atmosphere. A diner is supposed to be friendly and chatty but the employees didn't talk when I entered, ordered, or waited. It's also supposed to be bustling but the place, which is pretty small to start with, was practically empty at lunch hour. It was a diner without the appeal of one. Take that for what you will.", 'pos'), ("I hear this is one of the places everyone near USC goes....it is the place that you don't go to drunk late at night but you go for good, mexican food in a relaxed easy environment (the drunk option is actually across the street!! ha ha)\n\nThe decor is okay, BUT there is no alcohol here! I blame the USC kids around there, since I went to Berkeley and work at UCLA I can do that, for ruining what would have been a pretty good experience by not letting me have a beer or margarita with my food!\n\nMy dad and I both got combo plates, and they come with plenty of food!!! Everything is made pretty fresh, and there is a decent salsa bar that you can pile on top of your food once it comes. BUT the tacos tend to fall apart.....They pack them with so much stuff that the tortillas can't hold it all together! So then you end up with a tostada kind of thing, and if you aren't the tostada type or not in the tostada mood then this could sort of make you work a little hard to fill your belly, having to constantly fork up pieces that fall out of your poor, poor breaking and ripping taco shell.\n\nThe enchiladas were much better though with that red sauce that made the dish, but their tamale could have been a little more flavorful....mexican food should always be flavorful in my opinion, so come on la taquiza!! everyone that works there is so nice and friendly! just put a little more spice in your tamale and make a stiffer taco shell and we'll be in the 4 star business!!! okay???", 'pos'), ('This place is like a yogurtland but with more toppings! The yogurt flavors they have are pretty unique, I had green apple tart and it was delicious! There were also many varieties of popping boba which is always awesome. Good for post dinner dessert!', 'pos'), ('The outside (rooftop) was too crowded for us to get an open table. But, the college basketball pictures are awesome indoors and really set the atmosphere. Much of our meal conversation was on Michael Jordan, Sam Perkins, Dean Smith, and such. My River and Range burger (burger topped with smoke salmon) along with beer-battered fries was effing delicious. I also enjoyed the blueberry wheat beer (which they drop blueberries into). Mmmm. The service however was utterly egregious. Our waiter must have had some rare form of amnesia, he forget several things: the lemons we asked for in our waters, the ketchup. Funny enough, he even forgot to add on the Arnold Palmer that my friend Dan ordered, so the bill was cheaper than it should have been. Maybe the bad service was a good thing after all.', 'pos'), ('The Ave has been in dire need of a place like this. Whether you are a wing fan or not, this place has other options on their menu, but they have TVs everywhere. I think I counted something like over 30 TVs, plus a giant projector TV on one wall. There\'s always sports playing on them, so don\'t expect some reality TV garbage. There isn\'t a better place on the Ave to watch a game.\n\nThe wings are good. I can\'t say they are better than that other place that used to be on the Ave, but they are probably on par. I loved that place, so it\'s definitely a compliment. I think they have 15-20 different sauces you can choose from. I prefer my wings spicy so I always go with the hottest sauce they have. For the daring, they have what they call the "Hell Wing" that I can personally verify, it\'s f*cking hot.\n\nThey have all kinds of drink specials going on all the time. It seems like everytime I go in they have another drink special. It definitely appeals more to the college crowd or guy crowd. \n\nThe service has always been friendly and attentive.\n\nFor the true beer drinkers, they have a Beer 101 club. It\'s basically finish the 101 different bottled beers they have and you become a member of the club. Definitely a college thing. Oh well, sh*t I joined and I\'m out of college. Hmmm...', 'pos'), ("Great past; mediocre, dirty, unsafe present.\n\nIt would be great to see some resources allocated to cleaning this place up. so more people can visit it without having to fear for their safety. At least some great community events still take place here, like the daily Food Not Bombs meal. \n\nI agree with Meg T.: it's in your best interests not to sit on the grass.", 'pos'), ("I ate take-out from this place thanks to my lovely now-married pals in Pasadena after a long day of helping to put some wedding invitations together several months ago.  When I finally learned the name of the place a few weeks ago I was very surprised as it just didn't jive with what I ate.  Burgers? Continental ones?\n\nThey described the food as Greek-seeming but Armenian.  Insisted that they were told the food is Armenian. I thought, cool, whatevs as long as it tastes good.  I had chicken kabobs with the rice pilaf,  tabouli, hummus and a lovely salad.  I may have even had a bite of a falafal from the vegetarian one in the bunch.  I though it was tasty enough to save my left overs for and eat the next day.  It was A LOT of food and pretty reasonably priced I hear, but not 100% sure since again this was food in payment of services rendered :P\n\nThe reviews I've read here though make me a tad bit worried to actually go in, but the take out we ate was A-OK.", 'pos'), ("The building is legit for sure, but it's loud and dim on first floor.\n\nThe best place to study in Geisel is 7th floor!  However, people sometimes joking around.  I think Biomedical Library is the BEST!", 'pos'), ('Fantastic restaurant hidden away in the Sheraton hotel. Highly recommended. The food here is amazing. I wanted to order practically everything on the menu and settled on the braised pork with creamy mascarpone polenta. SO. GOOD.', 'pos'), ("I only went here because my regular supply of the Revitalizing Shower Gel that I got from Harvest Inn in St. Helena was running low. I believe Double Tree Hotel carries their products too.\n\nI'm addicted to the mint smell. It's $3.00 for the 1.18 oz.\n\nI might go back and buy some of the men's cologne. The Badian has anise seed smell and the  Vetyver has spicy aroma of vetyver wood with bergamot.\n\nI'm really getting to learn more about smelly stuff. My friends like to linger in my bedroom because it smells like tropical rainforest. I think it's a good sign when they don't want to leave ;).", 'pos'), ('I picked up my Gangsta Rap Coloring book a few months ago along with a mini-pin that says "Let\'s Makeout." \n\nLet\'s not discuss how I have used either item.', 'pos'), ("YAY for Thank You Mart!!!! The first time I walked in I was overwhelmed with the music, brightly colored wigs, vintage clothes and other trinkets but I quickly adjusted to this amazing store and you can really find some great stuff there. I got a chinese paper lantern, rayban knockoffs, and many other things from this magic little place. Even if you don't buy anything the experience is great so I fully recommend it!\nOH YEAH EVERYTHING IS 3.99!", 'pos'), ('Yummily filling breakfast tacos!  Their coffee and lunch offerings are also top notch.  For lunch, I especially hanker for the Thai grilled chicken salad.  I come here frequently because I work across the street, but I would come here anyway just because of the great food and reasonable pricing!', 'pos'), ("EDIT (1/14/10):  ** They have raised their prices so now the regular order of a bulgogi sandwich is $5.95.  I've eaten at Espresso Experience for the last two years and the quality seems to have gone down while the prices have risen.  The bulgogi sandwich I had today barely had any meat in in.  While the bread is still nice and crispy,  the sandwich itself lacked it's old flavor and it didn't wow me as usual.  I probably won't be coming back anymore, the sandwich just isn't worth $6 when there are few ingredients and the meat is scant.    \n\nThe famous bulgogi sandwich is so good and cheap!  A regular order is only $4.80!  ** They have raised their prices so now the regular order is $5.95. ** The bread is also very crispy and just the right texture.  They serve coffee drinks and sushi here as well.  I have never tried the sushi but I've seen some very happy customers dig into them, the rolls look delicious.  Now they offer shaved ice and it is heavenly!  Bananas, strawberries, mango, grapes kiwi, mochi, red bean, cereal, and a scoop of ice cream  = very yummy!  The only negative would be that service is kind of slow, but then again that means they take their time with each order!  I got the shaved ice to go and it came in a HUGE container.  Totally awesome.  The owners are so so nice too.  I will be back for the sandwich though!", 'pos'), ("Went here in search of a new road bike. Rich sent my boyfriend and I out on comparable bikes to the one I wanted. When we returned, Rich was looking at the specs trying to find the right fit for me. There was never any pressure during the purchase process and I ordered a bike with a down payment. I did have to call during the end of the 2-3 day window they provided me for when the bike would be ready and then I came in and was properly fitted. Again I felt Rich was very professional, precise and knowledgable when I asked him questions. Overall I'm very pleased with my purchase and would recommend them and consider future purchases/adjustments, etc from them. Only downside is, it is downtown Princeton and therefore downtown Princeton prices-which I compared to a little above average.", 'pos'), ("LOVE LOVE LOVE this place!!! I used to work down the street and would frequent this place almost everyday!! I still work for the same company but in a different location and I tell all the noobs to go to Pinocchio's for the BEST SICILIAN PIZZA EVER!!!!", 'pos'), ("This place is relatively new in Berkeley, so three of my friends and I decided to go try this place after a really intense work-out. Since this place is all vegetarian, we felt that it would be a really nice and healthy option, so it wouldn't cancel out all those calories we burned. \n\nThe first thing I noticed right when I went inside was that the floors were really sticky for some apparent reason; my running shoes kept sticking to the floor, and immediately I had an impression that this place was dirty. Moreover, there was only one other party in the entire restaurant, and my first thought that this place wouldn't be that good (I usually associate how good the food is by the amount of people in the restaurant). \n\nHowever, once we sat down, the table was pretty clean. The decorations were nice and modern, and I kind of liked the fact that it was kind of empty; I was able to really hang out and enjoy my time with my friends while we ate. I had a really hard time ordering, but the waitress was extremely nice and helpful. I ended up getting a spinach noodle dish that contained soy chicken, vegetables, and a sweet and spicy bbq sauce on the side. It actually ended up being pretty tasty; I've never had soy chicken before, and tasted pretty good. It is large enough that I can make it into two meals, and there was a good balance between vegetables and noodles. It did not taste heavy or oily at all, and the flavors weren't too overwhelming, nor was it too bland. \n\nThe meal overall was a pretty reasonable price, and it was a relatively pleasant dinner experience. I will probably end up coming back during the rest of my college years!", 'pos'), (u"Sabrina's Caf\xe9 is definitely my new favorite, hip place to dine. The atmosphere is very casual, yet professional and neat. The menu caters to a lot of different tastes, with a variety of choices, such as Italian and Asian cuisine to name a few. My first two times at Sabrina's, I had a variation of the same dish: the Crispy Tofu and Coconut Shrimp, both served over delicious soba noodles, which have been layered in a sesame sauce, mango salsa, and to top it off, avocado chunks. This dish, accompanied with the vegetable spring rolls, is a pure win. I really love the amount of food you receive here; the portions are more than adequate. A few times I wasn't even able to finish my meal on sight.\n \nOn average, the service is good as well. The staff is generally very friendly, willing to assist your needs. I highly recommend this lovely gem, which has two other locations, one in South Philadelphia, and the other near the Art Museum.", 'pos'), ("I also went here during restaurant week and the food was pretty good, but not fantastic. It was nice to have a leisurely 3-course meal, but I noticed that the normal prices were high for what you actually get. I have been here in the past for  1/2 off wine, which is a great deal: pair with some appetizers and you've got it made. The Nutella crepe desert might have been the best part of the meal, however the best part of the entire experience was our server: hilarious and still got the job done. I would go back, but would never pay full price for what is offered.", 'pos'), ("I've gotten my bridesmaid dress altered here for a RIDICULOUS price. I think they charged me like $45 or something along the line for a simple hem. They did an OK job. Definitely not worth $45. When I got my jeans hemmed here, it was a reasonable price of about $10, but it was so obvious that the hem was done crooked. I don't think I'll ever come back here.", 'pos'), ('Beautiful glass jewelry. Great website too!', 'pos'), ("I would give Esselon 10 stars if I could. I'm officially obsessed. Its one of the biggest things I miss about living in western MA. No matter how long I'm home for, I always take time for a visit. \n\nI love the cozy feel and decor, especially the awesome cieling. But the food and coffee is seriously incredible. I love the speciality pancakes--they're always so mouth-watering and delicious. I usually end up getting the breakfast burrito though. Its been amazing every single time I've gotten it. And i have to get a cookie to go. It keeps the Esselon yummy-ness alive even when I'm back in the city.", 'pos'), ('El mejor pollo rostisado en Claremont!!! Muy sabroso y mas con la salsa...', 'pos'), ("SO DELICIOUS. \n\nWe managed to get in line right before it got crazy long (out the door and around the corner), so I have no complaints about the wait. You order first, pay at the cashier, and then pick up your food when it's ready. (As you progress through the line, you can see each pizza being made.) The staff behind the counter is friendly, nice, and they work quickly. \n\nSeat yourself! (The seating area is large, but with the size of the crowd this place pulls in, I imagine people get anxious about whether or not they'll find a table.)\n\nThe pizza tasted so fresh. and so YUM. Soft, chewy, thin, warm, fresh ingredients. OMG. Foodgasm. (Also, this place has the new coke/drink machine which BLEW MY MIND. soooo cool and fun to use!!)", 'pos'), ("Matsuri is pleasantly surprising.  I generally don't expect any authentic asian cuisine in Pasadena but that is how many of the yelp reviews described Matsuri and I can see why.\n\nUpon your arrival, you are greeted by a little drumming.  A little hokey, for sure, but still a little charming.  All the staff are Japanese with cute accents - not blonde Pasadena socialites.  \n\nThe food actually tastes homey and handmade too.  \n\nAppetizers:  JALAPENO BOMBERS - jalapenos stuffed with cream cheese and fish roe and tempura fried with kewpie mayo and siracha sauce.   I'm not a fan of cream cheese appetizers so this was good, but not my favorite.  I did like the heat of the jalapenos though.  SHI-SO HOT; tempura fried shisho leaf topped with spicy tuna and a drizzling of eel sauce.  This was GREAT.  I was slightly disappointed that the shiso didn't add much flavor but the crisp worked wonderfully in holding up the tuna, which matched very well with the sweet sauce.  GYOZAS are great - handmade with a light loose veggie filling.  \n\nBoyfriend ordered the HAMBURG steak, three thin patties of ground beef with a pan fried crisp bottom and slathered with a homemade ketchup.  It comes with a side of cabbage slaw, potato salad and a wedge of cantaloupe.  Boyfriend liked the potato salad, which had cucumber slices inside. \n\nI ordered the MATSURI CHIRASHI, which came loaded with julienned daikon, furikaka sprinkled over the rice, and a selection of fishes - 3 tuna, 2 tamago, 1 salmon, a pile of ikura,  clam, eel, mackerel and I forget the rest.  \n\nFriend ordered the SPICY TUNA SALAD, which he enjoyed.  \n\nThe cooked entrees are all very reasonably priced at under $15 .  Me likes!", 'pos'), ('As a graduated UCLA student i have to say i miss this place very much, the staff didnt change in all my years of visiting.  \nAlways seemed to have a line out the door and for good reason. 2 perfectly baked cookies with a scoop of ice cream in between! HEAVEN! and for 1.50 used to be 1.00 i know TRAGIC, its still pretty damm good!! \n\nno place to sit, but somehow always managed a seat if i wanted one. great dessert place. worth the  hype, even with the price increases. long live diddy reese!', 'pos'), ("The Blind Pig is one of the places I'll miss most now that I no longer live in Champaign. The interior is modeled after old English pubs with mahogany and dark glassed windows, but there are plenty of unique touches. I always was happy with the music here too. I can barely hear myself think in most bars, but at the Pig the music, while good, keeps to its proper place. Sometimes they have live Irish and ragtime-style music. \n\nThe beer menu is the best in the area, with high quality drafts on tap, as well as a huge stock of bottled beers. The usually have cask conditioned beer too, which is mostly wonderful, if a little strong (the last one I had was something like 11% alcohol).", 'pos'), ('Gerry rules! Good canolis\n\nI love the pizza it is a different spin on your typical ny pizza.  The freshly made canolis are the highlight for me.  Best spot on 110th in manhattan!', 'pos'), ("Haven't been here in a few years, but definitely the best around.", 'pos'), ('Sometimes, I want it quick, cheap and easy. Wrapro is all three and here\'s how they pull it off:\n\n1. With the quickness: though they make each order right in front of you, it never seems to take more than a few minutes and I am promptly on my way out the door with my lunch in hand.\n\n2. On the cheap. For the most part, cheap makes a sacrifice of quality to some degree and Wrapro is no exception. The lamb is sometimes chewy and the pita they give with the hummus has been stale on more than one occasion. But for less than $7 and a ton of food, it\'s still a good deal.\n\n3. Easy - the menu is laid out is a simply manner and it\'s a few minutes walk from my house. Does not get easier than that@\n\nA few points of concern. I am one of those people who writes, in sharpie, "Please See ID" on the back of my cards. The man behind the counter once gave me a lecture about this. Dude, I just want some lunch, not a complete credit counseling sesh. Also, the last time I was in, I was given the wrong order and the woman helping me huffed, puffed and mumbled something, then proceeded to charge me the $1.25 difference in price. When I handed my card over (I rarely carry cash), she rolled her eyes and asked if I had any cash. Not the best customer service.\n\nI continue to grab lunch here on occasion, but I\'ve set my expectations to a certain degree and now I am rarely disappointed by Wrapro.', 'pos'), ("This is my kind of place! Run by super friendly people and serving up some pretty delicious food.\n\nWe walked in, and were instantly greeted by the owner and what I'm assuming was his wife(?). Both were incredibly welcoming. Upon hearing that it was our first visit, he walked us through a sampling of all of their homemade sauces and explained each. Perhaps we were there at a slower time, but it was great to have a nice conversation with the owner. He discussed his cooking methods and preferences for BBQ. He even let us try the black-eyed peas and collard greens - both were good...and both were vegan, which was a nice surprise for anyone perhaps looking for vegan options (they also have BBQ tofu options).\n\nMy wife and I walked out of YinzBurgh with chicken, ribs, brisket, pulled pork, collard greens, mac & cheese, and cole slaw; a decent sampling, to say the least.\n\nOverall, I really can't complain about anything. The pulled pork was excellent, the brisket was good (though maybe slightly dry), and the ribs were good. Note, that this isn't the type of BBQ that comes smothered in sauce, and honestly, you don't need much sauce - if any - to enjoy.\n\nAdd in the fact that all of the sides were good, and it's hard to provide any reasons not to go back next time we're in a BBQ mood!", 'pos'), ('I have been going to Atlanta Yoga for almost a year now regularly.  I take Anusara yoga classes there from Gina.   I love it!  Gina is a great teacher, enthusiastic and very willing to work with you on any issues you might have.  Anusara is different from Ashtanga, more alignment based and you get into the poses for longer.  Generally, the Anusara classes are appropriate for all levels, so do not be afraid to give it a go.  The studio space itself is nice with hardwood floors and a loft-like interior.', 'pos'), ("They fixed the music! Now you can savor your specialty latte to some awesome shifting soundscapes.\n\nSomething I forgot to mention in my previous review: I love that they offer little snacklets -- animal crackers and chocolate-covered pretzels -- by the scoop.  Maybe they should shelve the baked goods altogether (they semi-hide them behind the counter, anyway) and expand their array of cookie jars?  I'd gladly pay a buck or two to have a couple oreos or speculoos with my coffee.", 'pos'), ("I come here for the Blue Bottle Coffee, not the yogurt.  The yogurt is not tart enough for my taste.  if I'm in the mood for a sweet, creamy yogurt, I'll get the chocolate fro-yo here, but generally I prefer the tart yogurt at Yogurtland.\n\nThe Blue Bottle Coffee, on the other hand, is pretty decent.  If I just need a caffeine fix, I'll get the regular coffee at the bookstore since it is really cheap.  If I want something a little tastier, I'll get the handmade Blue Bottle coffee at Fraiche.  If I want a really decadent and sweet cup of coffee, I'll go to Coupa Cafe for the Spicy Mayan Mocha.  The Blue Bottle Coffee here is not quite as good as what I've had at the Blue Bottle Cafes in SF, but I'm just grateful they serve Blue Bottle coffee at Stanford because it definitely tastes better than getting regular drip coffee at CoHo or some of the other coffee places.", 'pos'), ("Having gone to UNC, I've been to Topo on several occasions. Service is consistently bad, and the food is average. Do not order the Jambalaya, you're better off getting it from the hot bar at whole foods. \n\nAs for beers, get the old well white. You won't go wrong with that.", 'pos'), ('Had wanted to try Eureka! Burger for some time now. We dont get out to Claremont too often, but when we do, there is always a new destination for dining. This time, happened to be Eureka! Burger. While we knew the restaurant was located inside the Packing House, totally unexpected to the small size of the place. This was on a Saturday night around 6:45 PM and our wait was estimated for about an hour and fifteen minutes. A little more than I expected, but we put our name in anyways. Pretty niffty that they will actually send you a text message when your table is being prepated. So, the wait actually ended up being around 45 minutes. Not too bad. \n\nStarted with the wings, and the sample of beers. Wings were great and enjoyed the housemade dressing for those. The craft brew selection appears fantastic, just from the four samples I ordered. The one IPA was actually really really good. Wish I could recall which it was. Ordered the Classic Eureka Burger and the Catalina Burger. My wife described her burger to be not much better than a traditonal restaurant burger. Even at ordering the cooking temp to medium. I thought the Catalina Burger was great. The bison was lean, but packed full of flavor compared to the classic beef in the Eureka Burger. The shoestring fries were fresh and seasoned well. While we may not return due to the fact that we are Back Abbey fans. (Now thats a burger), may stop by with the guys for selection of beers... and maybe try a different burg.', 'pos'), ('Never dissapoints. Delicious Smores and Red Velvet!', 'pos'), ("This is my favorite place to go for running gear.  They have a great selection of shoes, clothes and accessories, and the staff is really helpful.  One star off because, since they carry so many different types of workout apparel, they don't have as wide a selection of running gear as they could, but that's just my personal bias.", 'pos'), ("I work here, I play here. Never get tired of it, because there's always something new. Drive-in movie nights, soul night, local bands, gay/straight/everything in between night, incredible drinks (ask TD for a 'sunburst'), and a really welcoming atmosphere. There is one rule at ZuZu -- the awesome rule. Just be awesome, rad, etc, and you'll have a great time.", 'pos'), ('I don\'t have much of a review to offer as I only had a consultation.  Nevertheless I will provide information on that.\n\nI learned about Dr. Tobinick via a Youtube video his office uploaded.  I made an appointment for a free consultation; his office is in the UCLA medical plaza  They had me first watch a video detailing his unique procedure which, he claims, will eliminate pain associated with a herniated disc (in about 70% of patients).\n\nI have a herniated disc in my neck.  The pain is much less than it was a year ago, but still I have pain every day and so I\'d like to have my condition corrected.  I only take Aleve or aspirin on "bad days."  I didn\'t see Dr. Tobinick but rather one of his associate MD\'s - Dr. Reyzin.  The staff said Dr. Tobinick was in Florida.\n\nAnyway, Dr. Reyzin said I was a candidate for this procedure.  The next step would be to schedule a complete examination and physical test - cost $300.00.  The procedure then costs $3,000.00 - $5,000.00.  That\'s a lot for a 10 minute procedure but if it works it would be worth it.  I have health insurance and I\'ll have to see if they\'ll cover this.\n\nI came home and tried to find some negative (or positive) info about Dr. Tobinick on the web; I couldn\'t find much of either.  I\'ll keep searching.  I\'ll update this review if I decide to have this procedure done.  My gut feeling tells me something is not right with regard to Dr. Tobinick\'s claims.  If 70% of patients had their pain eliminated, wouldn\'t every spine doctor be performing this procedure?  Or perhaps, maybe the procedure works but after several months to a year, the pain comes back (which is typically what happens when steroids are injected into a herniated disc).', 'pos'), ('When it comes to Thai food in the University District, all signs seem to point exclusively to Thai Tom. I don\'t know why, but people really make a big deal about this place. Best Thai food in Seattle? Maybe if all the more spacious and comfortable ones in the area are somehow inferior. That\'s not to say this place is anything short of excellent, or that I doubt in its ability to stand up to the competition. The food here is simply outstanding. Whether it\'s a better Thai restaurant than all the other ones in town is another question, but what is certain is that you really can\'t go wrong with any money spent here.\n\nBecause I knew how popular this place is and how limited the seating would be, I anticipated it getting full shortly after opening. I stood outside and waited until 11:30 AM with a handful of other eager customers. By 11:35, nearly every seat was taken. It was then that I realized I was dealing with serious business. While I was lucky enough to be seated, I saw the waiter turn away a few people and ask them to come back later because there just wasn\'t enough space to accomodate them. I don\'t know whether to be impressed by that, but if they\'re so successful, I wonder why they can\'t afford to get a bigger place.\n\nThe place itself, if the other reviews haven\'t made it obvious by now, is constantly busy and crowded. It looks old, worn out, and generally unpleasant. But it\'s a restaurant and not a museum where you marvel at artwork. The air here is pretty much always thick with the smell of delicious fried food. The kitchen isn\'t in its own separate room way in the back and out of the public eye; the cooks make your food right in front of your eyes. Consequently, it can also get rather hot, especially if you sit by the fires. But all this food is definitely worth the trouble. No matter how long you have to wait, you can be entertained by the aroma of other customers\' meals and the display of the food being made.\n\nSince so much of the fun of eating here comes from watching the cooks make everything, I\'d suggest getting one of the seats at the counter near the front of the restaurant, kind of in the corner. It\'s a spectacular display, although not as ostentatious as teppanyaki. The cooks\' hands move with astounding speed. They\'ll grab from the ingredients around them, crack eggs single-handedly, and noisily clatter the woks around as they perform all their cooking in a seemingly effortless manner. It\'s nice being able to see exactly how all this food is prepared, especially if it\'s obvious that it\'s being done by people who clearly have a lot of experience.\n\nThe menu here is something of an oddity. Instead of the usual thin and light paper menus, the ones here appear to be entirely painted on wooden planks. My first instinct was actually to take it as a joke, but I realize that it may have been a stylistic choice. I suppose they\'re really going for that authentic Thai feel here. From the rather brief list of hardly more than thirty items, I ordered the Phad Thai for $7.50. This restaurant is supposedly top-tier, but I wanted to get the most basic dish before venturing onward to their more "specialized" delicacies. I got it with chicken and three stars on the spicy scale from one to five.\n\nAlthough there was quite a long queue of customers who had already placed their orders before I could get a chance to, it\'s almost not a concern because it was such a delight watching the guy cooking the meals jump from making one person\'s dish to another. It\'s amazing how he never seemed to mess up, too. On numerous occasions, it looked like he was stirring the food too carelessly and would make a mess, but he always seemed to catch it in his wok. The show had an almost mesmerizing quality to it. I don\'t know why I get such a kick out of watching one person multitask so efficiently. It\'s an entirely missed opportunity if you get seated at one of the tables to the side, away from where all the action is taking place. For this reason, I would not recommend coming here with too large and cumbersome of a group. Either way, it\'s quite possible to get seated right next to a complete stranger here.\n\nMy much-awaited lunch arrived with the chicken Phad Thai on one side of a long bowl, a clump of white rice occupying the other side, and a wedge of lime adjacent to all this. Sizzling in front of me, it looked and smelled like quite a feast, although I couldn\'t help but notice that it was... disappointingly small. To be fair, it was a very inexpensive dish, but insufficient as a whole meal for a voracious eater like me. All petty complaints, because the food itself was without a doubt among the best of Thai cuisine I\'ve ever experienced. A sweet taste was dominant with this Phad Thai; I guess they had skimped on the spiciness, but I won\'t hold it against them. I may have exaggerated the flaws, but they\'re all insignificant when you consider that this is just about as close to perfection for Thai food in Seattle to feasibly reach.', 'pos'), ('I was really excited to try this place out. I\'m a huge fan of The Back Abbey\'s burgers, but the service and wait are always brutal, so I was really hoping that Eureka would win me over.\n\nAfter finishing my dry, medium-well (I asked for medium-rare) "Italian Caprese Burger" that was heavy on the bun and light on the flavor, I decided that The Back Abbey is definitely worth the longer wait AND the more expensive check. I would only return to Eureka if The Back Abbey had an hour+ wait, or if I just wanted a beer sans burger (the bar seemed pretty chill).\n\nSo why did I give Eureka 3 stars instead of 2 or 1? The service was great. Our waitress was friendly and attentive, and she gave me an awesome beer recommendation (I had a "White Rascal," which tasted like a more delicious Hoegaarden). She also hooked us up with the delicious truffle sauce stuff for our fries that came with the burgers for only $2 instead of making us order the $7.50 "Eureka Truffle Fries" appetizer. The restaurant has several big-screen TVs, which is much better than The Back Abbey\'s one small TV at the bar if you want to watch a game. They also had some pleasant, mellow live music. The burgers were roughly $9-10, which is about $2-3 less than the burgers at The Back Abbey, and they came with fries, whereas The Back Abbey\'s burgers do not. My beer was $5, which is way cheaper than the average beer at The Back Abbey (this price difference is not surprising though since "White Rascal" is from an American brewery).\n\nBasically, I was hoping that Eureka would be The Back Abbey plus a hostess and a larger waitstaff, but their burgers just weren\'t up to snuff. I would potentially go back to enjoy a "White Rascal" on their awesome outdoor patio, but when it comes to burgers, I\'m still Team Back Abbey all the way.', 'pos'), ("I never knew about this place though I've walked past it at least a dozen times before, and it's very easy to miss up above the streets. Inkstone is deceptively small, as they carry a ton of great things, at pretty average/reasonable prices. The staff is very laid-back and never in-your-face about selling you products or has gimmicky crap around to confuse you. \nI love the weird prints they have in the back of the store - found a human body circulation chart for a few dollars and I was thrilled the other day. They also sell loose-leaf sheets of bristol, illustration board, watercolor paper, etc. which a lot of places surprisingly don't do. Good selection of pens for the ink enthusiasts like me who can't stand their Bic's, and some good sets in the front (glass case) as well. \nI also came in here to print a report for a class and it literally took something like 10 seconds to print. \nOverall a gem. I'm coming back.", 'pos'), ("Sooooo incredibly awesome. The food is outstanding! Their prices are fair and actually very cheap compared to Thai Palace. The staff is polite, friendly, and efficient. I'm never disappointed. My boyfriend and I go here at least once a month... sometimes more. Thai Classic is truly a gem in SLO.", 'pos'), ('I LOVE Crabtree & Evelyn\'s products, so three stars there, but I had a really bad experience with this store...\n\nI went in during the holidays to pick up gifts, and grabbed a fair amount of stuff for me & my mum as well without much help from the staff (At one point the lady who was obviously the store manager came out and she helped me - but no one else!). I got up to the counter and I don\'t know if the girl who was helping me was new or what, but she rang my whole transaction without putting it under my preferred customer number, and she had to return everything and re-ring it. Ok whatever, its holiday season...\n\nWhen I got around to opening a tube of Hand Recovery a few months later, I found out there was a USED TESTER in it! I paid $20 for a used tester! When I went back to the store the girl there said she couldn\'t do anything without a receipt, even though the tube was clearly labeled "TESTER" and had been used!!!! Gross, Gross, GROSS!\n\nThankfully, the gals at the Valley Fair location were very friendly & willing to help me out, and they gave me a ton of samples -without me asking- for the trouble. Stellar customer service at Valley Fair! \n\nI\'m pretty disgusted with the Stanford store at this point though...', 'pos'), ('Great lunch options.\n\nGreat rooftop feel to this place.  Window seating allows you to overlook JFK street.\n\nFood is edible to great depending on the dish.', 'pos'), ('Awesome. I really enjoyed the meal. There was absolutely nothing wrong with anything, and the wait staff was perfect. I rarely give 5-stars and this place could easily deserve it, but nothing blew me away enough to warrant that. I saw MacGruber after dinner.  It was pretty funny.', 'pos'), ("I travel during the week for work and get home late Thursday evenings, and I always get takeout somewhere on the way home. This is my go-to stop for takeout because the food is good, it is quick and convenient, and the prices are fair. While the food doesn't blow you away, the quality and spiciness are both consistent (with spiciness based on a 1-to-10 scale), which is hard to find here in Pittsburgh at many Thai restaurants. Also, in my experiences dining in here, the waitstaff has always been very friendly and attentive. My favorite thing to order is the Kiew Wan with chicken and the Mangoes with Sticky Rice for dessert!", 'pos'), ('If you are going to KAMS, you should know what you are going to be getting into. Like everyone else said, wasted freshmen, disgusting bathrooms, bad smells. Recently voted as the best place in Champaign-Urbana to have a one night stand. So, if you know what are getting into, and want a night of debauchery, it gets five stars. If not, one star.', 'pos'), ("The food here is solidly good. I wasn't blown away, but it's apparently pretty authentic. Of course, I'm no Indian food expert, but my Desi friend came with me to guide me through the meal, haha. \n\nWe got the large naan basket, which included a sweet naan (interesting, almost dessert or pastry-like), one with potato in it, and a garlic one (my personal fave). We split tikka masala and palak paneer. I guess we didn't expect the portions to be so generous. When it's served, it doesn't even look that big, but as you're eating, you realize just how much food there really is. \n\nMy only complaint is that the waiter was rather...not smart. He was very polite and courteous, but he was just off in some ways. He did a horrible job explaining to us the size difference between the large and small baskets of naan (something about 2 kinds but 4, 1 of each type, wtf?). We also had to wait a century to get the check, and when we were getting things to-go, he could NOT understand that we wanted to split all the dishes between the two of us.\n\nI'm coming here again before it gets too cold to sit outside, and I'm feeling adventurous so I'm going to get everything spicy. Yeahhh boy.", 'pos'), ("Go to the DG for your on-campus caffeine fix.  I drink only brewed coffee so I can't speak to the espresso drinks, but the coffee is always fresh and hot, and they brew Counter Culture, which is the best around.\n\nYeah so the inside is cramped and pretty inefficient, but it's better than the old one.  I would not suggest sticking around (unless it's nice and you can get a table outside) so if you need a spot to sit and study just take your coffee to the library or Union and enjoy it there.\n\nBest to stop here in the middle of classes so you don't have to wait in a massive line.  Sometimes the Student Stores inside counter has less of a wait.", 'pos'), ("I enjoy going to La Flamme for several reasons. One, it has an appealing old fashion quality that is hard to find in most areas. La Flamme has expanded hours compared to most barbershops. My favorite part...they're always quick without sacrificing quality.", 'pos'), ("Clover is absolutely fantastic!   As a vegan, you don't get much better than this for the convenience and the prices.  Staff is always super friendly, if not a little quirky, and I ADORE that you can draw pictures with the provided crayons and paper.  Always so much fun with friends (probably too much sometimes!)\n\nMy favorites are definitely the veganized BBQ seitan (with tahini - TRUST ME), and the chick pea fritter.  The dinner plates are also great!  Fries are incredible, and I love the ketchup and spicy chili sauce they offer!\n\nThe space is amazing, clean and open with white walls and plants everywhere -- you'd never know you were one block away from bustling Harvard Square.  Long story short: if you're in the area and want a slam dunk dinner for $5 or less, CLOVER is where it's at!", 'pos'), ('I like the fact that they have chorizo as a meat option for burritos/tacos/quesadilla/etc.  It is cheaper than Chipotle (~$4-5 for burrito with guac here vs. $7-8 for burrito with guac in Chipotle), and it has lots of options for toppings (chipotle salsa, pickled carrots) that you can add yourself.  Service was also fast.\n\nHad the grilled chicken burrito with whole wheat tortilla (a big plus!).  Very tasty!  Also cheese nachos with the aforementioned toppings.  It is decent like any other regular nachos, so nothing to rave about that.\n\nMinor complaints are the guacamole is a little too mushy (I like chunkier guac, ha!), and the service was just slightly unpleasant  as the servers were kinda pushy.', 'pos'), ("The four stars are more for the atmosphere than the food.  People rave about the fish tacos.  Stay away from them.  They're heavily breaded, the sauce is french dressing (I think, in any case it's something not good) and they're served with fries.  The burgers are fantastic.  I haven't tried the fancier items.", 'pos'), ("I love this place during summers, when the students clear out of the neighborhood and everything feels nice and chill, and there's always room to sit.  There's a great tap selection here, and nightly drink specials.", 'pos'), (u"I am a little leery of buffets in general, but I really thought that the lunch buffet at Caf\xe9 of India was quite good.  It was larger than others I have been to with nice variety and interesting dishes.  \n\nIf anything I thought that the service was a little too attentive with a server bringing our check before we'd finished and assuming I'd placed payment in it when I hadn't gotten to it yet.  To his credit he seemed embarrassed and assured us we could take our time.  I liked the decor and ambiance at Caf\xe9 of India, and the price was very reasonable.", 'pos'), ('Mmm, so a friend and I heard about this place and decided to go and try a few items. \nSavory Pork belly, Spicey Pork Belly Sand, Steam dumpings, Salty Chicken wings, Clams in creamy tomoato sauce. \nOver all it was ok, noting like OMG I want to go back. I will however say I will go back and try some other itmes, it could of been us or just not the best of night for Abricott.', 'pos'), ('The best teas around! Seriously, they have an amazing collection, great prices, sweet staff, and cozy atmosphere.', 'pos'), ("If I could give Delfino's a 4.5 I would, but only because they need at least a 2nd private dining space. GROW, DARN IT!!\n\nTheir stuffed pizza is some of the best 'za  in Seattle, worth every second of the 35 +/- minutes it takes to prepare. Yes, it'd be nice to have more potential ingredients on the menu, but frankly? As good as the present offering is, who cares? \n\nWARNING: Unless possessed of uncommon restraint, don't visit more'n every three months or so lest you achieve essentially globular form.\n\nYUM", 'pos'), ("An avid Maple View fan, I was pretty devastated when I saw the Carrboro location was closing.  I need my Double Chocolate Maple View ice cream fix like I need oxygen. Really, I do.\n\nGREAT NEWS!  Fresh Taste sells Maple View ice cream & frozen yogurt!  Frozen yogurt wasn't quite available, so I can't give an opinion on that but I'm betting it's delish.\n\nLast night, I happily strolled down Weaver Street with my Double Chocolate ice cream cone and all was well with the world.\n\nPrices have gone up slightly -- but still worth it, for sure.\n\nThe new owner is super nice.  Check it out!", 'pos'), ('came back. It was basically the same as last time, except my lemonade was more sour and the crust was crunchier. Still no major complaints, though, and I would still recommend this place.', 'pos'), ("Very cute restaurant, got there right when they opened so we were the first ones there but as half an hour passed by, there weren't any tables left. Street parking was okay but if you don't get there early, you might have to walk a bit. \n\nOrdered the scallops, the cauliflower, caprese salad, bruschette (garlic&tomatobasil), two bacaro burgers, and bread pudding. Let me just start off by saying everything tasted really good! We started off with the bruschette and the caprese salad. The bread of the bruschette was SooOoooo buttery and crispy, sooo delicious! I normally like a strong garlic taste, however the garlic on the bruschette was more of a mild nutty garlic flavor but still so tasty! The tomato&basil bruschette was typical and nothing too special. The caprese salad was also very good, had fresh mozzarella and pesto.  Then we got our scallops and cauliflower, and I know everyone raves about the scallop, but the scallops were just good, not extraordinary. On the other hand, the cauliflower was AMAZING! I don't know what kind of seasoning they use, but if everyone made cauliflower like this, kids wouldn't have any problems eating their veggies! We got our bacaro burgers, with the egg of course, and it was a unique way to eat a burger, but unique in a good way. By the end of all our small plates, we were incredibly stuffed. Thought the small plates wouldn't be enough to fill us but I think we were definitely wrong. Still we couldn't leave without trying the bread pudding and OMGGGG i'm drooling as I type,,, i definitely had a mouthgasm *sigh it's super fluffy, buttery, with a soft texture yet some of the ends of the little mushy bread pieces were crispy all topped off with a heavenly scoop of vanilla ice cream. What a way to end the meal! \n\nLoved this place, ready to come back and try some of the other dishes. Our waitress was super nice and friendly. All in all, a wonderful experience!", 'pos'), ("Didn't order any food, but definitely ordered plenty of beer to make up for it.\n\n(Probably not the best idea.)\n\nThe award-winning Blue Ridge Blueberry Wheat is super tasty, as is the Old Well White. Sit outside on a bright, sunny day; order up a few brews; relax and enjoy with your friends.", 'pos'), ('BROWN RICE.  That is why i go there.  Good food and service but it is the brown rice,', 'pos'), ("Interior is nicer than Woodlands' (which is catty corner) but the food isn't as good.  My dosa was soggy and not hot.  The selection of condiments wasn't as good either -- no pickle?  no tamarind?  and the riata was pretty flavorless.  Also, mind you, it's a vegetarian buffet for $9 and you have to drive there.\n\nI didn't try any desserts from the counter, but they looked tasty.", 'pos'), ("Can't believe I never went to this place when I lived in the area for several years.  Had dinner here last night.  They have fantastic BBQ.  I especially liked their cheesy grits, pepper corn bread and jalapeno hushpuppies.  Crooks has a very down home feel and nice outdoor seating..located in decent location on W Franklin St.", 'pos'), ('Awesome, completely renovated lux hotel that used to be a bank and also church (and post office?) . Humongous room with all latest features, the closet for hanging clothes had swanky sliding glass doors! The hotel lobby/ chill area is gigantic (reminescent of a giant banquet hall and evidence of former chapel glamour). The only super odd thing was that the windows in rooms did not open and we were explained it was safety measure, done with all modern hotels. Basically, Providence has a large percentage of a crazy element as its residents and so the precaution against "incidental" suicide attempts. As for the crazy element, you\'d find out what that means being here and seeing it yourself.', 'pos'), ("I love me a good Vietnamese sandwich and Bite mi did not disappoint! Bite mi meets all the essential ingredients for a banh mi shop: must be disturbingly cheap (sandwiches are all around 3.25 to 3.75) and scrumtrulescent!\n\nMy chief complaints are that the sandwiches are somewhat lacking in spice compared to what I've had before, they should really have options to tone up the spice and garlic levels. Regardless though, Bite mi is worth the trip!", 'pos'), ("You can't be a UCLA student and not go to this place and I've got a horrible case of The Sweet Tooth so needless to say, I kept  the place in business. I haven't been here for a while but from my recollection, the cookies were good and cheap, what more could you ask for? White Chocolate Macadamia nut...yummmm. I never tried that ice cream sandwhich everyone raves about but ice cream=good, cookies=good, so simple mathematics would dictate that ice cream+cookies=good. I miss you, Diddy Riese! It's been far too long since we've last met!", 'pos'), ('I have been going here for over 10 years and it never gets old! I love the Falafel sandwich and also order the tabula salad that is tangy and fresh . If you are in the area you owe it to your taste buds to come on in .', 'pos'), ('This place is pretty dear to me. I\'m a regular here, and for a good reason. Many good reasons actually. \n\nOne of its best qualities is how late they serve food until - Midnight every night. And their late night menu is not your usual bar fare. Everything from great munchies in the appetizer section to full salads, burgers, and veggie lasagna. Of course you can also score the Fries for the Boys, Nachos, Quesadilla, et al.\n\nThey have live music Thursday, Friday, and Saturday. Sometimes Sunday and Monday too. My favorite nights are Thursday for the great jazz bands and Sundays when they feature a solo pianist. Food in front, beer in hand... Nothin\' better.\n\nThe food is amazing - gourmet quality and an excellent selection. Especially for someone who leans toward vegetarian, but they don\'t discriminate. Some of my favorites include:\n-The Breakfast Burrito, a more-than-hearty package of potato, eggs, and cheese. Comes with salsa. Perfect for a Saturday morning with a Bloody Mary, or any other time of any other day (it\'s on the late night menu!). I usually add avocado. Classic.\n-The Dijon Chicken, creamy, savory completely satisfying. Sub the chicken for tofu if that\'s your thing.\n-The Veggie Burger. Or the Eggplant Burger. Or any burger really. So good. \n-The Taco Salad. It\'s hearty, it\'s pretty healthy, and it\'s so so good.\n-The desserts! Bread Pudding, Vegan Chocolate Cake, Mocha Torte especially. Ask for some of Dr. Bob\'s ice cream on the side! Expletive, that is incredible.\n\nDrink selection is pretty killer too. They have monthly special martinis, but I usually go for their great beer selection.\n-Dale Bros beer! Not only is it local to Upland, but the beer is so good! I\'ve made many converts to their brews, from the classic Pomona Queen to their special brews like the incredible California Black Beer.\n-Chimay White, and cheaper than it is at The Back Abbey a few blocks down.\n-Wine Wednesday. Speaks for itself.\n\nObviously I love the place, and am friendly with much of the staff. But I\'m trying to write an honest, helpful review. I hope that comes across.\n\nI\'m sad to see that some people have had some bad experiences, especially Mister X (I don\'t totally agree with all of Molly Z\'s review, if they run out of stuff it\'s because they purchase local, they\'re not a "wine restaurant" they are a restaurant, they don\'t have tablecloths at the bar tables, etc. - none of that is unreasonable). There\'s no denying that they had some bad experiences though.\n\nAnd that\'s a shame. The place is a rare combo of excellent food, drink, and culture. I hope those reviewers can take some solace in that the restaurant takes those critiques and any other comments they get very seriously, and work to improve the place and their service, as any good restaurant should. So some good comes out of that. Shame it had to go down this way.\n\nIt\'s worth seeing for your self. It really is.', 'pos'), ("Ben told me about this place being under construction months ago, and I drove by EVERY FREAKING DAY for the past month waiting for it to open. Seriously. It's right down the street from my office and I had never had Korean bbq before, so I was super-excited to try it.\n\nThere was a preview dinner (to which I was not invited - the nerve of those people!) two Saturdays ago that I saw going on as I drove by, to my great chagrin. As upset as I was, I was also thrilled that it would finally be open. Except that Monday, when I drove over, it was closed again. WTF?!?\n\nThey finally opened on Wednesday, so Ben and I made plans to have lunch there on Friday. My enthusiasm was dampened a bit by Jenny's review, but I saw on Chowhound that you could get kimchi if you asked and that the spicy chicken was pretty tasty.\n\nBen ordered the bulgogi and I ordered the spicy chicken. You get to pick two panchan dishes; we both got the spicy cucumbers but I ordered the sesame broccoli and Ben ordered the Asian potato salad. I liked the spicy cucumbers more than he did, but then again, my mom doesn't make these for me on request. The potato salad had onions in it, so I didn't try it, but Ben said it was just okay. The sesame broccoli was extremely bland and the stalks were somehow...flaccid. Ugh.\n\nThe spicy chicken was decent, though not that spicy; the flavor profile was pretty good but it just needed a little extra oomph. The bulgogi was underspiced and a little fatty. Oh, we did get kimchi, though ODDLY ENOUGH, they asked Ben if he wanted it and not me. I was insulted; I could be Asian, too! I have totally passed for Filipina before. Anyhow, I ran back to the cashier and asked to have some added to my order. It was not bad, though a little extra-fermenty to my tastebuds. Ben said it tasted like it came from a jar.\n\nOn the bright side, the place is really nicely decorated and they serve Diet Coke.", 'pos'), ('It is a cookie, people. With ice cream. Git over it. \n\nI can\'t say these cookies are a "bargain" or "deal" (I use the terms loosely given the economic situation of the day), but I can say that they are unncessarily aggrandized! C\'mon. \n\nDefinitely more of a college novelty. A must-visit if you\'re a virgin to the Westwood/Bruin area. But with experience you\'ll realize...you\'ve had better.', 'pos'), ("I LOVE THE LONE WOLF. A LOT. \nwe drive here from boston all the time. it is my favorite place to get (vegan) breakfast in the entire state. \n\ni get: tofu scramble, a gigantic side blueberry pancake, soy sausage, iced coffee. it is so much food i almost puke, but it in a good way. \n\nand yes. you can get a SIDE pancake. and it is huge. and good. \nand if there is a wait for a table it is possible you can sit at the bar and eat. or: walk to rao's or go to the bakery next door for coffee or something.", 'pos'), ("The Bridge is a pretty interesting Theater. My friends actually got married in one of the Movie rooms, had a reception in the bar area, which later extended into the Rotunda. The seats there are really nice and the place is clean. Its a good place to see the latest Blockbuster. I applied to work there when it first opened up, but they wouldn't hire me because of my tattoo.", 'pos'), ('I\'ve been here for dinner and lunch but, best of all, I listened to a friend describe the Thanksgiving dinner he and his wife had.  Like many of the reviewers, my friend raved about how this restaurant could make "ordinary food" taste sooo goooodddd.  Each time I came, I spent a long time reading the menu in an attempt to narrow down my choices and each time, I chose correctly.  In terms of atmosphere, the place is an oxymoron: sophisticated country.  Perhaps, it\'s a Napa Valley restaurant that got lost on the wrong coast!', 'pos'), ("A good spot for cheap eats close to campus. Beers on offer are great, but the food leaves a little to be desired: soggy fries, burnt wings, tiny sandwiches and burgers. Not terrible but not fantastic either. I'll go back for the beer and location.", 'pos'), ("When I bring my friends come from college; I always take them to Chuck's. It's just a given. I honestly have never gotten anything besides wings here. They are always given in huge portions and the prices are okay. It is worth it though. If you don't like college kids--don't come here. It is always packed with them. It is in walking distance to everything awesome and if you are lame and drive in Princeton--then there are parking spaces available near by.", 'pos'), ('I noticed last week that there was some water around the floor drain of my garage. I asked a friend of mine for plumber referral in our area, as I didn\'t know anyone reliable.\n\nAt the office, I promptly called the number my friend had given me, but it appeared that I must have misdialed, because it was a Doctor who answered the phone, so I apologized for the wrong number.\n\nHowever, I was quite astonished because the Doctor didn\'t release, but instead asked what kind of plumbing or drainage problem I got at home, so I told him about the clogged floor drain in my garage, just to get the conversation over and done with.\n\nWhen he asked what time would I want him at the house, I got really confused!\n\nThus, I respectfully inquired: "Excuse me, Doctor, but what business exactly do you have coming to my house?"\n\nSlowly and distinctly he responded: "Sir, I\'m not a Doctor, but our company is called "Drain Surgeon" and you\'ve called us concerning your garage drain problem. Usually, a drain problem like this can\'t be fixed through the phone, so we really have to come over to your house."\n\n"Ummm..., in that case, let\'s arranged for Saturday morning at 10:00 AM", I conceded.\n \nWhen the guy first answered, I really thought he said "Brain Surgeon"!\n\nAnd the only reason why I was hesitant to have an appointment, was essentially because there\'s absolutely nothing wrong with my brain at all.\n\nDamn it! It appears that California is replete with funny and pun-oriented business names, which I didn\'t quite appreciate.\n\nThey shouldn\'t mix legitimate business with comedy business.\n\nAnyway, the Drain Surgeon guy who came over was an experienced plumbing professional, respectful and with a friendly attitude, who provided satisfactory service. The guy also gave me their contact number in Glendale: Tel. 818-843-5853\n\nAccordingly, if you have a need for drain surgery, the Drain Surgeon could perform the operation readily, with utmost dedication and efficiency.', 'pos'), ("Love this place! It's one of my favorite little cheap noodle houses in the U. and I've been going here for like, 10 years. Not much of an atmosphere, unless you like pictures of terriyaki. Tempura Udon, Teriyaki and a mountain of Yakisoba are all great here. Lot's of great food for not a lot of money.", 'pos'), ("Went here after the Yelp Elite event last night...this was an old haunt for the bf who used to live in H Sq. I had heard various things about it from him and others, and so the anticipation and expectations were built up. \n\nCambridge 1 did not disappoint in the least. \n\nWe only had to wait a few minutes for a table, during which we ordered beer (yesss, wachusett bberry) and munched on those awesome breadsticks (what is that little kick? It's incredible!) Once we sat down, our waitress immediately recognized my bf, and vice versa - he used to be a regular back in the day. I always give bonus points for places that remember customers...that whole Cheers dynamic (the show, not the stupid bar in Fanueil). \n\nWe each ordered halves, since he wanted pepperoni and I wanted to try a veg one. They came out in a timely fashion (not busy) and we were both in heaven before long. I got the tomatoes onions cheeses one, and the onions were carmelized...best way ever to eat onions! The crust was super thin, but had a lot of gooey flavor and was crispy too. I thought it was bigger than I needed for that night, but the bf ate every last bite of his (side note: I have never seen such large pepperoni pieces in my life). Looking around, the salads looked awesome as well and I was sad I had munched away so much at the event beforehand to enjoy one of those too. \n\nThis is also a great date place, as evidenced by the 73 dates going on around us. I know this isn't our last date here, that's for damn sure!! \n\nXOX Cambridge 1. I heart you!", 'pos'), ("Better pizza than we expected.  Certainly not gourmet but significantly better than any of the chains and definitely satisfied my craving for a good pizza.  Love how the pizza pan has bubbles that allows for no soggy pizza.  Lively atmosphere with a younger crowd--good if you want an active evening.  The buffalo wings were ok, could be a little crispier, otherwise you start tasting the fatty skin more, but maybe that's your cup of tea.  I would give it a 3.5 =D", 'pos'), ("We've avoided this place long enough due to the overdressed crowd that it is full of, but recently dared to go in on a sunny afternoon for dinner.  Seating near the window overlooking Witherspoon St. was charming with an elegant atmosphere.\n\nI usually spring for the interesting looking items to experiment on.  Eh, that doesn't always work out well... The place had much recommendation, therefore I had the thought to order something basic to size up the place.  Since this was mainly a steakhouse, I decided to go with the steak and fries dinner - too boring for my usual fare.\n\nThough boring sounding, that was only until the food arrived.  The steak came out amazing, and the fries that came in a metal cup (and stayed hot throughout) were some of the best I've ever had.  The meal was full of flavor and the taste seemed to linger on for days.  The lady also raved about her delicious looking perfect seared scallops and asparagus dish.\n\nWe topped it off with an equally delicious bananas foster, another boring sounding dessert done right (while enviously watching the two businessmen eat their cool looking sorbets).\n\nComing back shortly after for lunch with our out of town guests, I sprung for the 21 day dry aged Delmonico steak ($37).  Seasoned and salted perfectly, this must have been the best steak I had in the last few years.  Tasting their Filet Mignon side by side, this fattier special cut was a couple more times more flavorful.\n\nTry the steak.  Whether I felt like the low-end sirloin or their best, they did not disappoint.", 'pos'), ("Until this restaurant, I'd never had Singaporean food before. I was very pleased to see that it seems to be a melding of flavors and ethnic influences (bits of Thai, Malaysian, Indian, etc.). My first visit, I ordered the Singapore Laksa, noodles in a coconut broth with chicken and tofu. It disappointed a bit, but only because I think I was expecting a lot of flavor, and the dish was relatively bland. My date had the Pad Kee Mao (Spicy Hor Fun) -- teehee, indeed, jokes abounded. This we both thought was excellent. Reminiscent of Thai Drunken Noodles, but with a different kick. The second time we came, we tried the appetizer sampler, which I definitely recommend -- it's the perfect way to get a taste of the many fusions on the menu. Staff is unbeatable -- not sure if this is a family-owned business, but it's been the same faces whenever I come in. My servers have been really sweet and attentive.\n\nThe atmosphere hints at grandeur -- plus carpeting, deep mahogany furniture. There are two rooms -- one more of a dining area, one more of a bar area -- and a nice patio around the side.", 'pos'), ("Nice place to shop/waste time at. It's just like Spencer's but with better lighting.", 'pos'), ("I was recommended to Upstairs on the Square as a place to take my mom while we were in Boston.  It was a great suggestion and we both liked it.  Great decor, view, etc, but we didn't love it.\nI wanted to have the 3 course menu ($20 at lunch), but the main dish was spare ribs, which I can't stand, so I just had the soup.  It was a pumpkin soup with pumpkin seeds on top and pumpkin crispy things.  While good, not worth $10.  The dish was very shallow, and I really don't think any soup is worth $10.  My mom had the salmon with couscous which was around $16.  She thought it was good, but lacking in flavor.\nThe problem I had with Upstairs, besides being overpriced, was I felt I didn't belong.  It was a Monday afternoon, but I felt under dressed (it was cold, I had a puffy vest on ok), and out of place.  The guys sitting directly behind me were obvious intellectuals who have to talk just loud enough so everyone can hear their conversation and know how smart they are.  Also, someone, who I believe to be the manager/owner was walking around to several tables talking to them about their meals (which I find a bit odd for lunch?) and completely skipped over our table, even after catching my eye.  I don't know, just not my scene for a relaxed lunch with good food, too uptight.", 'pos'), ("I was pretty thrilled to see that a shabu spot was coming to town. A current favorite is Shabu-Zen, in Chinatown, which serves as a comparison and benchmark for Shabu Square.\nThe Edamame was overpriced at $6, and as such was skipped. Straight to the meal, please. I ordered the D5 beef, the lowest tier of beef on the menu. The thinking was as a direct comparison to Shabu-Zen - their lowest-quality beef is quite good. Shabu Square's beef offering was $1 cheaper, but for the quality, it should have been a bit less. A very unappealing cut of meat, chewy when cooked, and with little flavor. \nThe noodles were fatter than I've had elsewhere, which was a plus, and the vegetable plate was quite nice, missing only some tofu options.\nThe dessert was a thai custard, which was served with two pieces of white bread. Wonder Bread, rather. A very unappealing presentation, but the custard was quite delicious.\n\nThe service, Im happy to say, was excellent - I never felt like people were hovering over, waiting to refill my water every time I took a sip, and I also was never put out for want of service. \n\nIn all, I think you'd do better with the higher-end offerings. The service was quite good, but the decor was a bit off (posters of alaskan tundra and caribbean beaches? errrrrr...). \n\nIn all, decent if you're craving shabu, but don't skimp on what you order. I think with a bit of fine-tuning, this place could really be something special, just not yet.", 'pos'), ("A few years ago I got the bright idea to relive my childhood by rolling down Miller Outdoor Theater's glorious hill. The grass and I didn't mix well, and I ended up with a funny rash on my body which lasted for days. I tell you this because despite the fact that MOT left me a not-so-fancy parting gift, I STILL LOVE IT AND GO BACK (but I don't roll down the hill anymore). \n\nI spent a lot of time there this Spring, on sunny but cool afternoons, with a frisbee and some friends. Man oh man do I love having picnics, and this is such a perfect spot. Parking can be nasty for big events, in fact it was kind of a nightmare this evening during the July 4th festivities (Houston Symphony--excellent!), but I definitely don't mind walking. I think anytime you find a wonderful picnic spot in Houston you need to treasure it forever and that's what I try to do. So impress a date by packing a picnic or take some friends and you'll have a wonderful afternoon. Check out the calendar of events and get some culture in your life!\n\nAnd the best part? It's ALL FREE.", 'pos'), ('The Good:\n. Teriyaki chicken bowl\n. Miso soup\n. Edamame\n. Affordable prices \n. Vegetarian friendly\n\nThe Bad:\n. Busy corner location\n. Dingy locale\n\nThe Ugly:\nI was first introduced to Mako Bowl quite a few years ago.\nI did not think much of the place and opted to take my business to Himeko (Teri & Yaki) instead.\nI have recently re-visited Mako Bowl will favorable results.\nMako Bowl is a no-frills  (far) superior Yoshinoya-alternative.\nRecommended for a quick, inexpensive "Asian" fast food fix.', 'pos'), ('This store has a little bit of everything. And the prices are more reasonable than the other stores around. But this is what I like in a corner market. The even have a Tekken 3 machine in the front of the store. Which i have not seen in years.', 'pos'), ("COOKIES: The cookies (double chocolate chip, and chocolate chip) were really good. Chewy, moist, crispy edges. \n\nICE CREAM: But my ice cream, plain old chocolate was frost bitten and icy. \n\nVERDICT: I'd go back for the cookies, but they can keep the ice cream.", 'pos'), ('Best tried so far in the Bay Area.Not cheap, but you get what you paid for.You`ll look pretty good to take your date out there.Nice location,modern,fairly new,plenty of parking (street + a lot across the street).Salad bar`s nice ,clean and inviting.I`d go back if really hungry for meat, since there are some pieces that you just can`t say no to....\nForget about prior to the dinner`s dreams that you`ll eat all their meat.After 4-5 pieces, you`re almost done, hence unless you`re really killing for a lot of meat,it`s kind`of waste of money at $44/head (Rodizio).', 'pos'), ("One of my favorite cafes of all time. I'm afraid to give it a glowing review because I'm not sure it can hold any more than 10 people at once! A hidden gem in Westwood (I don't think they even have a sign up right now) across the street from Brew Co and next to the old Haagen Dazs. Locally-owned, family-owned tiny spot serving up fresh, homestyle, simply delicious Italian food. The pastas are great, as everyone says, and I mostly go for the sandwiches during lunchtime. The bread is perfectly warmed, with the best balance of a slightly crispy crust and softness. I crave the turkey with guacamole and the caprese! \n\nWhat's weird is that they don't post the hours on the door, and I guess Archie and his crew close up whenever they feel like it.... we've driven by at 6 or 7PM to find them randomly closed. But I will still gladly give 5 stars, because even with the strange schedule (or lack thereof), I love them anyway and will keep coming back.", 'pos'), ("I STILL LOVE MOE'S, even though it's a long-distance relationship now.  I always have some other ostensible reason to be in Berkeley, but really, I'm there to stop in at Moe's.  My only problem is that they have so many good books that I can't decide which to get!", 'pos'), ("I picked up some carry out for some dinner guests. Yoshi's was very friendly and patient with helping me. The food was delicious! Everyone loved the tabouli, hummus and grape leaves. I like the spacious interior. This place FELT clean, which is a huge plus for me. \n\nI will definitely be going here regularly. Good healthy food at good prices!", 'pos'), ('We had a small dog with us so we were limited to places that had outdoor dining while at Stanford Shopping Center.  Babbo\'s caught our eye and we took a seat.  We had no particular expectations but all three of us were extremely pleased with our meals, mine was the Gorgonzola and pine nut pizza which was amazing.  Babbo himself even stopped by our table to chat indicating that his restaurant had been in business there for over 20 years. We\'ll definitely be back.\n\nI highly recommend the restaurant and only reflecting four stars in my rating because I have not patronized the place frequently and to avoid overall irrational exuberance.  \n\nBy the way, the name plate by the door says "Babbo\'s Pizzeria"', 'pos'), ("This location of Sura is not nearly as spectacular as the one in Johnston. Mostly because the one in Johnston actually has the grill at your table.\n\nThat being said, everything else about this restaurant is pretty decent. I've had everything here from the sushi to the bulgogi. Their special rolls are interesting and rather different. I'm pretty sure they're one of the few places in the area that has a sweet potato roll (yum).\n\nCompared to my go-to sushi place though, it can't really compare but if I'm in the Downcity area, it's a decent place for a quick sushi fix.\n\nMy favorite thing to get here is the spicy pork bulgogi. They don't have grills at each table, which kinda takes away from the Korean BBQ experience but when the bulgogi came out, it was just as tasty.\n\nEverything about the restaurant is decent. The service is nice and I think the location is AWESOME. \n\nOverall, I'd come back here for my Korean fix since I don't want to drive all the way to Johnston every time I need some bulgogi in my belly.", 'pos'), ("Sockos = best subs that I have ever had. I usually get the vegetarian one with pesto and avocado on a french roll and it is delicious. Fresh, crisp, cool and the french roll is just to die for. It has just the right amount of crispness on the outside, but still really soft and delicious.\n\nThe price isn't bad for what you get and they're really friendly.\n\nOnly down side: Didn't exactly like when the guy delivered it and had to dig through the trash to find the order slip, and that the car absolutely reeked of cigarette smoke. But still, sandwich tastes amazing as always.", 'pos'), ('The only difference between this original spot and the one up the road about 5 blocks on the Drag is the inconvenience. Being located inside Dobie mall, it definitely has a very jail-like feel to it... the lighting in Dobie and even in its dining hall just exerts some odd depressive feeling.\n\nThere is something very comforting about VERTS. It offers the same things we know and love: customization of our "deli" style items where we act like we know the best combinations i.e. Subway and lots of meat. And carbs. It is not too ethnic where the sandwich only comes in one fashion. It is just ethnic enough to provide that bit of unique flavor i.e. lamb.\n\nThe sauces are assuredly quite good. The spicy red is a creamy zippy one, and the vinaigrette offers a bit more richness than most oil and vinegar types, so as to provide the best dipping for the nooks and crannies found in your kebap. They pile on the goodies to excess, to boot.\n\nI don\'t know how they are making it in a college town by selling light non-wraps... pita pit has pitas, and which wich has wiches, but Kebap\'s are their own animal. It almost reminds of a gordita of some sort. Quite good; get here.', 'pos'), ('Dr. Schnierow at San Diego Sleep Medicine IS the reason that I sleep now and without the aid of pharmaceuticals. I\'ve struggled with severe insomnia for over 20 years and have been to multiple sleep doctors from Boston to San Diego. Since I don\'t have a physical problem like sleep apnea most doctors tell me to not watch tv in my room, get out of bed after 20 min, don\'t drink caffeine etc. I\'ve also tried natural meds, EMDR etc. nothing was working.Dr. Schnierow is the first sleep doctor to "think outside the box" and give me hope that I wasn\'t going to live my life sleepless. He listened to my story and gave me suggestions that actually worked. Repairing years of insomnia takes time and Dr. Schnierow gives me that time and creativity. Just a side note that at my first appointment with him we got in a discussion where I became frustrated and almost didn\'t go back. I am so grateful that I did!! I have enjoyed every appointment since and feel like I really have someone looking out for my sleep. Plus, I was able to get in to see him in 1 week vs. 4 months for another sleep specialist in town.If you want a new approach and attitude to your sleep problems go to Dr. Schnierow.', 'pos'), ("This is one of my favorite places to go because it's good Chinese food, which is rare to find in the bay area! I graduated in May but if I remember correctly, #74 (crispy noodle with chicken/beef/shrimp) and #77 (creamy corn sauce with fish) are really good. Service is pretty good too, the guy's really nice. It's cash only though.\n\nThe dishes here are worth the money because they serve a huge portion. For example, if you spent $7 on a dish, you can eat it for lunch and save it for dinner. That's a whole days worth of meals! The reason I give it 4 stars is because it's a bit too salty/greasy at times..but that's the price you pay for eating out! ha..", 'pos'), ("Rick Orr is more than a florist, he's an artist.  He did weddings for a couple friends while we lived in Champaign, and they were perfection - they stood out as zen-like natural sculpture.  Excellent place to get an unusual hostess gift, or to comemorate your anniversary *hint*.", 'pos'), ("The ABC Burger was a good one and the fries were addicting however I'm glad that it didn't cost more than $10 per person.\nIt was bustling with College kids all ready for some cheap grub.", 'pos'), ('There is something about hot food just off the grill.  I "like* thai food, but not enough to seek it out, and it is often "cold" when it gets to the table, and it never stirs my soul. \n\nThai Toms suffers from none of that.  And I am convinced that spoonful of whatever that goes in the wok, is a highly addictive substance.  It may not make you high, but it does something that makes my mouth water every time I want to go there.  \n\nI ALWAYS get the same item.  Chicken Panang.  I also like the little deep fried bullet rolls, and I usually have water.   The reason I get the same thing, is that it is SO good, and I am not even close to sick of it.\n\nNo matter how few people there are on the ave, and how empty all the restaurants are, there is ALWAYS a line out of Thai Toms.  Nothing else should recommend it more than that.  \n\nIt doesn\'t matter what day of the week, what time of the day, there is always a line.  Because of that, and the noise of the restaurant this is solely about food, and getting it from the plate, into your gullet, and out the door.   Where unbelievably all you can think about is your next trip back.', 'pos'), ("I've been meaning to drop in and try their sweets.  So I've read the other reviews, and I'm not sure if the cakes are made from scratch, a box, or what, but I will say the staff working on Saturday September 12, 2009 at about 9:00 PM were friendly, attentive, and very helpful.  \nI had a red velvet brownie/cheesecake combo.......and mmmm.  My partner had a chocolate brownie, and MMMMMMMM.\n\nWe had coffee and cake and loved it.  We'll be back.  The cake prices are fairly competitive, and lots of people were coming in picking up cakes, and from what I saw they were beautiful.  Not sure how they tasted, but we'll be back and will up date more information here.\n\nThe decor is cute.  I am so glad they're here!  Their website is full of information and is also a good place to visit for more information.", 'pos'), ("Oh my gosh, I am devastated. This place uses MSG?! Asian Ghetto uses MSG?! *breaks down in tears*\n\nUhm, anyway, this place was my favorite place in Asian Ghetto for the longest time because there were so many different dishes I liked:\n\n#77: Creamy corn sauce with fish fillets ... omg, to die for, just try it, I know it looks disgusting in the picture but just try it!\n\n#56, I believe, is the curry with chicken, broccoli and tofu. It isn't bad, I get it when I feel guilty for not eating vegetables for a month.\n\n#74 is the crispy noodle... that's always the bomb. Lasts 2 meals.\n\n#73 is the wide noodle stuff, I got it once but it was like half cooking oil half noodle, so never again.\n\nCombo plate is delicious and cheap, I really like it, it lets me imagine I am eating something close to a balanced meal.\n\nWARNING though... as much as I love this place, I once drank water from their dispenser and felt something brush by my teeth, and I spit out the water, looked inside and saw 3 dead bugs in it... so uhm... yeah. Might just be a rare occasion, but I never drink their water when I'm there, that's all I'll say. Regardless of that, still 4 stars. That should say something about how much I like their food! Plus, the guy is really nice to me, and it seems he is nice to everyone... so that's my experience.", 'pos'), ("I actually loved the Birch Aquarium.  I could spend hours in this place if it were larger!  The place was perfect, but it's like I left and just felt short changed because they were so small.  Call me selfish on my shellfish!  LOL!  \n\nThe place is well kept, and in a very beautiful and secluded spot in San Diego.  I highly recommend it for a visit!", 'pos'), ('Absolutely the best burger in Southern California.  And the Pomme Frites are the best.  Great service.  Plan for a wait as this place is always packed.  No reservations and open seating.  Service is great.  Selection of beer and wine is great.  Truly a great gastronomical extravaganza!', 'pos'), ("come here for the shaved ice, bulgogi (SO GOOD) sandwich, and spicy chicken sandwich...you won't regret it!", 'pos'), ("The Garment District and its counterpart Dollar a pound are great places to find unique clothes. I shop there almost exclusively now for clothes because you can't get such stylish or interesting things for under $100 anymore.  Sadly everytime I go there I end up with another tailored dress from the 1950's.   I just can't resist.\n\nIt's a huge warehouse of used things where you have to hunt around for hours but when you find something you want it's usually pretty well priced. A month ago I browsed dollar a pound and found 3 high end designer skirts, 2 of which were sink so they cost almost nothing (pricing is by the pound). Just because most of the stuff in dollar a pound is gross does NOT mean that you can't find good stuff there occassionally (the items at dollar a pound are there because they either weren't nice enough to consign or because the former owners did not want to bother with it). \n\nAnyways, every since I've been in cambridge the prices there have been going up and up.  If you are used to thrift shopping somewhere else the price tags might throw you for a loop.  Don't expect to find any upstairs for less than $7.00.", 'pos'), ('Pros:\nGreat rates\nClose to downtown\nLots of TV channels\nno extra charge for WiFi\nClean\nVERY nice owners\n\nCons:\nRooms are dated (but what do you expect with a very affordable motel?)\nCould sometimes hear people in other room', 'pos'), ("Interior is very clean, and feels cozy\nfood is good - not spectacular, but you can tell that it is fresh, and it's one of the nicer breakfas/brunch places in Berkeley - and huge lines are to be expected on weekends\nPrice is a bit on the pricey side for students, especially for breakfast, but it is one of the nicer breakfast places within walking distance (it is actually right across the street from campus) of the Cal campus\nThis is definitely a place that I would go if I have parents visiting from out of town - for breakfast/brunch", 'pos'), ("Previously I gave this restaurant 5 stars, but I'm bringing it down to a 4. It's gotten too pricey for us! I think it's about $11-14 for a burrito. I know their burritos are great but not *that* great. Also, their steak burritos sometimes have questionable non-meat parts in them. Mostly steak, but some fat/skin. Not a fan. Go for the chicken burrito.", 'pos'), ('Some of the best pizza in town.  Try the tomato basil or sausage.  Tastes better when you eat it there and is reheated in their oven so the crust gets a bit crunchy...  But, I miss the San Vicente location.', 'pos'), ('I like this cafe as a breakfast/ lunch place. Just what I want on Sunday morning - simple food, good service, nice atmosphere. \n\n4 stars for the prices. $12 for a glass of mimosa - Ouch!', 'pos'), ("I always, always, ALWAYS go here since it's a block away from my boyfriend's apartment. It's a small place, but the yogurt has improved greatly from when it first opened. The service is always friendly and willing to give free samples. 8) \n\nMy personal favorites are original tart (of course ;) ), lychee, and taro. Unfortunately they don't rotate the flavors a lot so it's mostly the same thing everytime. :(\n\nWide variety of toppings, and they even put witty names on the handle.\n\nonly 30 cents/ounce when you show your student ID!", 'pos'), ("I have to admit I am a fan of their red velvet cupcakes.  They are a bit heavy and their frosting is a bit sweet but I will happily devour them on any day.  Some of their other cupcakes are hit or miss. Depending on what you get, they can be dry or overly sweet but usually I just stick to their red velvet. I just wish they weren't so expensive.", 'pos'), ('Went here after a choral performance...so did the other choristers!  It\'s DARK inside, but it adds to the ambiance.  Food was tasty pub grub (and they do use Calder Dairy Sour Cream...is it wrong that I want to eat that with a spoon?) but a little pricey.  I can see why people make this their "backup" spot...', 'pos'), ("What can I share that hasn't already been shared? We all know that they've got the best movies. It's in a great area. It's small but never as busy as those other mainstream theaters. But my favorite thing of all is the FRESH POPPED POPCORN!!!! I hate the pre- bagged stale crap you pay $9 for at the other theaters. \nI would've given this place one last star if the floor wasn't all sticky in the theater and it had the stadium seating. Comfort is key.", 'pos'), ("The line can be tediously long but Joe is a pleasant experience overall. Some nights there is a quartet playing classical music. The acoustic is perfect. Don't forget to have the salty chocolate chip cookies, they are a delicious threat.", 'pos'), ('Beef Pepperoni OH YEAH', 'pos'), ("Have you ever had a love/hate relationship? Outside of college?\nWell, this is mine. Here's why:\n\nThe food is great, never had a bad meal. Their pizza is the best I've ever eaten, hands down. Their buffalo quesadilla is awesome, and I love their burgers and wraps. I'm also a fan of the bartenders and servers.\n\nWhat I can't figure out is how they get away with charging so much for beer and food. Almost $5 for a pint of beer, while Cuban Revolution only charges $3. Shame on you, Spats. Also, $13 for a pizza? C'mon. \n\nI'd break up with you, Spats, but I just can't distance myself from the great food, service, and multitude of flat screens.", 'pos'), ('When the melodies of Arabic music swirl through your head and the desire comes over you to dance with transparent veils and cymbals on your fingers then this is the store to glide towards. \nOutfits, shoes, dancing supplies for more than just Middle Eastern Dance and people who will take the time to help you find just the right costume.  \nBrowse through someday and dream about those Arabian Nights!', 'pos'), ("Coco's Cafe is a spot to go to if you want a wide variety of Asian food with the option to order your favorite boba drinks, all for a reasonable price. The food here is decent, nothing spectacular, but it's more for convenience and quick comfort food.\n\nThe Peppercorn Chicken with rice has become a favorite among my friends and I. The crispy fried chicken pairs really great with peppers and surprisingly, the dish overall is not really that spicy. As for the Curry Chicken, it was kind of soupy and the chicken was lost in the dish. A plus would be the huge chunks of potatoes and carrots. The Green Onion pie is a great snack to take to go, put sometimes it can be oily. The Sa Cha Beef Lo Mein was decent but I felt it lacked some of the bold flavors I was expecting. \n\nPepper Corn Chicken - 3.5/5\nCurry Chicken - 2/5\nSa Cha Beef Lo Mein - 2.5/5\nGreen Onion Pie - 3/5 \n\nThe free soup they have here is a great deal, simple but very appetizing. As for the drinks, I like it a lot here. The selection is great and the service is quick. The strawberry-mango smoothie I tried was amazing, it had the right texture and consistency.", 'pos'), ("Blimpy Burger is simply a classic Ann Arbor kind of place.  Anyone that goes to U of M or is visiting Ann Arbor had to go to Blimpy.  The burgers are absolutely amazing and very unique.  Here, a single patty is only about half the size of our standard burger patty, so when you order a triple or quad you definitely don't have to feel out of place.  My personal favorite is a triple (or quad if I'm extra hungry) with bacon and egg!  Make sure you either know how to order or read the chalkboard on how to beforehand or else the cook will probably snap at you...it's just the character of the place. I love it here!", 'pos'), ("This is a fabulous little children's boutique.  Not only will you find unique gifts for your little ones,  breastfeeding supplies and cloth diapers, but you do so in an extremely  welcoming atmosphere.  There is a train table for your little ones to explore while you visit with the sweet and knowledgeable staff.  I have asked questions about everything from cloth diapering, herbal remedies, toxicity levels in products, etc. and they have always been able to help me.  They even have a community room offering educational classes, yoga and art for children.  They recently began hosting Holistic Mom's Network and after attending only a few meetings, I feel so empowered to make better, healthier choices for my family.  I am a Claremont resident and feel good spending my money to support this local gem.  I know that I could never receive this kind of support from one of the big box stores.", 'pos'), ("New contender for fastest lunch at UCLA. These rice bowls aren't memorable or healthy, but Yoshinoya is gourmet dining compared to most of the options on campus. \n\nTip: Ask for extra beef juice. Your rice will taste extra delicious.", 'pos'), ("I went back because I was hungry in the basement of Evans and I wasn't in the mood for Top Dog. This time I around I knew what I was doing so ordering was a little easier. Also, after my first review, the owner e-mailed me and apologized about the staff issue. I did appreciate the gesture so that kind of gave them a bonus in my opinion too.\n\nStill, a four is what they get because of their prices. It's pretty average for restaurants near campus and they are pretty generous with the food portions. However, it's not something you might want to stop by at more than twice every three weeks (maybe that's just the broke college student in me).", 'pos'), ("Well darn it all. My aeons old review of my standby has disappeared. Alas, time for a rewrite.\n\nSo MK is conveniently located in 1 Kendall Square, thus making it the ideal spot for a harried suit, admin, or nearby resident to run in for a quick trim, shave (gents), blow dry, or wax (ladies).  They do a great job with eyebrows though I will say - if you're not a wax veteran don't stop by. The woman here does a fantastic job but they are ROUGH.  If your skin isn't used to it, you'll be RED RED RED.\n\nStill - I've recommended this place to yelpers in a bind before and always gotten great feedback.\n\nOh - one more note, cash or check only. Leave your plastic at home.", 'pos'), ("i've tried alot of fro-yo, from berkeley to seattle, I think this has the best original fro-yo. It doesn't have other flavors like it's counterparts but the original has the special tangy taste that mimics the yogurt drinks very well. \n\nSo far I haven't found any other place that has a better tangy taste.\n\nOther reviewers has mentioned that the guy working there is stingy and bias. Yes its true, he gives me the same feelings. He acts like he's counting how much fruit he is putting in your cup. But he has hired someone new and she's very nice. Hopefully she'll be working when you get there. haha", 'pos'), ('Stopped over here for coffee one morning with my husband on a recent trip to SLO.  Really good quality coffee, cool art, and friendly service.  We chatted with the barista about the gallery, and she was very upbeat and knowledgeable.  I wish we had a place like where we live!', 'pos'), ('i\'m a gal that likes her meat. a lot. bloody, juicy, medium-rare to rare meat. the less PC, the better. lamb, love it. veal, delicious. sorry PETA, meat is yummy, and i eat what tastes good. i tried to be vegetarian for a while because my best friend in high school was, but that lasted a solid three months before i started cheating. with bacon cheeseburgers. \n\nthusly, a place like gather, known for its vegetarian, nay, vegan fare, was somewhere i expected to enjoy more for say, their libations. however, gather is not at all what i expected - a polished 1-2 punch of cafeteria-style dining plus bar with a menu that includes minimal lentils and leans more towards fresh, seasonal dishes that most would call "california cuisine," and i call "just plain delicious." the vegan charcuterie platter lives up to its reputation as an artistic and appetizing sampling of vegetables, herbs, and nuts. while gather does have some vegan options that would scare a carnivore like myself ("cheese" made of cashews and leeks? no thanks), there is also homemade porchetta (pork wrapped in pork belly, \'nuff said). \n\ni may never be a convert to the vegetarian revolution (bacon is too damn yummy!), but i applaud gather for their inventive preparations and creative combinations of flavor, which ensured that i didn\'t miss the meat at all.\n\nPS - the bar fully keeps up with the kitchen as far as imagination goes; my favorite concoction was the bee sting, a slurp-able combo of square one botanical, lemon, fresh mint, ginger, and honey syrup (but be wise; don\'t slurp and drive).', 'pos'), ("I wasn't wowed... I have been to this particular location a lot. It wasn't a bad dish.. but it wasn't great either. I had the baked stuffed lobster (medium). It was basically all bread crumbs. Usually you guys do a great job. But lately you haven't been so great.", 'pos'), ("This place is AWESOME!\n\nWhen my friend and I decided to explore Urbana, we really had little to no expectations as we had always considered Urbana kind of a ghost town.  When venturing around Lincoln Square Mall, we came upon this neat little shop with a wide array of unique kitchenware and ingredients you'd be hard pressed to find in even the most metropolis of cities, office supplies, clothing, jewelery, toys, miscellaneous (yet AWESOME) gift items, fresh cookies(!!!), just really really neat stuff!\n\nWe probably spent more than an hour looking at each and every little item in the store, and imagined how we would furnish our home with it.  \n\nThis is one place I would recommend everyone check out at least once in their college career.  I don't know how else to explain it other than... AWESOME!", 'pos'), ('Utopia on SATURDAY night (also known as the Sol Fusion event hosted by J.Carter of Sugarhill and Marco of Marcos Pitas on Ponce) was FAR more than I bargained for. I\'m SO not the "clubbing" type, but I don\'t mind dancing from time to time. So I\'m invited out for a 30+ B-day celebration and am SO pleasantly surprised. For the "non club" type like myself, there are OPTIONS!!!! OK, on the first floor, it\'s more like a restaurant, but the dj (salah ananse) spins house. Then downstairs has more of a lounge-feel, and the djs spin 80\'s music. (let me just insert that the restrooms are QUITE innovative... check out the one downstairs if you get the chance)... i have a thing with clean, well-designed restrooms in restaurants/lounges... Anywho, back to the important stuff... In the "club" room, there are 2 privacy suites, but other than that, it\'s wide open with a cool dj set-up. So for my set of friends, this outlet was perfect b/c we could spend time in each area to equally satisfy the preferences of all of us. And I tasted a drink called the Buttery Nipple and it was delish. I didn\'t eat any food, so I can\'t vouch for it, but I will say that the ambiance was QUITE enjoyable... this event targets the 25-30+ crowd... so no "music video" attire!!! :-)... and oh yeah, it\'s FREE before a certain time. I think 10 or 11...', 'pos'), ("Augggh, this place has spoiled me for other vegetarian restaurants, which just never seem to be quite as good. That said, my carnivorous family felt like hitting up the Burger King on the way home, so maybe it doesn't work as well for the non-vegetarian-inclined.\n\nOne of its cookbooks, Moosewood Cooks at Home, also holds the honor of being the only cookbook I've ever cooked more than one recipe out of.", 'pos'), ("My friend read great reviews about this restaurant on Yelp so we decided to check it out on a Friday evening. We made a reservation and arrived on time, however, the hostess had us wait a while before she sat us. We were running on a tight schedule so that's why we figured a reservation would keep us on track. The place was not busy so I'm not sure what the hold up was.\n\nI ordered chicken breast stuffed with cheese, mushroom, and spinach and my friend ordered a skirt teak with chimichurri. I really enjoyed my dish, lots of flavor and a satisfying portion. I tasted my friend's steak and I liked it but it does not compare to my uncles cooking. He's from Argentina and invites me over for churrascos all the time. For dessert we ordered a crepe filled with dulce de leche, that was pretty darn delicious.\n\nThe staff was super friendly, our waiter was a pleasure and very attentive. I had a great dining experience. Dinner was a bit on the pricey side but the quality is good.", 'pos'), ('Today was a great day to stroll outside since it was sunny and just a little "nippy" with the cool wind blowing. A friend and I were strolling around University Village and went into Crate and Barrel for her to find a gift for a wedding. This is one of my top favorite household/furnishing stores.   I love receiving their seasonal catalogs almost as much as the big phone-book size IKEA catalog.  When I receive it I like to close my eyes and picture my place looking just as comfy and inviting as their model rooms not to mention as spotless.  They have affordable houseware items.  I have purchased my dishes, silverware, glasses and placemats from this store as well as various vases and decorative bowls.  I like their items because they can be unique but also classic so you don\'t have to replace them every couple of years or so.  With the glassware just be careful since some of them tend to be a little more fragile then others if the glass is very thin.  I wish I could afford their furniture as well but alas it was not meant to be this last year but there is still hope for 2008.  I got my eye on one of their dining rooms sets. Santa had said there was no room in the sleigh for it but I told him this year there is definitely room for a gift card there.', 'pos'), ("I really like this place. I've heard its owned by the same people who own Daisy Mint. If that's true, then I guess that explains why I like their food so much. For those of you who haven't gone there, that's a great Thai place. Probably my favorite Thai place in Pasadena.\n\nBut I digress. \nAbricott is a great place. It's sort of like one of those quaint places that you find and you like to take your friends there just to have a great bite to eat. It's not a super fancy place and it can remind you of a library with all the books around, but I think that adds character to the place.\n\nI've had the Pho and the Pork Belly Sandwich. The pho is not cheap at $10 when compared to other places like Golden Deli and Pho 79, but I think it's definitely higher quality than those places. The meat is especially tender and delicious.\n\nThe pork belly sandwich tastes so delicious that it's probably not good for you. If you're having a cholesterol test tomorrow, I'd recommend not getting this. Definitely come back to eat it after your test.\n\nAll in all, I really like this place and I can't wait to come back!", 'pos'), ("Been here THREE times. Tony is the BEST WAITER. Kelly is good TOO!\n\nRecommended COURSE: SPINACH ARTICHOKE. MELTING POT house salad. French quarter or pacific rim. FLAMING TURTLE.\n\nOut of Court Bouillon, Mojo, and Coq Au Vin, I prefer COURT BOUILLON the most.\n\nBill comes out to be $90 to $120. EXTREMELY romantic. For reservation, request for seating in LOVER's LANE. \n\nPark in the Marriott bottom floor for that FREE 3 HOUR PARKING (make sure to let your waiter/waitress validate your parking).\n\nThey do not serve BREAKFAST or LUNCH. Would COME AGAIN. FONDUE style means essentially dipping your FOOD into a steaming pot with various ingredients.", 'pos'), ("I've been shopping at stanford many times, but it was only recently that i stumbled upon Flemings. Its right behing Bloomingdales. Its a pretty small place. Its very dark inside, but it set a very quiet and romantic ambiance. TO start off the bring a plate of crispy fried baguette slices with 2 different cheese as spread. I order the smaller portion of the: filet and fleming potatoes.($28.00). And when they mean smaller, it really is alot smaller. But it was still good enough for me. THe fleming potatoes was literally 2inx1inx.5in. it was basically a sliver of the regular order. haha. The filet mignon was very tender and flavorful. I didnt see anythign special abotu the steak though. It reminded me alot of texas roundhouse. A little bit on the salty side, and i could REALLY taste the pepper (im a pepper lover so i was happy). We also had the prefixed winter meal. \nIt was a filet mignon: same as my order-it had alot of chopped up onion, mushrooms and bacon to top it off. i think it made it even saltier\ncaesar- its ard to mess up on a salad, i was satisfied\nparmesan mashed potatoes: very tasty, but they mix in MORE butter, i almost had a heart attack. \nthen the meal also came with cookiesand milk. I didnt have anymore room for dessert, so this was very satisying.\n\nthe service was decent. I think our waitress was more interested in teh older women who were ordering botles of wine. im not a big wine-o. its just another incident of ageism. booo! I wish i coudlve given the tip to the busboys who were very attentive, nice, and helpful. \n\nIt was a decent steak restaurant. But i'd rather save money and go to Texas roadhouse in union city or go to Ruth Chris' and get my moneys worth. This place made me crave Ruth Chris'. MMMMMmmmmm!!!! The staff as a whole were very nice. At the end of the meal they gave me a little box with chocolate dipped strawberries and card from the staff saying thank you and happy anniversary. Very nice touch!", 'pos'), ('I\'m shocked to see all the negative reviews for this place. When my parents are in town, this is THE spot we hit up for some authentic chinese food. Beware, do not ever order from their normal american menu. They have a special menu in chinese with their real specialties. \n\nThe food is soooo good and reminds me of home cooking with more emphasis on taiwanese style than i\'m used to, but still delicious! My favorites are their "sha guo", sorta like hot pot style, but its all ready for you to eat. Sushi here is decent and cheap, but i wouldnt make a meal of just sushi. Drinks priced reasonably, and you can even order a glass of champagne!\n\nFor college park, this place definitely makes my top 3', 'pos'), ("Looking for a spot to grab a bite, fire up my laptop and catch a few games before heading out of town, I stumbled upon Marlow's Tavern shortly after checking out of my hotel, \n\nThe setup worked for me; spacious and clean yet still a bit cozy. I was quickly greeted and escorted to a booth where I was promptly approached by Corey, my awesome server. He was attentive, pleasant and friendly without being overbearing or disruptive. I swear, I must have drank an entire liter of Diet Coke thanks to Corey, Whenever my Diet Coke was even running relatively low, I would turn around and Corey had already replaced it with a fresh one. \n\nI ordered the two mini sliders from the Kid's Menu and a side of parmesan truffle fries and within 15 minutes or so, these bad boys were placed directly in front of me. \n\nThe fries were so insanely delicious that I felt my eyes cross after tasting the first one. I know that may not sound very sexy, but think of it as a very mild food orgasm. Just, with crossed eyes, instead of curled toes.\n\nI was also really pleased to find that the mini burgers were small, but still hefty enough to completely fill me up. \n\nI guess everything *is* bigger in the south!", 'pos'), ("After walking around in MIT we went to dinner at The Middle East Restaurant.  It's seems connected to ZuZu though I didn't ask about it.\n\nThere's a bar area that people were drinking at and one guy was eating some dolmas though looked good.\n\nWe got:\nFREE pita - tasted store bought & brought in a bag -cold\nbowl of lentil soup - tasty\nbaba ganoush - I liked it \nhusband got a lamb shank - he said pretty good\n\nMeal was like $20+, so a cheap meal for Cambridge, MA.\n\nRecommended, though I can be Loud in there with loud music & high ceiling.", 'pos'), ('This is a great place to get your hair cut.  The staff here are very friendly and helpful.  They also give you a free coffee, tea, or beverage while you wait.\n\nIt can be a tad pricey, but you get what you pay for.', 'pos'), ("It's the In-n-Out of ice cream sandwiches. Cheap and it hits the spot. I wouldn't drive across LA for it. But a pit stop if you're passing through Westwood? That's reasonable.", 'pos'), ("I had the fried shrimp tacos and they were wonderful and a bargain at the price. Our waiter was Titus and he was very attentive and professional. Expensive margarita however they were good and strong. A very enjoyable experience and I'll definitely go again.", 'pos'), ("I visited Pasadena for the first time and tried looking for places to eat.. I was hungry and didnt really want to be adventurous so my first meal in Pasadena was Panda Express. The food was good, the employees are nice, and they pack your to-go container with loads of food. The place is bigger than other Panda locations that I've been to so people are not bunched into one little room. I thought it was interesting that they sell beer.. the only place I've seen a Panda Express w/ beer was in Vegas. Parking is plentiful, but can be difficult during lunch time since the whole lot is shared by a handful of other stores.", 'pos'), ("I have mixed feeling about this place.  As somebody who has lived in Japan for some time I like that the variety of authentic Japanese teas and specific food items.  On the other hand most of their sushi menu obviously caters to the local crowd of people who think that Ann Arbor is part of the civilized world.  Bland and boring to say the least, but the commoners will probably like it (if you've ever ordered a California Roll then I'm talking to you).  I personally don't get sushi here, I come for the freshly made ichigo daifuku (a dessert of rice paste enclosing a glob of sweet bean paste and a strawberry); they're orgasmic.  They best I ever had were in Hokkaido, but the ones here are easily comparable to those I could get in Tokyo or Boston.  \n\nThe people here are really great (friendly, helpful, informed, etc.) and most (perhaps all) of the staff speak Japanese which is nice for me too.  The decor is strange.  Most of it is very starched and plain -- uncomfortably white and hospital-like.  But then it is combined with an authentic Japanese garden fountain and the bamboo highlighted booth-like seats and such.  I've been there for lunch a few times and it was okay, I really recommend it for tea and daifuku.  \n\nI also really appreciate them being open until 8:00PM on Christmas Eve, everything else was closed at 6:00 and I wanted to get some work done in a cafe like I always do. But that's not enough to merit an extra star considering the infrequency of its relevance.", 'pos'), ("I found out that this place recently remodeled so I tried it today.  Normally, I go to the one in Stanford.  I really like what they did with the place. It's very relaxing and pretty.\n\nI had a massage with Dorothy.  I gotta say that she worked wonders with knots.  She has really strong good hands and adjusted pressure as I requested.", 'pos'), ("I  think this place is a hoot!  I picture the old Harvard guys going out Teddy Roosevelt style and bagging all of these exotic animals and somehow getting them back to Oxford St.  The shabbiness of the animals, old glass and wood cases and overall atmosphere add to it's charm.  I thought my young nephew would love it, but think it may be too low tech for many kids.", 'pos'), ("I have only been here for dinner, I have never had the buffet.  All of my experiences have been positive so far.\n\nI usually order the coconut curry chicken with the basil and garlic naan bread - it's AMAZING.  The rice is seasoned with fresh ingredients; last time, the rice even had whole cinammon sticks in it!  \n\nI would eat here more often if it weren't so expensive.  However, if you are a UT student, there is usually a coupon on the web for a buy one entree and get the second half off...that way the prices are more reasonable as long as you bring a friend/date.\n\nGET THIS - last time I went, I accidently left my credit card with the bill.  The waitress was kind enough to come running after me (yes, she even crossed Guadalupe during rush hour) to stop me and return the card before I got into my car!!!  Extra karma points for her.", 'pos'), ('Looks like someone needs to set the record straight on the Press. Its a classy joint with an eclectic crowd ranging from local college professors, students, blacks, whites and the occasional bro entourage wandering in from Rancho/Upland (and their numbers are definitely increasing, I\'m guessing a few of the negative reviewers may be of this persuasion).\n\nI should say also though I\'ve frequented the Press with regularity now for a few years, its always been a night spot. For the majority of its patrons, the Press is a bar that happens to serve food. \n\nFor this reason I suppose I can\'t say much to the negative reviews about the service. I just have never gone in there wanting or expecting a welcome wagon when I walk in the door nor a big corporate lapdog of a server. The Press is old school, the servers allow you the space to enjoy your meal and company without rushing. \n\nI will agree with those who have complained about the door, as they have had some atrociously dim and rude doormen in the past. Whatever, isn\'t that what a doorman is, a professional douche?\n\nNow on to the food and drink. Like most Claremont stops neither are what you would call cheap, though if you are more of a beer or wine person you don\'t have to spend much (especially on 1/2 priced wine bottle wedensdays). They always have a Dale Brothers or two tap which is great and a respectable though pretty standard selection otherwise. The food is good, with the majority of the choices being lite and fresh. I just had the Mahi Mahi tacos last night and they were great albeit admittedly a little dry, but the salsa took care of that.\n\nIt also hosts live music many nights out of the week, in my opinion its biggest weakness, as the majority of the local acts are pretty bad. \n\nUntil the emergence of the Hip-Kitty, the Abbey, and some of the newer places in Pomona, The Press really was an oasis amidst the dessert in terms of its uniqueness in the bar scene. So to all of you complaining about the "pseudo-intellectual" crowd (because it makes sense to call grad students psuedo intellectual), you know the High-Brow is just up the street and they\'re probably wandering where you are.', 'pos'), ("I was very impressed by the service that I received at this store. I normally have a horrible time with any customer service rep regarding cell phone issues.. but Sean did an amazing job! \n\nWhen you walk in, make sure you sign-in at the kiosk right by the door. Then they will call your name when they are ready. I waited about 10 min, which wasn't bad at all.\n\nI had to get a new cell phone and wanted an early upgrade. Sean was very knowledgeable about all the new phones out there, was able to show me the phones and tell me about the differences.. tried to find a phone that fit my needs and budget. He was very understanding and accomodating.\n\nHe also recommended some very useful accessories and told me which ones I could get a discount on... and I also got a rebate for my new phone!\n\nHe also gave me useful advice about my phone, my account, and how I could save more money. I was very surprised and thankful. He even spent the time to put the screen cover on my phone and uploaded all my contacts from my old phone. He stayed an extra 30 min after closing time to finish my transaction without even rushing me. Thank you so much!", 'pos'), ('The B Scene at The Blanton Museum is a must-do activity. I  am a  member and miss the monthly  schedule.  Now that B-Scene is offered every other month, I supplement by attending many of the members-only events. As a member, I visit the facility to be surrounded by the beauty and to enjoy the Cafe-Bookstore.  \n\nToday Sept 25 2010  is  Free Museum Day Event across America - go to Smithsonian Magazine Museum Day  website  to download a ticket. http://bit.ly/aeBxxE', 'pos'), ('This is the only place in Texas that carries the Floris of London line of gentlemen toiletries.   Nice people, lots of stuff.. will be back again.', 'pos'), ("I really wanted to like this place. The Firehouse brand had made a good impression on me with their subs and then their pizza adverts. Unfortunately, there were a few problems with their pizza division.\n\nFirstly, even after 35% off through the website, you end up paying more than if you call in an order for a large specialty pizza. That's just weird to me. \n\nSecondly, I was being charged $18 for a large specialty and 2 marinara. The guy taking my order was very kind though and corrected his error when I pointed out that my large specialty should only be 10.99 + 1.00 for the marinara. He quickly corrected it to 12.04. I'm not sure how the math works there but I'm pretty sure it's wrong. Anyway, from the few reviews here, it does seem like the whole pricing+ coupons thing desperately needs to be paid some attention.\n\nAnd finally...the pizza...I could have overlooked the aforementioned circumstance as my food was in fact delivered promptly and the service was courteous. However, I ordered the Firehouse Pizza and it was pretty subpar. The crust was tough and bland and the sauce wasn't flavorful at all. The toppings they used, however, seemed fresh and I appreciated that.\n\nUnfortunately, I won't be ordering here until I hear they've revamped their pizza (owners re: we want to like your pizzeria!) I'm hoping that after trying other pizza joints, I won't have to default to papa johns...", 'pos'), ("I love this place. Whenever my family has a special occasion, we jump in the van and head for fondue. The fondue is simply the best in the area. How can you not have a good time with laughing conversations with family and friends over bubbling cheese pots (and meatball pots, seriously, try the meatball pot!) As much as I love the food, and I really really love the food, the service has me coming back just as much. The owner lady feels like my middle eastern mom that wants me to eat more bread and potatoes. She also wants to send me home with my empty coke bottle filled with her mustard salad dressing that I can't get enough of, true story. I love this place, and if you love fondue, you really need to give it a try.", 'pos'), ("This place is great for those trips were modern and trendy are not a factor. Now I'm not speaking badly of this place, but if you're looking for a young hip establishment this isn't for you. \n\nThis is most often used for families that are moving their kids into UCLA. However, I stayed here with family while they were volunteering at the Tennis Classic being held at UCLA. They have a small underground parking garage which can fill up quickly. At which point you need to find street parking that is metered. There is a bus line one street over and is very close to local shops and tons of restaurants! The nightlife is full of college students so if that is also not your thing, then that's something to consider. \n\nThey offer complimentary breakfast which includes an assortment of fresh fruit, muffins, pastries, dry cereals, coffee, and juices. \n\nThe staff are all quite pleasant and helpful and ready to assist with direction or suggestions.\n\nThey also have a room with Internet access that contains 2 computers. \n\nThis place was more affordable than booking a hotel. Oh and one final note... My sister had received flowers from a friend that she placed in a paper cup in the bathroom. After maid service we noticed they had placed them in a glass vase for her. One of those nice unexpected touches that makes you feel appreciated.", 'pos'), ('This place is "tha bomb"!  Seriously, I have been yearning for a proper Ann Arbor cafe, and this place fits the bill.  The owner has worked in the biz for years so this is definitely not one of those flaky "wouldn\'t it be cute to open our own cafe kind of places."  No air pots filled with stale coffee.  It\'s all made to order.  They have both espresso and "drip" coffee, ground fresh and using a manual pour over method.  Today when I stopped in they had 4 different varieties to choose from.  I went with an espresso drink: a Macchiato to be precise.  It was outstanding!\nForget those corporate coffee joints with their "grande" mumbo jumbo and frouffy frozen coffee drinks (you know who you are) and support a local cafe that takes their coffee seriously!', 'pos'), ("FOOD REVIEW (NOT DANCING)\n\nThe Globe rated Middlesex's burger one of the best burgers in town last year.  Apparently it's on a ciabatta roll and it's off the hook.  It's the place's main attraction besides the DJ/dance club atmosphere they have nightly.\n\nWent the other day and you know what?  This ciabatta roll burger was off the hook and was one of the best I've ever had.  I'm not even kidding.\n\nThis place smells of beer and sweaty dancing...But I'll tell you that they serve a mean burger.  It's cheap - only $9 and it comes with chips.  Too bad they don't do the roasted potatoes that Miracle of Science does (they actually share a basement kitchen, FYI).\n\nI'll be back for more burgers.  And possibly some dancing late night.", 'pos'), ("I made my girlfriend go with me to a Cal football game recently, against Washington.  It was cold, rainy and miserable outside, and Cal lost the game on a last second TD by Chris Polk.  It was the last football game ever at Memorial Stadium, and the crowd was pretty deflated in the wake of defeat.\n\nAfterwards, we stopped by Yogurt Park on our way back to BART.\n\nThe store was mostly filled with kids who had probably been dragged to the same football game by their parents, and were being treated to some fro-yo on the way back home as a reward for sitting through the game.\n\nThey only had three flavors that day, chocolate, vanilla and pistachio.  We ordered a pistachio-vanilla swirl with cookie dough and shared it.  \n\nAnyway, it was good, but I didn't quite get what the big fuss was about.  However, I defer to her judgement on the matter, as she considers herself to be quite the conoisseur of frozen yogurt and other desserts.  \n\nThe only other fro-yo place I can name off the top of my head is Fraiche, in Pacific Heights, which she also goes on and on about.  She says that Yogurt Park is better though, so there you have it.", 'pos'), ("Stopped in for lunch with fears that I'd be here longer than my lunch break would allow. I was pleasantly surprised though that I was in and out the door in less than 30 mins (12:10ish - 12:30) even with the dining room fairly crowded. The combination bento box, although slightly pricey at $13, was really tasty. Although others complained of poor service, my waitress was very attentive and even the sushi chef stopped by to ask how things were.", 'pos'), ("I was mattress shopping today and went in here on accident as I only saw it driving by. The salesperson was pretty helpful (especially after my sears experience) showing me the models which were in my price range, and explaining the basic differences. \n\nThe store was very clean, the floor models weren't dirty and they had pillows out along with covers where you feet will lay, so you can really jump up on the mattress and get comfy without worrying about your shoes.\n\nAdditionally, the salesperson seemed eager to work with me regarding price, explaining what discounts were available (i.e. floor models, returned goods, etc.) I didnt purchase from this store, but did end up buying from mattress giant.", 'pos'), ("Try her Banana Bread! Holy shizzle. Girl can cook. She's a little sassy which is fun. Overall the best experience possible!", 'pos'), ("It wasn't hard to tell this place is popular when there's a line built up outside the shop. I think the advantage of this store is that it's really really close to UCLA. I heard about this place pretty much through word of mouths I feel like I had to try this place. Don't hate me but I feel like this place is overrated. The cookies sure are cheap, you can walk in here with $5 and get out of the store with a dozen of cookie and maybe one ice cream sandwich but the cookies were wayyy to sweet. Probably perfect with a cup of milk but enjoying it alone made me feel parched. The ice cream are Dryer's not homemade, not exactly what I expected but won't complain because I do like Dryer's. If you have a sweet tooth I guess this place really is for you. Their cookies have loads of chunky chocolate and nuts on them. You'll get your money's worth but as far as the taste goes, I really think it's overly sweet.\n\nService was kinda meh.. but it was probably an off night.", 'pos'), ("What a beautiful park!  Gotta love the changing leaves in the fall!  You can go down the path for a nice, romantic stroll-I think it looks lovelier than the promenade, actually.  Climb on top of the ledge for a nice photo opp, and throw some leaves in the air to make it look like the movies.\n\nOn your path you'll see several cute playgrounds-with seesaws, a big red cased swing (I tried it, it's mostly for kids but it worked out), elephant seats, slides, and a very interesting sand castle-like sand pit.  There's also a huge basketball court we walked by, where we saw families bonding over shooting hoops (super cute!).\n\nGotta love mother nature, WORD.", 'pos'), ("Going in, I knew wagamama was an informal, chain restaurant so I've rated it as such.\n\nAll of our food was good - not the best asian noodles ever, but good, especially considering the wide selection.  \n\nWe had the edamame with garlic salt and chili, #36(?) coconut soup with chicken, #44 or 47 - the ginger chicken noodles, and ended with coconut ice cream and coffee for dessert.  Also tried the fresh squeezed juice and a glass of wine.  \n\nOverall, the atmosphere (casual, super clean) and the selection will bring us back!", 'pos'), ("After reading a review, I want to try the fleur de sel cupcake but for now, if you love a creamy, buttery, rich frosting, try the vanilla!  It's my favorite!  It's so good that I savor it and take...10 minutes to eat the frosting!\nThe place is appealing from the outside with the bright pink colors and simplicity.  I appreciate that they purchase their ingredients from local vendors. \n As far as the price goes, if you're going to a place that only sells cupcakes and coffee, don't be surprised or complain at the prices.  Just go home and make them yourself.", 'pos'), ("One of the few bars, seemingly, in America where people can smoke inside.  It's a fun place - darts and KARAOKE!  Just be warned that this place can get smokey.  Not a place to hang all night... stop in a grab a beer before hitting other places on Ellsworth.", 'pos'), ('Okay Yelp, I\'ve never asked for this before, but may I please have more than 5 stars?  Yes, it was that great!  From start to finish...service, to food, even price point...I can\'t imagine it getting any better than this!\n\n   My sister had found a deal for Il Palio of 3 courses including a bottle of wine for $59.99 per COUPLE.  Their regular price for their 3-course menu is $39.99 per person with no wine.  So, quite a deal!  We made reservations and showed up tonight (Saturday night) for our 6:30 reservations to a relatively empty dining room with servers standing around. (note: it got busy soon thereafter).\n\n  We were offered tap or bottled water (we chose tap, with no snooty reaction when that was our choice), and served an amuse bouche before we knew it. It was a wonderful smoked trout with beans bruschetta.  Delicious.  Between the four of us (one drank beer...he was the designated driver), we ordered a bottle of red and a bottle of white.  With our deal we had a choice of 3 whites and 3 reds. We went with the chardonnay and the cabernet.  The wine guy here is awesome!  Friendly, and well, perfect service! I LOVED that he gave each of us wine drinkers a glass for the red and a glass for the white and served them at the same time, so WE could choose what went best with which foods.  He presented wine the "proper" way without it feeling stuffy and pretentious.  Truly memorable! And we liked both of them very much.\n\n    We were brought two kinds of bread with a pea puree/pesto type spread that was light and delicious, topped off with a nice quality olive oil.  Both breads were excellent...one of which was a sundried tomato focaccia...  the other was just a good basic bread that was probably my favorite.\n\n    For our deal menu, we had our choice between three first courses, four seconds, and two desserts.  We two gals went with the blue crab ravioli, the stuffed trout, and the peach daiquiri dessert.  Guys went with the bolognese tagliatelle and, the steak dish, and the panna cotta dessert.\n\n   I wish their website was working tonight (it hasn\'t been working all day), or I would quote accurate descriptions of these amazing dishes, but let me just say that they were all PERFECT, fresh, and amazing!  I have had trout at The Mint in Raleigh that was flat-out awful.  This trout was unbelievably good! It was stuffed with spinach and onions and fontina and cooked to perfection. The white asparagus with it was just the right texture with a nice tangy balsamic that went so well with the rich fish.  I\'ve never cared for fish skin before but this was crispy and beyond delicious.  I tell you, this chef needs to go on Chopped or Iron Chef, and please let me be a judge!  I could go on and on, but I wasn\'t the only one happy. We ALL were.  The bolognese was full of flavor and the homemade pasta was cooked perfectly al dente..loved the little spice kick to it. Ravioli with fava beans...rich and a very generous serving...the tomatoes in the dish were the perfect sweet/acidic addition.  Guys LOVED their steaks. I managed to steal a tiny taste before I was almost stabbed with a fork (just kidding).  It was GREAT.  They all raved about the mushrooms (I don\'t do mushrooms, so I can\'t relate), and the side dish was a green creamy delicious treat that I cannot properly describe nor properly name.\n\n    Coffee...excellent.  Dessert...again, very good. The peach one was a little parfait glass layered with creamy, fruity goodness, served next to a "rum baba".  Uh, what?  It was a small dinner roll that had supposedly been soaked in rum? It wasn\'t overpowering though, so all I know was, it was good cut up and put in the dish with the creamy fruit.  The panna cotta with blueberry sauce was also good, with a crunchy cookie type topping.\n\n   Now, not only was service excellent, but we never even had to show our discount "postcard".  The discount was taken off our bill automatically.  Even with a more than twenty percent tip that we happily paid, this dinner was well under $100 for two.  \n\n    We will not only be back, but will continue to rave about this meal for a long time!', 'pos'), ("They are very efficient and quick.  They have a yummy menu and daily specials.  AND they're only $5 for a really filling lunch!  \n\nHappy happy belly.  Happy happy wallet.", 'pos'), ('I stopped in for a quick bite and a brew and was not disappointed.  They have about 20 or so drafts on tap and a laundry list of great beers in a bottle.  When I say great beers, I am talking about often hard to find microbrews from across the country.  I had a spicy lamb burger with fries with my beer and it was gone in seconds.  Delicious.', 'pos'), ("Came here last Friday after hearing great word of mouth. \nBacaro is a cute little wine bar/restaurant, and it's a much-needed addition to the USC neighborhood. I liked the ambiance a lot - dark walls, dim lighting, and tiny tables make for an intimate atmosphere that encourages lots of wine drinking and stimulating conversation... or at least that's what I gathered from the groups sitting around us. \n\nThe food, however, is just okay. I recommend the bruschette with garlic-something.. I forget the name. I also loved the Bacaro burger (definitely go with the egg on top!) and this one Belgian blonde beer I had.  The scallops were tasty, but the sauce was too powerful, and there were only two pieces. The hangar steak, though, took FOREVER to cook, and was a little too salty. And the bread pudding was.. okay. \n\nOverall, I'd come back here for happy hour... but I feel like this is a place you go to primarily for wine, not food.", 'pos'), ("The Press is a quant and delightful restaurant located 20 feet past a bar filled with Claremont College potential hypsters and what passes for Inland Empire Trust Fund Babies. Once you are past the bar you enter the Press. It's fair food, a mixture of organic, fresh made and few take home leftovers due to the abundance of classic comfort foods with a hearty twist.\n\nJust remember it's just past the douche bags at the bar.", 'pos'), ("Despite what others write, Dr. king did one hell of a surgury on my knee. Had a torn acl and its been 6 months and Im almost at 80% to fully recovering. And that's even after I ditched out of PT after 3 weeks. Dr king is nit there to butter things up for you. very blunt and direct about the diagnosis which is how'all Dr should be. This is my 3rd acl, but first with King. My prior acls took longer to just get me where I'm at after 6 Months\nThank you Dr King", 'pos'), ('This place does not need a long review.  Get in line (it moves fast), order a tri-tip sandwich, a basket of fries, a side of ranch, and an extra side of barbecue sauce.  DO NOT skip the tri-tip sandwich.  I seriously believe that it might be the best beef sandwich in the world...yes, the world.  I want one right now.', 'pos'), ('If you dare, venture off the chili side of the menu and try out their "Grilled Chicken Club."  It\'s one of the best sandwiches of any kind I\'ve ever had anywhere!  I\'ve gotten several Chili Parlor regulars to try it for the first time and they have all agreed that it\'s amazingly good.  The triple decker bread is always toasted just right, the grilled chicken breast is always tender and juicy, the bacon always crispy, the cheese tasty, and the lettuce, tomato, and mayonnaise fresh and delicious!  This sandwich basically is a work of art.  And the TCP cooks are very consistent in the way they make it, so you never have to worry about getting a bad one.  Try it.  You\'ll LOVE it.', 'pos'), ("I never found myself really craving burgers until I came here with a friend; now Uburger is now my number one all beef patties, special sauce, lettuce, cheese, pickles, onion on a (non) sesame seed bun destination in Boston.  Even the plain hamburger is full of flavor and moist, like the ideal backyard grill burger.  Customization options are pretty much endless.  Prices seem high if you're comparing them to McDonald's or Burger King, but in the context of other Boston sandwich shops, they're right in line.  (Besides which, if you're in the mood for a really great hamburger and you run across the street to McDonald's just to save a few bucks, you're abusing your tastebuds, and the state WILL come and take them away until you learn to be a better caretaker.)  My only real complaint is the forgettable fries -- crispy and fresh, but no real flavor.  If you're doing takeout, this is where the the trip to McDonald's is perfectly justifiable.  Uburger does have a pretty nice dining area boasting a bigscreen TV, but its proximity to BU and Fenway could see it fill up fast...", 'pos'), ("Yeah, you can get a sub in a lot of places but it won't be a Neal's Deli sub. Really good eats and part of the Neal family food dynasty.", 'pos'), ("Coming from California, this is the first place my hosts took me to try Texas BBQ as they say it's one of the best around.  I think they're right.  The servers give you a lot of food and all the meats are flavorful and savory.  I'll definitely come back here again when I'm in town.", 'pos'), ("Just like any other IHOP A little cleaner than some i been to. Our waitress was a little confused we would ask for things and she would walk right by us and set it on a another table to have them tell her it didn't belong to them. it was funny to watch her walk by and come back about four times.", 'pos'), ("Sunday Brunch:\n\nI went it at 10am (when it opens). There was only one other group there at the time so seating wasn't an issue. The place seems to be fairly low key Sunday mornings (or at least this morning). Waiter was awesome; very friendly and attentive. The layout is pretty open so even on a full day it wouldn't be crammed (common complaint for some brunch places).   \n\nI ordered the Go Green! egg-white Scramble (basil-marinated portobella / fried green tomatoes / fresh mozzarella / basil cashew pesto) and my friend got the Kathy Bates Bennie (Eggs benedict that consists of 2 crispy oat waffles, fried green tomatoes, poached eggs,  hollandaise-of course-and avocado smash). Portions were very generous. Eating buddy loved his eggs benedict. I had a bite myself and they were yummy. I liked my scramble as well. Sweet potato latkas were good; very comfort food-like. My only critique was the amount of liquid in my plate. I'm guessing cooking with that much veggies, some fluid comes out but it made the eggs a little wetter than I would have liked (mostly an issue towards the end of the meal). It was all still delicious but definitely would have liked less water. The excess water could have also accounted for the egg tasting a bit bland. To be fair, I love salty so I am very sensitive to food that is under-salted even a tad. \n\nAnyway I would certainly come back! I really would like to try a waffle next time (got my eye on the sweet cinnamon waffle with nutella ice cream). We both enjoyed our brunch and its very chill ambiance provided an ideal place for my college friend and I to catch up on life.", 'pos'), ("We go for the atmosphere prices and to support the local economy. One of the things you should definitely do if you're in the Troy area on a Saturday. We go there every now and then, but not regularly, but the food is okay, actually good ! Love the free samples they're always good.!!\nSupport the farmers market they have a good thing going.!!!", 'pos'), ("3 people can easily feast off of the steamed seafood platter. It was generously laden with snow crab legs, oysters, clams, mussels, shrimp, sausage, and potatoes. \n\nI liked the cornmeal dusted fried oysters. Very generous serving. Share the fried oyster basket as an appetizer for a group of 4 or more. \n\nThe gumbo wasn't that great--spicy but rather tasteless at the same time.", 'pos'), ("Went to see William santana after a recommend from a friend. He did a really good job with my brown hair, taking it to a natural looking blonde. He did a whole head of highlights blending in my natural color with two other shades of blonde. The results were very natural and pretty and my sensitive scalp was never subject to burning from harsh chemicals. Go see William if you want good color at a reasonable price. He's worth it.", 'pos'), ("I LOVE this place. I'm a north campus major and I live in Palms, so I usually have no business what-so-ever to be by Ackerman. But, there's something about those Udon noodles (subbed with the lemon chicken broth and extra seaweed) that lures me that way. It's so light and filling! LOVE it!", 'pos'), ("Rynae has been cutting my hair for over 12 years, and she is the best.  Value for money, hands down, World Cuts is the place to get your hair cut for under $20.  There's nothing cheap about the quality or breadth of services, it's really only the cost that she keeps low.  \n\nRynae is one of the friendliest business owners you'll ever meet, and she always makes time for anyone who steps foot in her salon.  \n\nThis place gets busy though (with reason), so I'd recommend coming in no later than 11AM Mon - Sat if you want to avoid the wait.  \n\nAs a bonus - she validates parking in the nearby lot on Durant, so no need to circle around looking for street spots ever...", 'pos'), ("Yes, the meat area is kind of bloody and picking up any given package will coat your hand in various meat fluids. Yes, the decor is a little lacking. Yes, you're not allowed to take the cart to your car. All of these things lead to 3 not 5 stars. But, two words make up for all of this....La Yogurt. That's right, they sell guava and mango flavored yogurt. In 6 packs. There are also plenty of plantain chips, various nectars and wafer cookies that come in dulce de leche flavor. Basically, the latin food section kicks ass. Everything else is kind of blah, although the prices are right. Too bad this is so far from my apartment...but it makes for a good side trip when visiting the local IKEA.", 'pos'), ("If you like Chinese food, you need to try this place.  It is amazing.  The pan-fried pork pot stickers, the sizzling rice soup, the chow mein with homemade noodles, kung pao chicken, mongolian beef, every dish has been outstanding.  They use fresh ingredients, they cook them extremely well, the flavors are wonderful, and the service is just amazing.  I've never been to a restaurant before when they remembered my name after only one visit.  I can't wait to return.  This is the kind of restaurant that makes you want to move into the neighborhood, maybe next door!", 'pos'), ("Went here with a friend a few weeks ago.\n\nWas blown away by all of the little sweets they have here. Really has a great mom & pop vibe.\n\nHad the Elvis ice cream. The King would have loved it (banana ice cream with peanut butter swirls) and so did I.\n\nOne word of warning: GET THE JUNIOR SIZE. They fill the cup and then put another scoop on top of it, so you're probably getting 2-3 scoops worth of ice cream in it.", 'pos'), ("Even though I always eat dinner till I'm about to pop, there's ALWAYS room for desserts. So after I finished my bowl at Flamebroiler right across the street, I slowly and carefully made my way to Diddy Riese, just like a pregnant woman at her 9 months :)\n\nI was soooo excited because I've had sOOo many failed attempts of waiting in line for about 10 minutes and then not having enough patience to wait any longer. But this time I had a much stronger determination, especially because I was on a low-carb diet the week before and I was FEINDING for sweets!\n\nAs I was jumping up and down in anticipation while waiting in line, I was also deciding which combo to get. The choice is TWO different cookies and an ice cream flavor. After about 20 minutes of flipping back and forth between different flavors, I finally settled on a original chocolate chip cookie, chocolate white chocolate chip cookie, with mint chocolate chip ice cream. It was quite a risky choice, I'd have to say myself, but I wasn't disappointed! ESPECIALLY because it was only a buck fifty!! woohoo\n\nIn an ideal world if nutrition didn't matter and only calories did, and if I had to choose a single place to eat at everyday as a homeless person, it'd be diddy reise, because I swear, it's wayyy cheaper than a MickeyD's meal! DIDDY REISE FTW! :D", 'pos'), ('I went to this place for the first time with a amazon local deal and it was great! I think that i got a better massage here than at the last place that I went to for a regular massage.  It says that it is a foot massage place, but they work out practically the whole body.  Very relaxing and great on the tight muscles.  Loved it. Even though it is a bit out of my way, I will probably go again even without the voucher!', 'pos'), ("Tealuxe is to tea as Starbucks is to coffee. It has a commercial retail shop feel, has tea accessories for sale, a limited amount of food for sale, and a wide variety of choices for dried plants to be steeped in hot water. If you like tea, this outfit is one of the better of the limited tea options in Providence, but so far I haven't experienced anything special here.", 'pos'), ("Met up with a buddy here yesterday to get some practice games in before the National Scrabble Championships beginning next weekend.\n\nI only had a large chai tea. Sweetened, which I like, but a bit on the sugary side (works for me, maybe not for everybody). Next time I come here, I'll try some food - prices seemed fair.\n\nThe inside is pretty dark, and the front room can get pretty sunny (and hot!), so if you're hanging out in the afternoon, you may find yourself moving inside.\n\nBut yeah, a fun option all in all - I'll return!\n\nAs an aside, it's also a nice change from having to drive through downtown Berkeley.", 'pos'), ("I love going here on my lunch breaks from work.  The store has a wide selection, helpful staff, and is very nicely maintained.  I, too, would like it if there was somewhere to sit and read but, as the store is limited in size, can't really complain about that.  My favorite part? The used section downstairs.  It is extensive and the prices are fantastic for books that for the most part look as though they haven't even been read.  If you enjoy bookstores this isn't one to miss!", 'pos'), ('Good, fast and affordable. One of the better places to get cheap Thai food in the area.', 'pos'), ('Price and boba balls\n\nSuper cheap and great for college students who need that caffeine or just sugar rush during those laggy days\n\nYummmm, flavored sweet and chewy boba balls. Awesome texture.', 'pos'), ('Hands down the best brunch in town! Their lunch and dinner isn\'t as phenomenal, however (I learned that pretty early on during my undergrad career dining here). Definitely expect a wait if you\'re going on a morning during the weekend! Depending on the amount of people in your party it can be anywhere from 20-40 minutes. \n\nTheir best dishes are the Salmon Bruschetta, the Molettes, and the Spanish Frittata. If you come early enough, they might still have some of their delicious scratch-made biscuits left for you (they run out quickly)! Their potatoes that come with any of "Our Old Favorites" choices are also great, and if you decide to go for an omelet, don\'t worry - they don\'t skimp out on the fillings you choose! My boyfriend recently had their Tofu Scramble as well and he loved it. While you\'re paying your bill at the register, don\'t forget to snag some of the freshly-baked desserts at the counter baked from Bollos Cafe down the street! \n\nI\'ve been a loyal Gillies fan for the past 5 years and haven\'t been disappointed. I hope you join the fanclub soon! :)', 'pos'), ("Very healthy earthy crunchy kind of place. I ordered off the kids menu and got the tomato cheddar sandwich, it was quite tasty. The cheddar has a very rich full flavor. We also had the chickpea sandwich which was basically a falafel sandwich, it was okay, nothing to write home about. \n\nThey don't serve regular soda, so I had to go down the street to get a coke. If you walk down the street to get a coke, you should also get a bag of chips. I had some cape cod chips and they went with the sandwich really well!", 'pos'), ("First, the good.  Plenty of space.  We had a room to ourselves in the front.   The beer and wine, while nothing fancy, wasn't outrageous.    \n\nHowever, I measure a chinese restaurant by its lo mein, and Jade Palace didn't measure up.  Somewhat tasteless, not very filling, and for veggie lo mein, very light on the veggies.   Service was okay. \n\nI really wanted to like Jade Palace.  I really did.  Friends with great taste recommended it as the place in Chapel Hill to get chinese.  I'll give Jade Palace one more chance case, before I seek out someplace else.", 'pos'), ("I love this place.  Pod was one of my favorite restaurants to go to in Philly and is a great place to take out of town friends.  The martinis are all very tasty and reasonably priced.  The sushi is a little expensive, but is extremely good.  I also really enjoyed the salads and soups here.  They have a conveyor belt sushi bar where you can sit and pick individual rolls as they move by.  \n\nThe vibe there is really great - they have rooms that light up in different colors and generally your table/chairs have lights in them as well.  There is usually Cowboy Bebop or something similar playing on the TV behind the sushi bar and they have great happy hour specials.\n\nIt sometimes gets overrun with Penn students, but if you call ahead and make a reservation you won't have to worry about waiting very long.  The only downside is parking nearby which can be difficult, particularly on the weekends.", 'pos'), ('Dr. Alan Wittgrove saved my life!  His team, Tracy, are all remarkable people!  This Bariatric Center is only place you can come & not be told "Sorry we don\'t know what is wrong with you"  go for another test, and another test.  This Dr. can take you into surgery, fix someones mistake, put you back together the right way!  PLUS, the support group once month is FREE, they do this as part of living & leading a  righteous life.  Following the change of life, changed my life & I am over 10 years, doing well, & so thankful for Dr. Wittgrove & Tracy for saving my life!\nLoreen', 'pos'), ("I was never a pack-a-day person but there was a time when I veered dangerously close. I also had a cigarette-obsessed roommate for two years who had me try all sorts of brands and lectured me about all the nuances in tobacco. In one ear and out the other (though I'm sure I still have some in my lungs).\n\nMaison Edwards is pretty awesome even for the quitter. Super old-timey and cozy. A place to smoke a pipe and stroke your mustache. There are almost always people sitting in the two seats inside just smoking away. Whiling away the hours of the day. I wouldn't mind having that ritual. \n\nThe lady behind the counter is also almost always smoking cigarettes. Good to know she knows her merch. And she does. They have a huge selection of loose rolling tobacco and you tell her what you're looking for, she'll find it. They also have a nice selection of lighters (from bics to really really nice $200 classy-as-hell fire givers). \n\nEven though I have experience with tobacco the overall air of the place is obscured by a veil of untouchable expertise. Clerks aren't snobby here, don't get me wrong. But the social ambience is kind of intimidating. Partly because there is a kind of exuded l'ennui (more like the seasoned boredom kind than the woe-is-me kind).\n\nReady for the nit-picking? For a specialty store, I kind of want to see some seriously rare imported cigarettes. Like I want to see my Mexican Ovalados (er, I'm missing a letter or two there) or some Russian harsh-cancer-in-a-stick. I know importing, especially cigarettes and alcohol, is absolutely nuts. And maybe the laws are in part to blame. But I want to be wowed.\n\nFor loose rolling tobacco this place can't be beat. For earthy and old-timey ambience, this place can't be beat. Service could be a little more welcoming and selection could be more exotic.", 'pos'), ('Best. Burger. Ever. The only reason I did not give this 5 stars is because the atmosphere was a tad too stuffy for me. They pride themselves on great service and you definitely get that, but sometimes a too attentive staff can be a turn-off for me. I felt a little weird ordering the burger, but I had read such good reviews about their burger that I just had to try it. It literally melted in my mouth. I do wish it came with better fries (other than "shoe string fries") - how about sweet potato fries, no??? We ordered a tuna sashimi appetizer that was delicious - LOVE the spicy asian sauce layered underneath the sliced avocado. I was pleasantly surprised by the portion for the sashimi appetizer, then again it was approx $17 so maybe it was about right. Although pricey, the food is well worth the money. Even the bread basket was fantastic!', 'pos'), ("I WILL DEFINITELY BE GOING BACK! I went to Kika Tapas with some friends on Friday after work. We were seated in a comfy round booth. The tapas, sangria, atmosphere and service were all excellent. I really liked the Patatas Bravas, Camarones a la Plancha, Berenjena Rellena and a special of the night that's named something I can't remember (it was a roll of steak, stuffed with a mushroom, cheese, spinach, blend). Our server was friendly, attentive and remained patient with a challenging group of women who had quite a bit of the delicious Sangria Royal, which is a red sangria with cava and Grand Marnier. DELICIOUS!", 'pos'), ("I was really impressed with the service provided by Burden Busters.  Not only were my offices professionally maintained, but this is the first company that stands behind their satisfaction guaranteed policy.  unbeknownst  to me, the owner of the company came out to personally survey the services rendered.  Workers were always on time and polite.  Being a former Marine, I was utterly impressed and overwhelmed with their personal appearance. \n\nKeep up the good work,\n\nLivingston's Auto Glass", 'pos'), ('Guess what people, you roll the slice up and consume, did you see the illustrations on the wall above the order counter?  I guess when in Rome, some people like to think they are still at home.  \n\nWe ate at Antico tonight for the first time.  My wife and daughter were there waiting at the community table having already ordered.  Probably around 6:30pm when I arrived and joined them.  I was immediately struck by the interior.  Lots of great things to look at everywhere.  San Marzano\'s stacked in one corner, huge pizza ovens in the back, delicious desserts in the front, etc.  I was completely ready for this experience.  I knew that this place was not going to be "hand and foot" and I was going to have to do some work, no problem for me.  \n\nThe pizza arrived as we enjoyed conversations with other patrons at the large community table.  Everyone was interested in helping each other enjoy their experience offering tid-bits of knowledge and advice.  We got the sausage and sweet hot peppers pizza (name escapes me at the moment) and let me say from dough to tomato, HANDS DOWN THE BEST PIZZA I have had in a long while.  To boot, there are little bowls of goodness all around the table: fresh chopped garlic, shredded parm, whole peppers (hot and sweet), etc.  I would say the dough was delicious down to the last bite.  I yearned for each bite, eating like an animal, only stopping to breathe and smile.\n\nBring your own booze.  They are a work in progress and when my wife asked about salads they mentioned that they might have something in the near future.  I can only wait and see.', 'pos'), ('This place is pretty delicious. I always get the Steamed Vermicelli with Rice Paper Wrap with prawns. Besides being a bit crowded, great for dinner', 'pos'), ("This is my favorite place in the world. Atmosphere, service, prices, food, drinks - It's all top notch!!", 'pos'), ("The Harvard Book Store is excellent.  They have a massive selection of almost every kind of book.  I particularly enjoy their art and architecture sections which provides a decent  assortment of titles.  And don't forget the used book and remainder section downstairs!  Pretty good selection there as well and it will save you a bunch of money.\r\n\r\nWatch out for the fact that the used book portion in the basement has different hours than the regular store.", 'pos'), ('The overall rating of this place is very misleading and unfair.\nSome of the reviews here are about at&t and have nothing to do with this location.\nWhich is very stupid to say the least. Now to talk about [', 'pos'), ("Carvel ice cream is always very nice - rich and creamy soft serve. I swear they've got something magical in those machines.\n\nBut, it's not something I go out of my way for. Carvel is a bit pricier than your average ice cream (with good reason, don't get me wrong, like I said thems is some tasty cones), but if I'm in the area on a hot day and want ice cream, Carvel is my likeliest choice.", 'pos'), ("The Red Light location in the U-District is quite a bit smaller than the one in Capitol Hill. They still offer a great selection of items.\n\nPARKING: Street parking. This is in the core retail section of Broadway on the Hill. This is paid parking with the City of Seattle meters. This just down the street from the Metro Clothing Company, Buffalo Exchange, and Goodwill, so it's not a waste of money if you're looking for a shopping spree.\n\nSELECTION/CONSISTENCY: Naturally, the selection is dependent on what they are able to buy from people off the street. For the most part, they are consistently solid in being able to product a fine selection of old school clothing.\n\nPRICING: Vintage store prices, don't expect to buy items at thrift store prices. Some of the higher priced items are cheaper than what you'd find on Craiglist. I consistently see this when looking at their Pendleton jackets.\n\nSERVICE: They have a friendly staff. I've purchased an item at the other location and was able to exchange it here; I thought that was a big plus.", 'pos'), ('I have found a few perfect gifts that no other stores can match for my friends and my family. You can find something very awesome as a gift for the baby showers, just look for the baby toys section. Trust me on that!!!!!', 'pos'), ("i loved loved loved going to school here. loved it. i'd go back in a heartbeat. \n\nyes, it was hard as hell, but so damn worth every second. \n\n20 random things i loved/miss about cal\n\n1. go bears\n2. alex fillipenko, astro 10\n3. alan dundes, folklore\n4. football saturdays\n5. late afternoons in the spring when you watch the sun set over campus\n6. polisci 179 lecture series class\n7. asian ghetto\n8. late night kingpin and dollar rice\n9. ac transit and functional university bus service\n10. 642-walk\n11. 24hr libraries\n12. camaraderie\n13. sproul\n14. the daily cal\n15. the octet and overtones\n16. smart alecs\n17. social consciousness\n18. actually running into people you know on a campus of 30k students\n19. the sociology dept. the whole sociology dept.\n20. the affordable tuition for the best damn school there is\n\ngo bears!", 'pos'), ("Third time I've dined in, and I've had excellent service each and every time. Carlos, our server is incredibly courteous and is on point when it comes to timing (refills, ordering, checkups). The food is just as fantastic! My friend had the Philly cheesesteak (minus the Philly! Lol) and I had the pizza and salad...so good!! Tarantinos is quickly becoming my favorite!", 'pos'), ('They\'re not the cheapest gas downtown but they have the best selection of "stuff".  You can generally find whatever oddball snack, etc that you want on their shelves and it isn\'t all bottom-of-the-barrel quality (they have a pretty diverse Pringles selection).  The place is clean and the staff is friendly.  No complaints.', 'pos'), ("The girls and I were in the mood for something on the light side and something that screamed Western Mass. since we were on a day trip in the area.  This definitely seemed like a hippie/left wing/college hangout kind of joint.  Check out the chalkboard by the bathroom if you don't believe me.  The owners/staff are not Republicans in any manner.  \n\nI ordered a really delicious, yet very large spinach salad.  This was a tad on the expensive side for lunch but I was thankful for the day-old brioche, which I bought at half-price and it was still delicious. My friends ordered sandwiches and enjoyed them.  The seating area is kind of small so be sure to grab a table quickly after ordering.   I loved the acoustic swing band.  More restaurants should have live bands play.  \n\nThe desserts looked amazing but we didn't order anything.  I'd like to return  just for pastries.", 'pos'), ('#1 tacos al pastor in so-cal, hands down.', 'pos'), ("The service is mediocre and the ambiance is lacking. The prices are a little higher than I'd like to pay, but the naan is great and the tikka masala is out of this world. The basmati rice is perfect and the flavors in the tikka masala (which I usually get with chicken, which is always cooked to perfection) are delightful. I don't think I've tried anything else here because I'm so obsessed with this dish. Om nom nom.", 'pos'), ("Concluded my week long stay in SD with two nights here. Alyssa was extremely helpful and answered any questions I had. The room was very spacious. They also honored my request to have extra pillows and towels there upon check in. Having 7 pillows on a king sized bed all to yourself is great! The small attention to detail--from the garage attendants addressing me by name, to when the bell desk employee gave me a shipping form when he saw that I was carrying a FedEx box, made for an enjoyable experience. You don't have to be an Elite member (which I found out I was to my surprise) to expect this type of treatment. The service from the staff here is impeccable. Love this hotel!", 'pos'), ("The owner of this delicious chocolate shop has learned from the absolute best chocolate makers in the world--and he's incredibly passionate about chocolate.  Chat with him and he'll give you the history of chocolate and why his is so vastly different (and I must say, eons better) than many other chocolatiers.  His chocolate has more than 70% cocoa (most of American chocolate is about 6%), making it rich, creamy, and healthy with many antioxidants.  It's well worth the $$ spent.  Their truffles are truly amazing, you can't go wrong with your choice.", 'pos'), ('This spot is great reminds me of other coffee shops in (Tryst) DC, and NY.. Always felt a good vibe of this spot.. As a coffee shop it does more than required.. (Location,Coffee, Food/Lunch, Liquor, Free WiFi,  and a really cool staff).. As a bar/ lounge. 4****. \n\n  I DJ\'d at Octane for there 5 year anniversary,  as well as a few other events and killed it. The crowd was \'going in"..(Slang: having extreme fun) lol.. They started on a great note and only moved up the ladder.. Whenever in ATL. This is one of my fav spot.', 'pos'), ('so convenient and close to campus, hangouts, and shops!!!\n\ntheir briyani is really spicy.... but i like to eat it anyways\nfood is prepared very fast\ni usually get water, chicken briyani, naan, and chicken tikka masala, and raita', 'pos'), ("The Good:\n  :: location. it's near campus and near Hyde Park\n  :: hours. they have good hours open for business\n  :: selection of frames. my god. they have so many frames it's fantastic! these are frames you would actually want to buy, too, not junk frames. range from very conservative to very stylish\n  :: optometrist was nice and pleasant to deal with\n  :: employees were friendly\n  :: contact lenses came in fast\n\nThe Bad:\n  :: one employee didn't do a good job of running one of my eye tests, but the optometrist redid the test himself\n\nThe Ugly:\n  :: none.\n\nWould I go back?  Definitely.  This place is a great location, a good optometrist, and a great selection of frames. \n\nThis place is IN.", 'pos'), ('The food here is always outstanding. A great cross between comfort and and creative foods.  The service is also always friendly. I will say, this is a great place to go on an expense account.', 'pos'), ("On a chilly day in San Francisco, I wish I could take a quick flight to Ann Arbor to enjoy Le Dog's soups. During the winter I would come here once to twice a week since I worked less than 1 minute away. I mistakenly asked if the soup is good when I meant to ask which soup is better. The guy in the back loudly said something along the lines of not making soup that is bad. Very true. I feel like I have tried all of the soups and they are all excellent!", 'pos'), ("PRO: FREE ADMISSION ON the FIRST TUESDAY OF EVERY MONTH There are A LOT of stuff to see. \n\nCON: Parking is $8 no matter what. Some of the exhibits might be boring. Little kids shrieking and the parents that don't do anything about it.  \n\nI came to the Natural History Museum to relive some of my childhood memories. I remember coming here with during my elementary and middle school days. Most of the exhibits are the same, and there are still some exhibits that I get bored at (stuffed birds, fossils, rocks/gems/stones). The only exhibit I liked was the live bugs they had there. \n\nFirst Tuesdays of every month is FREE ADMISSION for everyone, but parking isn't. It cost about 8 dollars to park. Seeing how this is next to USC, most of the street parking is taken. \n\nThere are a bunch of little annoying kids here (today when I visited) that likes to scream, and most of the parents don't try to calm them down. \n\nThis place is alright I guess. It's not a good place to take good pictures though. Everything is behind glass and you get a lot of glare of the lights. \n\nThe Museum of Science and Industry is next to this place so if you get bored here, just head on over. It's free on the first Tuesday of every month as well. \n\nI won't came back here for a while, even if it's free.", 'pos'), ('Great new place in the (poor) Ithaca culinary landscape. While the dinner menu is relatively uninspiring, the brunch menu is creative and full of southwestern flavors. I personally tried the "Del Mar" fish tacos, and the huevos rancheros - both above average. The grits was delicious as well.\nDesserts are tasty and well-made (I suggest the pineapple upside-down cake). Good wine and drinks list.\n\nThe restaurant interiors are nice, with a modern yet traditional feeling (it seems to be in Colorado rather than in Ithaca!). I give the place 4 and not 5 stars because the service is somewhat slow and sloppy - I am sure this will improve with time and with more training.\n\nA happy new discovery!', 'pos'), ('It was a novel and fun experience eating in the kitchen, but for all the hype, the pizza was just okay.', 'pos'), ("Any time between 5-7, you'll most likely have to wait outside for 10 minutes, but no longer. They'll take your order before you're seated, and your food usually arrives moments after you sit down. Certainly not a place to take a friend or colleague to have a conversation, but a good place to swing by for a quick eat. The portions are large for the low cost, but the quality lacks. Unless you're a Thai expert, however, I doubt you'll notice. They're heavy on the grease and sauce, but hey, it's FILLING!\n\nOverall, it's a fun experience - or great takeout (I would estimate over half their business is takeout). Give it a shot for a $10 meal!", 'pos'), ('Best haircut of my life!!! \n\nI initially walked into this salon because I had received a coupon from them.  The Salon was very clean and the people who worked there were very nice. As soon as I entered the receptionist asked if I would like something to drink. \n\nThey set me up with Keri for a haircut. At first I was super nervous because I have yet to walk away from a haircut with a good feeling. I am very happy to say that Keri gave me the best hair cut ever! She made sure that I was 100% happy with the end result - and I was.  \n\nShe listened to what I wanted - and executed it perfectly. One thing that really stood out to me is that normally when I tell a stylist that I feel like my hair is flat on top they usually just recommend product for adding volume. She actually cut my hair in a way that I had never seen before to add instant volume. \n\nAlthough I no longer live in San Diego I will definitely make the trip just to go get my hair cut by her. \n\nMake sure to make your appointment well in advance because the last time I called she was booked for a whole month! Definitely worth the trip and the money :-)', 'pos'), ("We went up to chili's on a nondescript saturday evening.\n\nI'll have to say that initially I didn't really feel overly-jazzed about this place. We walk in, and it's more of a convenience store than a restaurant. \n\nWe order from a short menu (one page) and wait for the food to arrive. Service over-all was fast. The gal that helped us was somewhat pushy in a motherly sort of way, semi-scolding me when I was unable to make nary a dent in my gigantic meal. Apparently on the weekends you get all of the sides, instead of choosing just one of the three.\n\nI felt the food left something to be desired, my lamb curry dish being chock FULL of cardamom and my dining companion turning four shades ranging from light peach to crimson red from some sort of spice on/in the green beans.\n\nWith all of that being said, if you're a starving college student this place dishes HUGE portions and the food is hearty; and we only spent 25 on a full two course meal including dessert.\n\nI would only go here again to get the takeout, because for whatever reason the food seemed to be more delicious the second time.", 'pos'), ('6 buck clay pot bibimbop... Who could you not love that?', 'pos'), ("I have been here twice so far, and both times the service was excellent!  \n\nI got in within 10 minutes of arriving each time (granted both times were in the middle of a Monday, so maybe not rush hours).  The doctor listened to all of my symptoms and then came up with his diagnosis and explained to me what I could expect, what I should do at home and then what to do if it doesn't get better.  I really appreciated that he didn't just throw antibiotics at me and throw my out the door like many doctors do.  He took the time to explain everything and offered to write my a prescription of antibiotics if my illness didn't get better on its own within a few days, but left it up to me.\n\nThis is such a convenient location and they have great hours.\n\nThere is a parking lot that is open during the day at least around back, and if you pay for your ticket at the front desk they give you a dollar off I believe.  \n\nThey have urgent care hours as well as regular physician hours.", 'pos'), ("Amazing crepes!\n\nMy wife and I love this place.  We often stop by and try different crepes, my favorite has to be the Russian blintz and her's is the Nutella and banana.  I highly recommend getting a Cafe Au-Lait with your crepe.  \n\nNo complaints about this cozy little creperie.", 'pos'), ("The California Froyo cup (smallest) doesn't have a cap. This sucked for my togo order. \n\nThis is a great place more reasonably priced froyo with great taste. \nThe toppings counter is also nice even though some of it is a little hard to get to.\n\nMy 2.9 year old and I enjoyed CherryOnTop very much.", 'pos'), ("Were it not for the Bent Spoon, many a Princeton graduate student might have shriveled up and died in their lab basements and cubicles. It's one of those saving graces of the local Princeton town (that number can be counted on one hand) and can motivate one to push through a day of work.\n\nI personally buy a scoop so I can taste the variety of flavors first. Some memorable ones: Earl grey tea-- it's novel to have the taste of tea in a cold, non-liquified texture. Honeydew-- smoother than eating melon itself. Sorbets of all sorts, especially their blood orange-- sweet and tangy and cooling. Pistachio-- it's so potently pistachioey, it's more like the essence of pistachio, as if you took that filmic skin of pistachio, compressed it, and turned it into ice cream.\n\nIt's a  fun game to walk into the store and guess what flavors they'll have for the day. Even more fun is getting a free scoop after you've finished off your punch card!", 'pos'), ('T.G.I. Friday\'s used to have one of the better happy hours in the general UCSD area, but ever since switching to the new Sunday and bar only specials, there isn\'t much point for students to go to enjoy some good deals on appetizers and drinks after a late night of studying or for their friends\' birthdays.  This particular trip was inspired by a friends\' birthday celebration and was a throwback to our old student days.\n\nFeeling a bit hungrier than just an appetizer, I decided to go with the Cheesy Bacon Cheeseburger.  Accompanied by a "Snakebite", this combination makes for the classic burger and beer combo.  The burger was pretty tasty and moist, but what makes this burger unique is its inclusion of a sliced of fried provolone cheese.  You would expect that it be kind of melted, but it was sort of just a solid patty of fried cheese.  It was OK, but definitely not what I expected.  I found the fries to be disappointingly over seasoned as well.\n\nTurning away their core demographic is a silly move in an attempt to increase profits.  Even sitting at the bar level doesn\'t count toward their happy hour specials and only applies if you sit at the bar itself.  As a student, Friday\'s used to be one of my favorite comfort places, but it has since lost most of its personality and charm.  Hopefully they decide bring back their old specials and Friday\'s can once again win back its core customers.\n\nFood: 7/10\n\nService: 6/10\n\nPrice: $$\n\nAtmosphere: 6/10', 'pos'), ('Wow. All these food critics aren\'t kidding when they say the egg salad sandwich at Euro Pane is one of the best around (it was featured on Jonathan Gold\'s list of things to eat in LA before you die, and also on the Food Network\'s "Best Thing I Ever Ate"). It really is a seriously kick-ass sandwich.\n\nNow, listen folks. I love egg salad. A lot. In all of its many forms. But there\'s something about the egg salad at Euro Pane that puts it high above the rest. Most versions of egg salad that I\'ve seen in my day are wet cement-like (albeit delicious) concoctions of diced hard boiled eggs held together with tons of mayo. The eggs in Euro Pane\'s salad are only medium boiled, giving the yolks a runnier consistency, and cut into larger chunks rather than diced or mashed. As a result, the integrity of the egg itself is kept in tact and you can really savor the egg flavor, rather than the mayo-heavy taste you get from most other versions. Add a squirt of lemon juice and some arugala on top of a couple of slices of sourdough and you\'ve got one awesome sandwich.\n\nThe egg salad alone deserves 5 stars but there are some misses here. My dining partner ordered the roasted red pepper and goat cheese sandwich which was way too heavy on the peppers and, as a result, significantly less satisfying. Also, the oft-discussed macarons were tasty enough and came in a nice assortment of flavors, but the filling could be creamier. There are better macarons out there (make a trip to NY or Vegas to visit Bouchon Bakery and see for yourself).', 'pos'), ('Oh you want a burger? But you think that food trucks are always rip offs with low quality product huh? Go to spot. Quality. Variety. Laughs and smiles. Aptly named, because this sure as hell is the spot!', 'pos'), ("been back 4-5 times.  items are hit and miss, tho dinner is much nicer than lunch i think.  great atmosphere. tofu sandwich to-go was alright but slightly overpriced for what you get.  charlie ayers says he's workin on the veggie burger a bit more, been through 12 diff versions.  what i did like was that they listen to feedback.  service is slow but they seem genuine.  and the food is fresh and thoughtfully prepared.  i'm a fan.", 'pos'), ('I went here for lunch with promises from my friend that I would be impressed and really like the place.\nHe was right.\nTheir Turkey Hoagie was so freakin good!\nThe bread was fresh, ingredients also fresh and tasty and the folks here are so friendly and polite. (A great GREAT find nowadays!)\nI will be back for more.', 'pos'), ("My bf and I finally decided to brave the long lines at Sprinkles after weeks of waiting. Turned out that we came at the perfect time because we only waited 17 minutes! Woohoo!\n\nWe ordered the Mocha, Coconut, Red Velvet, and Lemon cupcakes. All four were very tasty, though the Mocha was my least favorite because it was a tad too sweet (and this is coming from someone with the biggest sweet tooth ever). The Red Velvet is good but overrated. And the Coconut was my favorite out of all 4... highly recommend it!\n\nCan't wait to come back and try the Chai Latte and Pumpkin cupcakes. I'd give it 5 stars if this place weren't so pricey :S", 'pos'), ("Grendel's gets five starts for me just because of their half-off food happy hours.  500-730 and after 900, as long as you get one drink $3+, all food is half off, and while the food isn't spectacular, it is pretty good and cheaper than most food you can find in Harvard Square.\n\nThe place is pretty cozy, though it can get pretty crowded at times.  Our waitress was awesome.  All around good times.  It's the closest thing to a happy hour I've found here.", 'pos'), ("They aren't my favorite independent book store, but they are an independent book store. I have to keep telling myself that, every time I see people traipsing around with the Harvard Book Store logo on a sweatshop-made tote bag.  Or are there sewing machines in the back? Anyway. I really shouldn't write these reviews after I've been experimenting with hot toddy recipes. \n\nThe store has a nice used & remainder section downstairs, and good events. They sell out early, though, so check out their calendar online. Actually, check out the whole website: they do online ordering, and if you're local you can get green delivery. Or just come in and pick it up. Plenty of options. Just like with hot toddies.", 'pos'), ("Terrible food. The atmosphere can not make up for it. I was very grossed out when I ordered chicken satay and the two sauces that normally come with it were blended to make one sauce. It was the peanut sauce the cucumber palate cleanser. Totally disgusting. When it comes to fusion food it can not be done literally. I really would not waste my time coming here. You would be better off going down the street to Potbelly's then be disappointed here.", 'pos'), ('This place has a reputation as one of the best, if not the best, BBQ in Houston.  Brisket is the way to go!  Quality of the sides can vary slightly.', 'pos'), ('Ever crave pho late at night after drinking? Too bad there\'s no pho places open that late.. BUT wait there\'s noodle nation! when everyone else doesn\'t know what to eat, Be the cool guy and say "guys... 2 words, noodle nation. noodle nation" get the duck soup or boat soup. good for large groups.', 'pos'), ("In need of a caffeine infusion to get through the day? I suggest you mosey on over to the newest Coupa Cafe location and get yourself a Guayoyo. A Venezuelan latte, this cup of magic fuel kept me alert and ready for anything after I found myself drooping around 2PM. \n\nNow settled into the little coffee kiosk that used to house Moonbeans, Coupa Cafe is lively and busy. Grab a cup of Joe and go or stay for a while and study, read or chat with friends for a spell at one of the cafe's outdoor tables. The place is fast paced, enjoys a distinctly Latin spirit and the staff works hard to make sure you leave fueled up and with a spring in your step.", 'pos'), ("Yes, I understand some people have genuinely gnarly experiences at USPS's. You can't excuse bad attitude. But those who complain about slow service between 4-5pm on a Friday? What the heck do you expect? It's one of the most congested times to get anything done. It's unfortunately the only time some people have during the work week to run errands like, oh, mailing packages...and stuff!? You wouldn't write a bad review for the Bay Bridge because it was slow and CONGESTED when you chose to crawl across it at 4:30pm on a Friday, would you? Thought not. Deal with it!\n\nI had a pleasant and uneventful experience at this branch. Came on a Thursday around lunchtime, 12:30pm. One woman running the counter. She was very courteous and I saw her be patient and helpful with several customers prior to me. Including a clueless girl clutching a pile of papers wondering how to pick an envelope. Including the couple who was there just to find out how much it would cost them to mail a shit ton of stuff to Germany. Pleasant, patient, efficient, helpful. With other customers, and with me. Took me less than 10 minutes to get in and out. That's good service if you ask me. \n\nTIPS:\n\nGrab a number. Try not to yank off two or three from the roll. Wait patiently. Try not to come at peak hours (read: Friday 4-5pm). If you do, don't complain about the dang line!", 'pos'), ('best mexican food in the history', 'pos'), ("32 oz of Margarita joy. (http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?userid=GIMg5oHqsJXdRq_7tR2jjQ&select=7qjcguP1URiVpRlpOSqOow&start=0) Can I get an Amen? I've had better margaritas, but who cares?  Miranda R. and I are happy campers.\n\nOh ya I ate food too, but I came to experience drunken joy.  The food was standard fare.  I have priorities.", 'pos'), ("Carolina crossroads is one of the best restaurants in the area. The food is modern southern regional. The chefs tasting menu is usually a different style. For example, I've had southwestern and Asian (different meals). Desserts are a mixed bag. They tend to either be absolutely delicious or just okay. I recommend not going on Friday nights during the summer because they have outdoor concerts in front of the dining room. Ambience is great for dates. Service is awesome. The sommelier always has something tasty up his sleeve.", 'pos'), ('This is where I\'d eat when I was a poor undergrad and needed a quick, cheap bite. It was either this or a donut from kingpin...needless to say, I love blondie\'s. It\'s open late night too, which can be really convenient. Some people say fat slice is better - they are wrong, it is just greasier and limper. Blondie\'s serves up a nice, old fashioned slice and it is big, cheap and delicious. This isn\'t gourmet, this is BLONDIE\'S!\n\nAnd in addition, this place is definitely old school. My dad has been taking me here since I was a wee one, when he\'d walk me around campus and tell me "look, this is where you\'re going to go!" (he was right). We\'d buy our Blondie\'s pizza and eat on campus watching the college kids go by (it was weird seeing little kids doing the same with their parents when I was a student here). The crap they have hung up inside blondie\'s used to disturb me as a kid. And they still do.', 'pos'), ('I had just finished dinner and was very full. My sister on the other hand, had a hankering for ice cream. Her friend knew of a "little place" we could get some. This is how we stumbled into Full Tilt. After trying a few flavors I decided on the Coffee \'n Coffee Cake ice cream, which, doesn\'t taste much like coffee but is in fact DELICIOUS. Perfect flavor, chunks of cake....please sir may I have some more?\n\nI ordered one scoop so when the woman behind the counter (who was a riot!) gave me this heaping  helping that required several dunks into the tub I thought she misheard me and gave me two scoops.\n\nI was pleased to discover that no, she did not mishear me. Their "one scoop" is just simply that overwhelming. Bless this place. I wish there was one closer to my place, and yet, perhaps its good it\'s so far away...\n\nNeedless to say, I might have been full before the ice cream, but I was bursting after. It was a pleasant day. I will never eat Baskin Robbins again.', 'pos'), ("2 for 1 breakfast burrito Tuesdays??\n\nthose are the key words to a broke college student's ears.  And when you get it and its dripping in that nice breafkast eggs and oily sausage sauce, you can't but hold that nice plump burrito in hesitation and enjoy that first bite in SLO motion.  \n\nBut other than that breakfast burrito, I've never come here for anything else.  Is there any reason to?  \n\nAND, you can call ahead to place an order for those on the way to school and just wanted to pick it up really quick.", 'pos'), ('Such good pizza, nice service. However, it gets really busy during the lunch period (somewhere between 12-2) so cramming into a booth can be difficult sometimes. Overall, DELICIOUS.', 'pos'), ("I just moved into a 400 sq. ft. apartment with my boyfriend in the Back Bay Thus, things have to be very consolidated. I was looking for a storage unit that is very close to my location so I can easily go there to get clothing or luggage. I also needed a place that I could go in and out of easily.\n\nThis place is not only in a very neat building, but it also was really easy to rent a place here. I got a good sized place for what I needed for only $70 a month.  The place is climate controlled and even fire proof!\n\nWithin 5min I had rented a place and was already moving my stuff in. The only down side to all of this is that they don't have an auto pay system. Instead you can do direct pay, check or cash. They send a paper bill to your place which seems a little old fashioned but that's alright. Overall I've been very pleased with this storage place.", 'pos'), ("I recently commissioned three rings from Kerry Cohagen and was very pleased with the outcome.  The rings in question were an engagement and two wedding rings, very important.  Kerry listened to what we liked in terms of design and worked with us to fashion something unique and distinctly 'us'.  He used the idea of a mobius strip to create an interlocking engagement and wedding ring set for my sweetie and the result was elegant, organic, and truely a one of a kind.  My ring was simpler but elegant as well.  \n\nWe were so happy that he was willing to melt down old scrap gold and jewelry for us (including a few gold teeth) to form the jewelry as we wanted to minimize our impact on gold mining.  We came away with an amazing product for a really really reasonable price and couldn't be happier.  I would highly recommend these guys for any project.  They are artists of the highest caliber and really listen to the customer.", 'pos'), ("Every time my dad and I go to berkeley we ALWAYS go to this restaurant.  And I'm sure that Berkeley has many delicious restaurants, but this place is awesomeness on a stick.  Or, in a bowl, I guess.  \n\nThe Veggie Delight salad is amazing.  It doesn't even matter what dressing you get--they're all good.  And you can probably just get the salad and share it with a friend.  Seriously.  One veggie delight salad could feed Peru for several months! (although, guinea pig is not on the menu)  And the sammiches are delicious!  the fresh bread is, as every other reviewer has said, thick and tasty.  A bit sweet, but in a good way.    The egg salad is super good, the tofu sammich is alright.  A little sweet.  the turkey is good, standard turkey sammich.  It's just that salad.  Its SERIOUS salad.\n\nHere's the missing star (I almost rated it 5, then thought about it a bit more).... They are often out of egg salad and/or sprouts.  And, I love both egg salad and sprouts.  What can I say, I'm a california girl.  Tables can be scarce--best to figure out what you're ordering before you start standing in line, and come with a friend who can grab the table and hold it for you.  And that's about it.  I don't care  about the tables that much, but it's really really disappointing when all you want is a 1/2 and 1/2 veggie delight and egg salad sammich only to find that neither has sprouts and the sammich can't be egg salad.  Especially when you're coming from Santa Cruz.  Or Sacramento.  Or San Diego.  Then it's a bitter cup of sproutless eggsaladlessness.\n\nP.S. Its super cheap, everything about $7 (with $2 beers, incidentally), but bring cash!! Cash only.", 'pos'), ('Service: 3.5/5\nFood: 33/5\nWait: 4.5/5\nPrice: $\nPresentation of food: 3.5/5\nPresentation of restaurant: 3.5/5\nOverall: 3/5\n\nthe dude here looked very unhappy seeing so many un-sober people. i had their glazed twist and regular glazed; the twist was kinna hard on some ends. But i liked their regular glazed.', 'pos'), ('Everyone here is all, "I LOVE THIS PLACE! Four stars." Screw that, man: a huge selection of beers on tap for not very much money, a great patio, tasty munchies, and pretty thoroughly reasonable sandwiches? I\'m so down for that. Great on a warmer summer day, when you can find one.\n\nIt\'s a pub, not fine dining, but it\'s a damn good pub!', 'pos'), ('Walking around Cambridge in eleven degree weather has a tendency to make one cranky. Imagine that.\n\nSo with L.A. Burdick Chocolate Cafe in sight, I decided to employ the palliative sweet sworn upon by a well-known choleric demographic:  PMSing women. \n\nSeconds away from being a Laurensicle, I opted for my chocolate in hot liquid form. Specifically, a large hot milk chocolate. Which, according to their sign, is simply milk and melted shaved chocolate. (Three sizes: Demi - $2.00; Small - $3.00, Large - $4.50)\n\nMm...heaven. With one sip, the cold and mounting annoyance seemed to dwindle. Delicious. Strangely, I was reminded of the hot chocolate description in the book The Polar Express, rich like "melted nougat".  I sipped until my lactose-sensitive stomach threatened to rebel. I can\'t wait to go back to introduce friends and family to this incredible treat. Stomach and wallet be damned.', 'pos'), ("I love this place. It's close to work, and the Caesar chicken sandwich is awesome. The quesadillas are all pretty good too. The best thing is just the overall funkiness. It's run by happy hipsters who aren't snobby and pretentious, and the music is always appropriately weird. It's also got a good funky vibe, though the newer portion of the underground dining area is a little too bland.\n\nStill, I usually go there once a week for lunch. Also, skip the soft drink and get the lemonade. Free refills, it's awesome, and no wasted plastic or aluminim.\n\nIt's nice to see a business that recycles pretty much everything, as well.", 'pos'), ("After much deliberation we tried this place for dessert on Saturday afternoon. Decor is adorable and the bathrooms are very clean. We tried the most traditional crepe on the sweet crepe menu: butter, sugar and whipped cream. It was delicious. However, I wish they had real silverware, plates and glassware. Also, if they are going to go with the French theme, they should get rid of the americanized sugary drinks and americanized crepe options. Keep it Paris, please! Otherwise, they might see us again, but it won't be a regular thing. I could make the same thing at home for a dollar...", 'pos'), ("Caliban Book Shop has to be the most remarkable bookstore in the 'Burgh.  It isn't quite a used bookstore.  You don't go here expecting to find used paperbacks of Steinbeck or Dickens.  No, this is really much more of an antique and collector's bookstore.  As a reviewer on another site says, the first thing you notice upon entering the place is the sweet scent of old books.  I found an old book on pop music once as a gift for my dad.  He really loved it.\n\nThey do get used textbooks and not-so-rare paperbacks too.  So if you want to escape the look-alike world of the major chains (Barnes & Noble or Borders, not that there's anything wrong with those places) then by all means, drop in here!", 'pos'), ('I tried their Bubble tea and never got the dose of Christanity that other have experienced. Seriously, I didnt have a faintiest idea that they were promoting Jesus except when I was playing one of their Brick game which said I love jesus. but there where other bricks which said "Girls for a lovely time call me at XXX-xxx-XXXX" so I think I will let this pass.\n\nI prefer places which are vibrant and this place is definitely one. On top of that they have those giant screens which makes a complete moving picture which looks pretty cool.  University Ave. is a place I like to go a lot on a clear day and this is one of the place which makes it special (or the other way around). \n\nAbout their main attraction, The Bubble Tea. I like them without the Black Pearls. Tried their Almond and Chococlate. Remember their Almonds are pretty lethal. Wish those bubble tea costed around $2 then that would be sweeter and worthy of 5 *.', 'pos'), ('This is not really "great pizza" per se, the crust is a little cardboard-y and the toppings are not the highest quality.  That said, they do what they do well.  A quick slice or two when you are hungry, even (especially) late at night, and some truly inventive topping combos that they pull off surprisingly well.  While you will never see a fig and proscuitto pizza here, or a butternut squash, blue cheese, and rosemary, they are pretty inventive in a college kid kinda way - avocados and black beans, buffalo chicken, tortellini, etc.  It\'s not a gourmet spot, not a traditional Italian pizzeria, and not a high quality pie place like Regina\'s or Santarpio\'s in Boston, or Pepe\'s or Sally\'s in New Haven, but it\'s really a great spot to grab a slice.  When I am living in the Pioneer Valley they are kinda the place I love to hate - it\'s easy to eat there too often, to be sick of the mediocre crust and the Frankenstein topping combos, but when I am not in town I miss them.', 'pos'), ("I had tried to dine at Grafton Street Pub a few times, but there were always long lines and big waits.  This past week I was with a few friends and was finally able to get a table.  Some of my friends rave about this place, so maybe we all ordered the wrong things, but I found the food was only so-so and definetly not worth the price tag.  On the upside, I loved the atmosphere, and the waitstaff were really friendly, and great about answering questions, accomodating someone with different dietary needs.  As an FYI I'd say this is an Ok place for vegetarians (they'll leave meat off of just about anything), but probably a no-go for vegans.  Except the house salad I didn't see anything w/out cheese or eggs involved.  Overall I wasn't the biggest fan, but I'd probably still give Grafton another go.", 'pos'), ("This is probably one of my fav place if not the best place for sushi. The fish is fresh. Had their Rainbow Roll and it was the best roll I've eaten. Their California rolls are yummy too. Their miso soup was good...the seaweed was thick and chewy in a good way. Great service...waiter was friendly and quick. Atmosphere was mellow. Definitely will come back soon.", 'pos'), ("Joy Imai's pottery is beautiful. You must go see it. We have a lot of pieces by her. Sramana", 'pos'), ('Good pizza. I like their white pizza. also good beer on tap. reasonable price considering that they are in La Jolla.', 'pos'), ('The food here was pretty good. They have yummy make-your-own omelettes and the Mr. Greek Special is always a great deal. I heard good things from my friends, so I decided to check it out. Unfortunately, the prices have been jacked up since.\n\nAnd, I was violently sick afterwards. Not how that happened. All my friends were fine. :[', 'pos'), ("I've had lunch at Daisy Mint twice now, when there was no crowd, happily.  The food was excellent all around.  The service was not.  Both times.  No greeting when I came in the door.  First time, no one offered me a menu, although she grunted and pointed toward the table she wanted me to use.  Long delay in taking my order.  When food came out wrong, no gracious apology, just a silent picking up of my dish to return it to the kitchen for correction.  It won't stop me from going back for lunch on my own, but it would certainly stop me from introducing my friends to the place.  I would find it embarrassing to take them to a restaurant that didn't treat us well.", 'pos'), ("I love this place.  Authentic Greek cuisine at a decent price.  Chefs prepare all dishes just like they do in Athens, Mykonos, and Santorini.  Mythos, Greek beer, complements all the entrees.  Good for groups.  Crazy to read menu.  Tasso was such a great waiter - very welcoming. He's such a nice guy and will make anyone feel right at home with his conversation.  Go here and Go Greek!", 'pos'), ('So far, my favorite cafe in Amherst. Went for the first time last week and sat at the bar (avoided the crying children!). We split the french toast special and the standard blueberry pancakes. Both were delicious! Will definitely go back and try more.', 'pos'), ("One of my faves in downtown claremont. Its healthy, refreshing, and flavorful. You can order on the phone and pick it up to go if you're in a rush. The place is small and has 7 tables tops with booths and chairs. It's affordable but a little bit on the pricey side. The menu is broken up by sides, proteins, and sauces. If they didn't close so early I would eat there after work all the time! \n\nTheir salmon is delicious! You have to get it with steamed vegetables, basmati rice, and the apple aoli sauce! The sauce is sooooo good! \n\nTheir blackened chicken is juicy and flavorful. They have a mustard sauce that goes w this or you can choose one of their lemon sauces! \n\nI love their pasta sald with balsamic vinegar and cherry tomatoes! This place is very good!!! Yay for D. Grubbs!", 'pos'), ('"Fang gave me a layered razor cut and a straight razor neck shave."\n\nIt\'s not often you get to say a sentence like that without being into S&M... but don\'t worry... Fang is a woman... and she didn\'t abuse me at all! Quite the opposite! \n\nHands down, the best $25 haircut I\'ve recieved in Atlanta! (Also my first, but, hey... if it\'s not broke, don\'t fix it.)\n\nI made an on-line reservation, walked right in and was offered a Coke!\nThe haircut was super solid!\nNeck shave with a straight razor!\nHot Towel!\nand... Eye Brow Trim? \n\nUh... Ok... I guess I needed it? \n\nWhat else can I say? It was a great experience all around! Friendly staff that instinctively understood that I like my haircuts like I like my women... smart, efficient, and lathered in shaving cream! \n\nI\'ll be back!', 'pos'), ('Loving LimeRed Teahouse! It is my go to spot for a quick sip...Lychee Iced Tea with Boba is my drink of choice. The staff is polite and quick. Bathrooms are very clean,too!', 'pos'), ("Oh, the Fabulous Fox...how I love thee. From the first time I walked into this gorgeous building...I knew that this would be one of my favorite places in Atlanta. It's hard to put into words how beautiful this theater. I honestly feel, as if, I've stepped back in time whenever I walk through their doors. So many great people/groups have performed here...you can feel that history. \n\nA few things to note...\n* Concessions are pretty good here...variety of food and drinks, as well as two large bars. They also sell coffee drinks, which is a bonus if you have a boyfriend who loves espresso like mine. \n* The ceiling of the theater...there are no words how beautiful it is. It's a beautiful night sky...just lovely. \n* Bathroom lines can tend to be long...so I suggest sneaking out a few moments before intermission to go. \n* The Fox website has a feature when purchasing tickets where you are able to see the actual view of the stage of where your seat will be. It's pretty cool. I honestly don't think there is a bad seat in the house though. I've been close to the stage and far back in the balcony and have enjoyed every show.\n\nI've seen such a variety of shows here. To name a few...Oklahoma, Wicked, Cats, Phantom (traveling Broadway), My Morning Jacket, Widespread Panic, Stomp (musical shows), Alvin Ailey (dance) and a bunch of Atlanta Ballet shows (Nutcracker, Romeo & Juliet, Swan Lake).\n\nBottom-line - everyone (artists, comedians, dance companies) want to perform on this stage. There's nothing better than that.  \n\nOk...sometimes ticket prices can be a tad high, but if your resourceful...you can find discounted nights for most shows. Or...you can always go to a matinee...they tend to be lower. \n\nOverall...if you have never experienced this magical place...I highly suggest to buy tickets for the next show they have. I promise you'll back again soon.", 'pos'), ("Their pesto pasta is amazing, as is the bread.\n\nMy favorite pasta place around USC. Go to any event on campus, and guaranteed at least once a week someone's catering Vistango because they're that AWESOME.\n\nPasta's heavy on the flavors, but oh so good.", 'pos'), ("So you're out with your friends on a Friday or Saturday night having a good time. You get kicked out of the bar at 2am and need some food ASAP. McDonald's anyone? I'm not going to be so happy with that decision in the morning i'll bet. DP Dough has saved me literally once a week since it opened in Philadelphia. It seemed like all the big colleges had DP except the ones in Philly. Now we do! There is no questioning that they have the best food at 3am anywhere in West Philly especially considering I swore off eating Wawa's garbage almost 4 years ago. Get yourself DP'd with the quickness son...", 'pos'), ('Best authentic mexican food in area!!! the spicy chorico tacos were like we were in mexico. I had the burrito with the spicy pork and it was perfect( love the cheese need to know what kind of cheese that was)  My wife had the enchillads with salsa verde and it was incredible also.. great family run place and great wait staff.. very polite and attentitive.  Also must try the Margarita verry good.. Will go here often.. prices are very good also..', 'pos'), ('This is an excellent floral shop, in downtown and just a block from main campus.  They have a wide variety of flowers, from birds of paradise to hybrid roses.  They will wrap your arrangement beautifully for you to give as a gift.  They also have delivery services, which is very convenient and efficient.  The staff is wonderful in helping to choose an arrangement for the occasion.', 'pos'), ("Yeah baby.... The big fat chocolate brick is awesome! I've gone through two (in four months), I'm ready for  a third big fat brick of chocolate!", 'pos'), ("Player's has kind of a bad rep around town. But with all the other club closings, it's one of the few places you can get your dance on. It seems to have more space than the Library, but the atmosphere is definitely lacking. They keep it dark and it always feels a little dirty. What the other reviewer says is true -- underage patrons are everywhere, easily spotted in their denim minis, rainbows, and heavy eyeshadow. There's a couch section that invariably has someone quite nearly having sex on it. It's upstairs, and there's almost always a line to get in on the weekends, so clearly it's popular with some folks. I will say that the Holy Grails (mystery house cocktail) are very potent and easily sippable. And the DJs do a nice job mixing in older and current hip-hop and R&B stuff. And to change their image, they have implemented a dress code (no wife beaters, gentlemen).", 'pos'), ('Those of you looking for a nice night out could certainly do worse than a $40 four-course tasting menu at Craigie On Main. The catch? It\'s only available after 9 o\'clock on Sundays and, barring a food allergy, is completely predetermined by the chef. I have no problem leaving my meal in the hands of a James Beard award-winning chef, but others might. My friend and I, who are always looking for fine-dining at affordable prices, stumbled across the Chef\'s Whim, and knew we had to try it. We had both been to Craigie before and been disappointed, but saw this as an opportunity to set things right.\n\nWe actually opted for the $55 six-course meal, but could have easily done with the cheaper version. Everything was the same between the two tasting menus (as we saw firsthand with the table ordering next to us), except for two supplemental courses, a cheesy pumpkin soup with grilled cheese and pork belly (rich and decadent, and maybe worth the extra cost alone), and a scoop of blackberry sorbet (lame, and a waste of a "course").\n\nThe dishes that overlapped in both menus ranged from good to excellent. My favorite was probably the cod cheek tempura, served with pickled peppers, preserved lemon, and a decent smattering of squid ink. There was a lot of salt in this dish, but it was not overpowering in the slightest. Seared swordfish with clams, whelks, and "early fall succotash" (which my friend aptly described as the vegetable portion of a tv dinner) came next. It was light and refreshing, and the sea critters were cooked perfectly.\n\nOur main entree, if you will, was a chicken thigh confit that was rather hard to dissect, both physically and flavor-wise. I wrote down the laundry list of ingredients presented by the waiter, but had trouble pinpointing some of them within the dish. I\'m still drooling, however, thinking of the skin on our chicken. I may be 6\'1" and a lean 170 lbs, but I\'m a fatty through and through. Now onto dessert. : )\n\nAfter my previous brunch here included sour milk panna cotta, I was a little disappointed to see it served for dinner as well. It is a delicious and texturally complex dish (the coriander casher granola is a perfect accompaniment), but I wish I got to try something different--preferably something with chocolate. For $40, I will definitely be back some Sunday in hopes of having my wish granted.', 'pos'), ("If you are an avid baker you would love their bakewear section as they have any kind of baking pan you can think of, and the related supplies and icing, sprinkles stuff. But the prices are not cheap! It's better to buy the items on sale than pay full price as most of the bakewear you can probably find it somewhere else for cheaper, if you know where to get it.  $29 for a cake/cupcake carrier that's made of plastic? The cost is probably under $1 to make that!\n\nThe table linens and silverwears selection is not impressirve at all either. \n\nThis store has more young, college-age employees working there. Somtimes they are not as helpful as the ladies at their Berkeley store.", 'pos'), ('This is a nice place with nice food, not great food. Maybe my expectations are too high these days, at least for pricey restaurants. I brought my own wine, so with corkage for two people dinner was $150 with tip. For that price I expect fantastic food, it was fine. Service was good and the atmosphere was fine, uninspired but nice. They were also really mice to accommodate last minute reservations on a Saturday night on graduation weekend.', 'pos'), ("I ran through the front doors.. did some unnecessary weaving through ticket line ropes.. and arrived at the concession stand out of breath despite the fact that I covered less than a 1/3 of a city block. Must have been the adrenaline.\n\nMe: There's a.. a.. fire outside!!!\nConcession girl/lady/person: Someone's taking care of it. \nMe: Uh.. okay.. because it's getting kind of big. \nC G/L/P *turns to customer*: So do you want a medium or large?\n\nI had been waiting for a friend when some girl threw her cig into the mulch outside of the theater. That was a bad idea... but more so since it was dry August day. An older gentleman noticed the small fire first and tried to put it out with his wing tipped shoe. Yeah, didn't help. Then an employee came out with a small glass of water and thought he quelched the flames. When he left the fire was as big as a small bush. Big enough for me to go Moses on it and ask it for the 10 Commandments of Movie Theaters (#2 - Don't throw your cigs into mulch, stupidhead). Or something. That's when I ran in. As I walked out defeated, an employee leisurely came out with a bucket of water. \n\nSo anyway. I like Kendall. The staff sometimes leads me to believe that their corporate trainer was Thora Birch's character in Ghost World.. but I like me some quirky workers. This is the place to go for indie movies. Sign up for their mailing list. They're constantly giving away free tickets/posters/etc and announcing special events/screenings. One of the last shows I saw, they had the director there for questions afterwards. OOhh.. and snacks! You can throw different kinds of flavoring on the popcorn. Way to rock. I also like the sassy sign in the bathroom next to the Excelisor dryers saying that they KNOW they're loud...so deal. Very well kept and clean!", 'pos'), ("I was very hesitant to try Charlie's place and it took a couple months.  That being said, not I'm hooked.  While not the best food in SLO, it is quite good especially for the money.  The drink specials are among the best, if not the best in SLO.  I have had several food items here including the Super Burrito, Charlie's Burger and a chicken burrito. \n\n I must say the Super Burrito was very shocking... it is HUGE!  The Chili Verde they make is quite good.  The burger is probably the best I have had in SLO for $5, very fresh and the bun is very good.  The only thing I haven't been too thrilled about was the chicken burrito, it needs vegetables.  I'm sorry, but just seasoned chicken, rice, beans and cheese makes for a very boring burrito.  Throw in some pico de gallo or something!\n\nI would certainly recommend this place over others on this side of town, especially with the full bar.  Lets just say the Kilt won't be seeing me as often", 'pos'), ("Never eaten here, but I guess it's a good place to go for happy hour and last I heard, happy hour is every day at this place?!  That's pretty awesome cause the happy hour specials are pretty cheap.  I don't think I've seen cheap specials that frequently, especially when a long island iced tea is part of it too?  Crazy.  Catch some beers, shots, rails, whatever, and your wallet probably won't get THAT much damage compared to another bar.", 'pos'), ('Every time that I come home this is one of the places that I like to go.  They make really good burgers.  They are cooked on what tasts like an open bbq.  They use all fresh topings to make the burger taste yummy.\n\nI also really like their fries.  There are not that many places that make good burgers and fries.  This place has it down.  Good fries and good burgers.  \n\nIf you are looking for a salad, they make a pretty amazing tri-tip salad.', 'pos'), ("I had take-out from here often when I was a student. I particularly enjoy the Pad Thai, Lard Na Puck, and green curries. The food isn't write-home-to-mother great, but it is yummy and not too expensive. \nThe restaurant itself is a tad on the small side, but is a particularly nice spot for lunch when it's not too crowded. The wait staff are attentive. \n\nThey also make a killer Thai Iced Tea, with tons of cream. YUM!", 'pos'), ('When out-of-towners come for a visit, you can bet yer butt that they\'re gonna ask to be taken down to those quintessential spots that "Keep Austin Weird".  You cringe a little when the request comes, but you oblige because it\'s your home-town duty to do so.  The drag, however, is the one spot off this list that I probably dread making the tour of the most.  It seems more like a memorial ground than a tourist spot to me.  \n\nWalking down that long stretch of Guadalupe, from 21st to 25th, I hardly remember what it looked like when I was a student at UT.  And I\'m sure those that came and went before me have all said the same thing.  By the time I got there, Metro had taken over the old Quack\'s spot, a fact that my Italian professor lamented on the regular.  The Barnes and Noble, which I didn\'t particularly care for, but whose magazine racks I often raided for updates on the latest fashion trends or celebrity gossip is now part of the UT Co-Op complex.  Tear drops fell from my eyes when the CC\'s Coffee sign came down, and so went my favorite soy chai latte in town.  :(  Bye-bye, Gap, you I don\'t miss.  \n\nThe most notable of the fallen soldiers, however, has to be the loss of Tower Records.  It held steady for many years at the corner of 24th and Guadalupe, a bastion amongst other businesses with less Austin flare (I realize it wasn\'t local, but it had character).  And then it fell, yet another casualty and a sign of our changing times.  For a while it stood empty, and walking by you could still see the colorful prints on the walls that gave Tower a lot of its street cred and funk.  And I almost wondered if it would stay empty as a symbol of all that the drag has traded in exchange for more dollah dollah bills.  Intellectual Property, however, has now filled its space with books where Vinyl and CD\'s once stood.  And in fairness, it is cooler than the B & N.\n\nAt least the drag rats and Renaissance market are still holding strong.  Like roaches, those parts of Austin will never die!', 'pos'), ("Fantastic service! I'm getting IPL treatments from a Groupon. The service has been thorough, timely and successful.  I've had IPL previously so I don't have much hyperpigmentation left to take off but the IPL really helps with my pores and skin tone in general. There is no down time after each procedure. Would highly recommend to anyone!", 'pos'), ("Pretty good Korean restaurant to go to for a very cheap price. The Korean lady who owns this place is really friendly and engages with a lot of her customers while they're waiting for their food. \n\nI had their ddukbokki, which, IMO, isn't the best I had. (Go to Cafe Expresso for that!) I was really disappointed because everything else that I tried at Bear Ramen was good. Also tried their Curry Rice (yummmm) and Kimchi Fried Noodles (so goodddd). \n\nThe downside: they only accept cash and the place is extremely tiny! It gets quite crowded sometimes.", 'pos'), ('I arrived with my wonderful wife to this highly yelped establishment & found a no frills place w/ a small open dinning room w/ limited decor, bright lighting & a sort of intimate customer base that suggested that no one was leaving anytime soon.  There were only 3 tables left, 1 literally touching the front glass of the pastry display case, 1 blocking the kitchen exit, & a 6 top right in the thick of it.  A guy, who ended up being our waiter that night suggested the we take the one in front of the pastry counter, said it was the least molested & we took his suggestion.  I quickly ordered 2 Turkish beers, said to be like Shiner & Budweiser, of which I quickly disagreed.  They tasted more like a Killians Red (even though not red in color), & a Heineken, both good.  On the table free of cost, like chips & salsa, a sesame pita thing w/ a sesame & spice dip that is awesome!!!\n\nI was happy to see the beers come out fast & even happier when the waiter actually started taking interest in our having the best dinning experience possible.  I always ask the wait staff "What is good?"  I figure they are there all the time, they should know, or work somewhere else.  SIDE NOTE: (I hate it when I\'m told "Everything, or I don\'t have a favorite."  In addition, I don\'t like it when they say something like, I like the salad, or the burger, just because.  This tells me that they, & possibly the restaurant, has no imagination what-so-ever & is not taking pride in the food that they do have.)  The waiter promptly took the normal stance that we were American scaredy cats & that we are looking for Americanized safe food.  Oh contrar mona mi.  I have been half way around the world, food is my hobby!!!  So I proceeded to pry out of him what he likes on the menu, because frankly, I\'m pretty sure he was Turkish!!!  lol.  After letting down his normal guard, he proceeded to tell us the things on the menu that he really likes & why.  Come to find out they are the things that are closest to what his mom makes him at home!!!  He suggested 4 things, paired w/ one another because each enhances the taste of the other.  We proceeded to order the full sampler because it had all 4, the suggested 4, plus 4 more!!!  If you get this sampler, be sure you have 4 people or more...lol  It comes with pickled beens, picked leeks, the yogurt sauce, egg plant salad, humus, a Turkish pico, & I forget the other 2.  I loved the pico, yogurt & humus the best  They pickle everything in Turkey I guess...lol  They give you the sesame pita like thing to dip in these samplers as well.  When it arrived the waiter was sure to explain to us all 8 of the items & bring us more pita.\n\nFor the entre we ordered the Turkish pizza which is a very thin pita w/ a "lamb spread" on it, then baked, but not to crunchy status.  I wondered why, but not for long because along comes the waiter again w/ instructions on how to eat the pizza.  You load it up w/ all the vegetables that were served on the side, then roll it up like a tortilla & eat it.  We were then again surprised by the waiter when he brought us a double shot glass sized glass full of what reminds me of the Indian salty lassy yogurt drink.  He tells us, take a bite of the rolled pizza, then a drink of the salty drink, & guess what?  It was perfect!!!  No better match of drink & food could be made.  Along w/ the Turkish pizza, we got a plate of lamb kabobs & rice w/ more side vegetables, pickled of course...lol  This was also good, but by this time I was stuffed, so I didn\'t eat as much of it.  I did however have a little of a sweet tooth after that meal though &asked what the waiter suggested.  With a Grinch like grin on his face, he told us that he had the perfect desert, but it was off menu, & $5.  Would we be interested?  Of course we were!!!  He hadn\'t been wrong all night!  A couple minutes later he brings out this little aluminum Turkish looking skillet, very hot, & in the middle is a couple of their "hay stack" looking things, smashed down into a pancake, soaked in maybe honey & butter & browned?  On top of it is a tiny scoop of heaven, otherwise known as Belgian Cream...  Of all the Mediterranean, or Turkish deserts that I have ever had, this has been the best & I would recommend it every time.  The waiter actually made it for us himself, & it is his favorite dessert that his mom makes!!! We also ordered a Turkish coffee (kinda like an espresso shot), & a Turkish hot tea (like a double shot of hot English breakfast tea).  Ladies, ask to have them tell your story from the coffee cup!!!  A perfect & wonderful ending to a perfect & wonderful meal & night.\n\nI would recommend this restaurant to all those interested in good & authentic Turkish food w/ great service & a very good price.  With 4 drinks, a 4 person appetizer, 2 entres, an off the menu dessert, a Turkish coffee, & a hot Turkish tea, our bill was under $50.  Not bad for 2 full hours of eating, which only seemed like 45 minute.  Better then Fadi\'s!!!', 'pos'), ('For those of us who are not aficionados of beer, their beer sampler is an excellent way to go. Great place for friends & families.', 'pos'), ("I usually go here on Thursday nights because it is easy for my group of friends to meet here.  The service is good and they do have good specials.  The prices are average for the greater Boston area for food and prices.  I pizza is going to be around 8 to 13 dollars, where mixed drinks are around 9 dollars.\n\nI don't really have anything more to say because the food is just ok.  It is not good or bad.  I will still go, so hopefully I can adjust this review in time.", 'pos'), ("I had the best Tex-Mex brunch at Trudy's that I have ever had in my life. I don't remember what I ordered, but I'll describe it. The bottom layer consisted of spicy black beans, peppers and onions seasoned perfectly. On top of that was a crispy tortilla.... Then two fried eggs with runny yolks. As if that weren't enough, fresh, thinly sliced ham topped the eggs and there was a mild salsa drenching that! Just, order that. My Mom gobbled up the benedict and the service was great.", 'pos'), ('good korean fast food.  so what if latinos cook the food..95%of CA restaurants have Latino cooks or short order cooks assisting the chef even at top restaurants in San Francisco.  Korean fast food is not rocket science.  For seven bucks, who needs to pay 2O usd...at other places for one item', 'pos'), ('One of the best Japanese restaurants around. No Hibachi tabled but still excellent sushi and bento boxes. Cappuccino was excellent too. Go figure - a Japanese place that makes great coffee. Will go over and over again.', 'pos'), ('This is my go-to Chinese take-out. Great food, good prices. I like the noodle dishes, my boyfriend usually gets the dinner combos with an egg roll. We also like the steamed veggie dumplings, egg drop soup and wonton soup. \n\nCash only is a bummer, but not the end of the world.', 'pos'), ('Are you drunk? Is it around 3am? Are you in downtown Berkeley? Well then, you better head down to Top Dog, purveyor of quality dogs to drunken students for many a year. They have around, what, 25, 30 different kinds of meat dogs, and exactly 1 kind of veggie dog, called the "weenie". When I was there one time with my vegetarian friend, he naturally ordered the veggie option. When it was done, the owner shouts out: "One weenie, who\'s got the weenie here?" 40 drunken college students couldn\'t have been happier. Aah, the old ones are the best ones.', 'pos'), (u"Any bratwurst/bockburst combination with whatever condiments you desire is a win. I do prefer the Top Dog on south side though, but simply because it has a bit more character. \n\nTip: Don't get the chili and cheese, no matter how tempting it sounds. The cheese is not melted and the chili is... beany. \n\nBon app\xe9tit!", 'pos'), ("Great food, reasonable prices.  Got the tri-tip sandwich, steak salad, beef taco (which ends up being the same tri-tip and steak), caesar salad, and grilled chicken sandwich.  Plenty of food.  Didn't feel like fries because we'd been eating out too much.  Overall, felt full but not greasy.  One piece of advice, we ended up getting the beef taco with everything on the side (because of the way my kids eat)... well with all the parts, we ended up asking for another tortilla because there was enough to make two!  So if you are trying to feed kids or on a low budget, this works out fine.  Again, they are using the same tri-tip minced for the steak salad and taco.", 'pos'), ('Liza was funny. Class went by quickly. I learned a few things. I would definitely recommend it. Oh yeah, and you get free passes to the big show.', 'pos'), ('Amazing cookies and ice-cream-try the peanut butter ice-cream with white chocolate macademia cookies!!! yummmmmm!\n\nNegatives: Loooonnnngggg lines, staff appears overworked and rude at times.', 'pos'), ('The themes of interconnectedness, alienation, identity and intersecting lives seem to be particularly popular lately.  Or maybe personally more resonant or relevant as I seem to relate behind the seclusion of text / internet / e-mail more than anything else these days.  *Sigh.*  \n\n"Sleepy" takes seemingly disparate stories to evoke or show these themes in dark, raw and most basic form.  Appropriately performed in dream-like ("nightmarish" from the website) sequence, I have to admit that I didn\'t "get" everything in this play.  What did resonate though was the searing intensity of emotion and feeling that we\'ve all experienced at some point:  presuming that a relationship is copacetic and then having the till-then unquestioned smugness pulled out from under you as you fall smack down on your just as shocked ass; or, alternatively, quietly suffocating and seething in a relationship in which your partner knows nothing about you and doesn\'t even want to know until you. just. can\'t. deal.  And explode in a fit of frustration and, relief.  Or finding comfort in and trusting someone you shouldn\'t and never being able to shed the self-blame.  That taking on a life of its own in your never-ending quest to "get it right."  This time.  Or harboring a poignant unrequited (yes, redundant) crush on someone and ineffectually only being able to tell her when she\'s sufficiently tuned out.\n\nExplosive, bare-bones vignettes in an appropriately bare-bones, underground theatre, "Sleepy" may come off as undone flashes.  But as far as emotional and experiential vindication goes, cheers for reminding us of the universality and community of catharsis.\n\n*Applause*', 'pos'), ("*** Friday - Lunch\n\nDirty Pho, as Su K. calls it:\nhttp://www.yelp.com/biz/pho-75-hyattsville#hrid:GSQpWsHSqfyJoAwMnZKmmw/src:search/query:dirty%20pho\n\nThis wasn't where I popped my Pho cherry, but it was the place that popped my Pho cherry's cherry back in good ol' 1991. I remember that spring day like it was yesterday. I almost jizzed my pants here that day. It's very basic, as other Pho 75 locations are. They have Pho and that's about it. No appetizers, no pork chops, nada.\n\nThe Pho here justifies the absence of other dishes though. Pho is really good most of the time. I say most of the time because, just like any other Pho places, it can be a little different day to day, and that is totally acceptable because bones and meats all don't come from the same cow. They come from happy cows, sad cows, and bikerbitch cows.\n\nGetting back to the Pho, sit down, order, and whatever you ordered will be out in front of you in less than 2 minutes. I guarantee this and am willing to bet both of Anson P.'s thumbs on this. I've been here 4 times in the past few weeks, and it's been good to great every time. Almost the same as I remember from back on that spring day in 1991. Noodles are cooked just right, meats are nice and tender and juicy, tendon is tendony, and the broth is ALWAYS piping hot. Like burn your tongue and mouth hot. The dish of sprouts, basil, jalapenos, lime, and sometimes culantro is usually fresh. Maybe being a local chain has its merits.\n\nStill one of my favorite Pho places in the DC area. Nice and dirty. I made a revelation during my meal here. I ordered a large #1 with NOTHING ELSE. No extra meat, no extra noodles. Nothing. I'm still so proud of myself that I patted myself on the back every 4 hours ever since until my update below.\n\n4.5 stars\n\n---------------------------------------------------------\n\n*** Update: How to spend $20 at Pho 75 on one bowl of Pho and free water\n\n1. Order a large bowl of Pho   $6.95\n2. Order onion in vinegar         $0.50\n3. Order extra noodles             $1.50\n4. Order extra meatballs          $1.50\n5. Order extra tai                        $1.50\n6. Order extra chin                    $1.50\n7. Order extra tendons             $1.50\n8. Order extra nam                    $1.50\n9. Order extra sach                   $1.50\n10. Order extra gau                   $1.50\n                                                     --------\n                                                    $19.45\n                                            Tax  $ 1.17\n                                                     --------\n                                                    $20.62\n                                            Tip   $  4.00\n                                                     --------\n                                                     $24.62", 'pos'), ('I don\'t know what the hype is about this place. Granted, I am a loyal patron of Bongo Burger, but in my defense, I tried Smart Alec\'s first. I was going to give this place a 2.5 stars, but the free fries bumped it up to 3 stars.\n\nTIP: Bring any academic paper, test, or midterm with an "A" on it to get a free order of french fries or garlic fries!!\n\nATMOSPHERE\nThere is a lot of seating, which is nice, but the doors are always open and it gets really cold inside the place. I don\'t like shivering as I eat my meals.\n\nThe workers are friendly and fast; your food comes out almost immediately and you can see them make your food in the open kitchen behind the cashier.\n\nFOOD\nI usually order the AVOCADO BURGER with AIR-BAKED GARLIC FRIES. \n\nAVOCADO BURGER- to be honest, the burger isn\'t that great. I appreciate the generous avocado spread, but the burger gets really mushy and super messy. The bread is probably what disgusts me the most. It\'s not firm enough and the patty slips back and forth while you eat it.\n\nThe FRENCH FRIES are good for the first 10 minutes and then they start to get soggy and limp: 2 adjectives that should never be used to describe french fries. I appreciate their effort to be "healthy," but I like my fries crispy! The garlic is real garlic (none of that garlic powder), so the taste is extremely strong. Bring some mints if you plan on going back to class or to meet up with friends.\n\nMy friends often get their salads, which seem pretty big but it seems like they get the salads for the cornbread. I\'m not a fan of cornbread so you won\'t see me with one of their plain looking salads.\n\nOverall, there are better burger places just down the street from here. The only redeeming quality of this place is their free fries with any "A" work.', 'pos'), ('They DO take cards now, with only a 25 cent charge if your order is under $10. I have gone here three to four times a week since I was a freshman..and its one of the things ill miss most about UCSD. I adore both their drinks and their pastries (chocolate croissants, if bought around 8am, are still warm!!). When I am short on cash they sell me chai on good faith, simply noting my name on a post-it to pay them back later, truly a magical place.', 'pos'), ("I was happily impressed with this upscale chain.  They have an excellent wine list that you can sample by the glass - always an education.  And they do know how to cook a steak!  Everything is a la carte, so if you want a side with your meat, expect to pay extra.\n\nI had the salmon bruchetta, which was almost a meal to itself.  Probably the second best bruschetta I have ever had (only the fruit bruschetta at il fornaio was better.)  The steak was cooked to perfection and the creamed spinach was excellent.  \n\nI sat at the bar, which wasn't crowded and had excellent and attentive service.  The decor is heavy regal velvet and wood which makes the place great for a serious private getaway or a hearty business meal.  however, expect to pay a lot for the privilege.  But don't worry, you'll be pampered as much as you want.\n\nThe piece de resistance is the excellent wine list, all available by the glass or taste (1/3rd of a glass.)  This is a great place to learn about wines - they have a very eclectic selection of wines, lots of good local ones but also wines from around the world.  The wine list alone makes this a place that should be experienced at one time or another.  Where else can you compare three of the best Cabernets to three of the best Zinfandels on the market?\n\nthe creme brulee was also excellent, and I consider myself a creme brulee expert, having tasted it in over 10 states and 7 countries.  i would put it in the top 5 %.  Very creamy with a light vanilla taste and a thin crust of melted sugar, topped with some small fruit.   It was almost as good as the creme brulee at La Boheme in Carmel, the best we have ever had (alas, La Boheme is no more, but their recipe lives on at their old web site.)\n\nI highly recommend this as an excellent steak house.  Not as innovative as Alexanders, but more down to earth American style with a better wine list.", 'pos'), ('About 2 years ago, I was desperate of getting my skin get healthy.  I went to 3 dermatologists in the bay area that even my  friends recommended..All of \'em prescribed me different kinds of antibiotics.  It was a horrible experience.  I had huge acne all over my face up to the top of my scalp and my back.  I knew something was wrong because I was noticing that my lips were  turning black from taking oral antibiotics and topical as well.  With all these frustrations, I was so desperate and tried to go online and look for a dermatologist of  my choice.   I got to tell ya\'ll, I felt like it was a gamble to find one-- not knowing who would be the best one for my case.  Luckily, I found Dr. Berman.  He was intimidating at first.  Just because, he asks me first   thing, what I think was wrong with my skin.  And I\'m like--well, I needed help that\'s why I got to see you...I mean "i DON\'T kNOW, DUH???  Then so, he checked my chest, back and tummy to see any unwanted hair growing.  And he explained to me that it could be some hormonal imbalance that I am experiencing.  So, he asked me to see an OB-gyn..And I was like--that\'s weird....But as desperate as I was , I thought, I\'d do whatever it takes, and followed his advice.  True enough, it was some sort of abnormality...I never thought that having irregular period is REALLY a  hormonal thing.  To cut my story short,  My acne starts to diminish after like 4 months.  Now, though it sounds too good to be true, I don\'t see any acne in my face.  My skin color has gone better.  Dr. Berman got everything under control.  Looking back 2 years ago,   I appreciate how my skin got back to its natural glow....Not perfect yet...because I deveoped huge pores and some scaring  from acne but  Dr. Berman gave me several options for treatment .  Microdermabrasion is my favorite because it\'s working great minimizing my large pores.  It is a little bit expensive though but it\'s all worth it.   Just go and check it out .  I know!  I know...Dr. Berman could be intimidating but he won\'t bite!  The only bad thing I\'d have to say about his practice is that the COFFEE MACHINE DOESN\'T MAKE GOOD COFFEE.  NEEDS SOME SERVICE DONE ON THIS MACHINE!!!  Look for Nora  to set-up an appointment.  She\'s very sweet and thoughtful.', 'pos'), ('I live half a block away so I decided to check this place out with my bf. The place is smaller than I would think from the outside probably because it is divided into two almost with an "express" side on one side and the sit down restaurant on the other. As we entered, you could see the beautiful modern decor with interesting lighting chandeliers and a bar area adjacent. You could also smell the seafood so if you dont like fish, you might want to go elsewhere. Most of the people that came in (mostly male on this Monday night) sat at the bar for some reason. We were the only ones sitting down at the tables. According to this website, the restaurant seats 50 people but I would say it seemed like it sat less. \n\nThe bar tender/waitress was very nice but was a little slow in anticipating what we would need (had to ask for silverware, drink refills, salt/pepper) but otherwise was very friendly. We ordered off the Harlem week prix fixe so it was cheaper than their regular menu. Appetizers on the menu were pretty tipical ~$9 or so with interesting menu choices such as calamari, lobster and shrimp roll, etc. Follow by entrees which were a little pricier as expected for seafood from $20-$50 (lobster). It is also the first time I have been asked how I would like my seafood cooked (grilled,broiled, fried and rare, medium, well). I picked a medium grilled salmon and it was yummy. It came with a very well flavored and textured mashed potatoes. My bf got grilled cod with a mixed vegetable medley. The vegetables were perfection- well seasoned, good crunch. The cod though was not good, it lacked flavor- needed a sauce or more seasoning or something but still edible. For dessert, I had the chocolate pecan pie which was delicious but I would have preferred it to be warmer. He had the chocolate cookie which I did not enjoy but the waitress was sweet and brought him milk with his cookie.\n\nOverall I enjoyed the food here but it is on a regular downtown menu price which is fine but wont be going here every day. THey also had combination platters that looked interesting that I would try when I get around to coming back (shrimp, lobster, fish, etc). Ambiance-wise, the place has nice modern decor but the crowd is typical harlem crowd I would say. Also I believe the owner is the DJ and plays good music as you dine. I enjoyed the music the entire time. One suggestion would be to have nice sauce to put atop/along side of their perfectly cooked fish to add to the flavor of the dish.\n\nP.S. THis place is clearly not a beer place as they have no draft beer, only bottled and a limited selection of bottled beer that they do carry.', 'pos'), ("It's about what you'd expect - t-shirts, posters and other commemorative gifts relating to Krannert's guest performers.  You can also pick up jewelry and knick-knacks at prices that rival the mall shops, and it's artsier (I think I just made up a word) here.  I've purchased a few pairs of earrings here.  Interesting kaleidoscopes, Chi balls, scarves, greeting cards, etc.", 'pos'), ("Frankly, I was pleasantly surprised after reading the awful reviews. It's not fine dining, but the menu seemed to have been recently updated and featured a lot of interesting choices. My girlfriend and I both got the new sliders, which were pretty good. We didn't have any problems with the service -- in fact, the restaurant was not crowded at all even on a Friday night. \n\nTip: Don't forget change for the parking meter!", 'pos'), ('Was a great help and I would gladly use his services again...\n\nAlthough my particular debts were outside of his expertise (private and federal student loans specifically) he was very kind and took the time to meet with me on a Saturday which really helped because I work 9-5 M-F. \n\nHe was informative and up to date on his information and steered me in the right direction with my issues even though that meant sending me away to a different specialty lawyer. He was fair and honest and could have easily led me on but gave me the facts straight up which made the whole process go smoother for me, I highly recommend Cliff for any type of typical bankruptcy filing, he was very patient.', 'pos'), ("Taste: 5\nValue: 4\nService: 4\n\nCame here after running the Nike Women's Half marathon, so I definitely had an appetite. On recommendation from our friend, I tried the Alameda. Two pieces of french toast with thinly sliced ham and sauteed mushrooms in the middle. Top it off with two eggs, over easy, and hollandaise sauce to top it off. The bottom has a balsamic vinegar reduction which complements the sweetness of the french toast.", 'pos'), ("We came on a pretty busy Sunday night and we (party of 2) didn't have to wait for a table. They even moved us to a more intimate spot once one opened up. The decor is lovely , high ceilings with beautiful cream lamp shades and wrought iron chadeliers. It has a very cozy, but not cramped feel to it. \n\nThe drinks and food are very reasonably priced. There semed to be only one waitress, 2 managers, and a food runner. But we didn't have to wait too long for anything. \n\nThe fried catfish fingers were delicious with a spicy remoulade, an appetizer or perfect portion of you just want a little something to nibble on, and to save room for dessert. My friend had the fish and chips, which were pretty standard, nothing out of this world, but good and reliable. I had the coconut/pineapple cake. It was pretty good, the icing was a little too sweet, but that's my only complaint about the entire night. I'd certainly have the cake again.\n\nI will absolutely be back, and possibly on my birthday because twice while we were there the owner/ manager erupted into a jubliant rendition of Stevie WOnder's Happy Birthday and encouraged the whole place to join her and brought out red velvet cake for the 2 birthday people. It made me feel special and they weren't even singing to me.\n\nMy date was a bust and he spent half the night on the phone, FAIL.\nBut dinner at Melba's definite, WIN.", 'pos'), ('Excellent large park open to the public. Some nice areas, shady trees, water with ducks, plenty of benches. Right by all the museums and close by the zoo and millers outdoor theatre. Just lovely', 'pos'), ("In what may be typical Pittsburgh style, there were fries in my buffalo salad... right under the buffalo chicken. I don't think the menu mentioned that. Not that I mind too much. Almost any American food you order around this area comes with them.\n\nThe service is pretty decent, though your food may take a while to come out if you happen to go during the lunch hour rush. (There are a limited number of restaurants in the area after all). The place also serves as a bar, so the lighting is pretty dim inside... unless you happen to be seated right by the full window wall.\n\nI definitely don't mind coming here on occasion. Everything is pretty standard, and I usually know what to expect.", 'pos'), ('A real clean & quaint store that I\'d always stop by at during breaks when I used to work on Telegraph. They\'re known mostly as the store that has the Nike SB account, and I\'ve copped some pairs without any problem at MSRP prices. The staff is real chill and by no means overbearing, which I totally dig. A nod and "let me know if you need anything" is all that\'s required by me, and that\'s what they give.', 'pos'), ('Well, the door says "Critics Not Welcome." does this mean Yelpers are not welcome, because that means I was not welcome; oh well. \n- A Lot of Food: Win \n- Location (at the mall) : Really Win \n-Nice employees: Win. \n-The fact that I had to wait a hour to get a table for 3 (well it was 1:00 pm on Saturday, but still): Really Lose. \n- Many locations in the Bay Area: Win \n-They forgot to bring my iced tea (they were busy so it was an honest mistake): Lose \nMax\'s Is a good family and group restaurant. But if you are planning to go at 1 pm on Saturday make reservations ahead of time.', 'pos'), ("I bring the family matriarch up to Hungry Mother every year for Mother's Day.  She thinks it's hilarious.  She's got some real Southern roots, coming up in Virginia, and she says the food is spot-on.  I trust her, because I don't think my taste buds are lying to me, either.\n\nThe people are fantastic and really do care about your experience.  They'll check on you, but not at inappropriate times or excessively short intervals, and they're very quick to correct any problems that may arise.\n\nThe food will simply blow you away.  These guys are no slouches, they know how to cook and they know the cuisine.  They'll also surprise you with unexpected twists on your prototypical Southern fare.  I have to recommend the sweet tea, which is definitely about as authentic as you'll find North of Maryland.  And if you're in the mood, the house cocktails are tasty and unique.\n\nFor all this you can expect to spend some real money, but that shouldn't deter you.  It's well worth it.", 'pos'), ("Ambiance 4/5\nDAMN this place is small so obviously you have to wait for a table, so it depends on how fast people eat. Get ready to see a shit ton of UCLA fans since the Rose Bowl is around the corner. Expect to be kind of cramped so if your claustrophobic, suck it up. If you don't mind sitting next to strangers, asking them to pass the salt, than you will fit right in\n\nFood 4/5\nMy friends and I ordered 3 different pizzas to try, they even allowed us to do half on the toppings. The waiter brought out some rolls which were good, I think we ordered another batch because they were that good, can't remember all the different types of pizzas we got, except the best one which had spinach on it, that thing was beast\n\nService 4/5\nIt's pretty hard to not get their attention with the place being so small, if you don't, sucks for you. But the waiters were cool, they work fast, made some recommendations, refilled our drinks before they got empty, pretty straight forward service imo.\n\n12/15...next time I gotta try their pasta", 'pos'), ("Delicious quick bite. I've heard about this place from so many people and finally got to try it. A yummy treat, and friendly service.", 'pos'), ('I\'m struggling before 3 and 4 stars, I hate to be this mean. its a 3.5 (grossly approximated to 4) stars.\n\nThe thing is, with the Silver Skillet, you are eating there to get a piece of history, a landmark, a feeling or being back in an old school diner. I doubt that you come here for exceptional food.\n\nGrated, their pork chops are really good.. but its the best thing on their menu. To be brutally honest, the pork chops are super tasty, and their biscuits are probably the best ive had in a long time. However, the portions aren\'t that big, the prices are a little high, and the rest of their items (eggs, hash browns, etc) are just OK. Edible, tasty, satisfying, not food orgasm. I am super picky about my soft poached eggs to be fully runny on the inside. The were already mostly cooked on the inside. :(\n\nI still really liked coming here. They have the super old school trivial pursuit and play awesome hits from 1969 and before. The waiters are very nice and the whole feel of the place is really cozy and nice. You definitely do feel like you are part of the landmark, making this place a "must visit" for the environment more than anything.\n\nThe good: I ate enough to make me pass out for 2 hours after eating here. I wasn\'t hungry until 7pm.\nThe bad: the tables were a tad sticky and they charged me an extra $1 to replace the white gravy and potatoes for hash browns. $10.75 was a tad steep. (deal with it, i\'m a cheapo).\n\nWould come again with out-of- towners to show them the place.', 'pos'), ("I send people all over this fine country for business and personal travel.  When I don't know the area, I turn to Yelp for advice.  Torrey Pines Town Car was the first car service that popped up for the San Diego area, and it did not disappoint!\n\nWhen I called TPTC, I spoke with Najib.  He was friendly, professional, thorough, and all around AWESOME.  A few days later, I called with a need for the Anaheim area of California, and he referred me to another company in the area.  Where other companies might have just kept my business and charged the higher rate, Najib was all about the customer service.  He made sure that I would still get stellar service from their affiliate company, but didn't want to charge us the extra $$.\n\nUpon their return to MN, I spoke with the people who were in the car.  They said that the driver was friendly and polite, and did a great job.  I will definitely be using Torrey Pines for any future needs in San Diego, and you should, too!", 'pos'), ("Not impressed. Got a burger and a chillie dog. The service was pretty okay. \n\nIn the end I feel i paid alil too much (including tip) for an average meal.\n\nWon't come back here unless someone is else is paying!", 'pos'), ("To be honest, the ONLY reason I keep going to Brew Co is its proximity to my apartment, and stumbling back through Westwood beats passing out in a bus. The unfortunate truth is that there's nothing brewing at Brew Co that you couldn't find in a thousand other pubs across LA. But if you're in the area and don't want to deal with the the other (singular) bar in Westwood, then its not an awful last resort.", 'pos'), ("When I want to invest in quality shrubs & need a guarantee it will thrive, this is my go to.  If your shrub fails, you return it. It's that easy. I'm embarrassed to say I  have had to take advantage of this very service a few times in the past decade despite the fact that their plants are that good. Plus their friendly staff really know their stuff. So if you want a gorgeous garden & you want the knowledge & know how plus quality products that are guaranteed, this is your gardening haven.", 'pos'), ('First rate wine and liquor shop with friendly, knowledgeable clerks. Never mobbed, easy to navigate, and on top of it all, very classy decor.', 'pos'), ('The waitress and waiter are sooo beautiful and friendly. i thought i was in a indian palace except all the beauties are americans. \nthe food are great! highly recommend', 'pos'), ("I lived within walking distance from this beautiful garden for a year and I didn't even know about it! *kicks self in the head*  I seriously felt more alive after walking through the roses, smelling the fragrance of the flowers and green grass, and frolicking in the cool museums surrounding it.  I have finally discovered something you can experience in LA for FREEEEEE!\n\nI'm actually really excited to bring my sweetie here, maybe for a picnic.", 'pos'), ('After realizing that we couldn\'t do anything about my dead car, my boyfriend and I said "F*ck it" and walked down to Barney\'s Beanery one June night. I walk by this place all the time when I\'m in Westwood, and for some reason, had the impression that it was some cool Irish/British joint from the outside. Stupid me. \n\nWe sat down and took one look at the menu, and it was anything but. It was probably one of the most random menus I\'ve ever seen in my life. They had all sorts of food, but I don\'t think it translated in a good way. It really had no focus, and it was shown in the quality of the food they put out. \n\nI ordered the clam chowder... I don\'t know what it was, but it was definitely not clam chowder. It tasted sour! Ew. So I didn\'t really have much to eat that night. Their onion rings were okay, but I think every American bar should get that down, so no kudos for okay onion rings. Rick said his burger was okay.\n\nBut it is a bar, and we still had fun despite the bad food. Its a great place to hang out and to drink. It got pretty rowdy in there, with all the karaoke. It\'s one of those bars that decorates by sticking random objects, pictures and gadgets on their walls and ceilings, which is fine by me. Kinda cool looking at all the random stuff. We talked, enjoyed a couple Tecate beers and watched Caddyshack on their many TVs. \n\nBottom line: I\'d come here to drink, but not to eat.\n\nJen\nwww.foodforhunters.blogspot.com', 'pos'), ("Grendel's is one of my go-to lunchtime spots in Harvard Square. First of all, it's crazy cheap. Like, eat-a-whole-meal-for-less-than-five-bucks cheap. The food isn't breaking down culinary barriers or anything, but it is definitely tasty. The sandwiches are especially good -- my favorites are the Grendel (roast beef with boursin cheese) and the French dip. Everything comes out super quickly; I don't think I've ever waited longer than 10 minutes for my food to arrive. I never have to worry that I won't make it back to the office in time when I come to Grendel's. \n\nThe service is solid. Grendel's isn't the kind of place where your waiter is going to fawn over you and make tons of idle chatter, but every server I've had has been pleasant and accommodating. I once asked for steamed veggies (not on the menu) instead of the standard potato chips with my sandwich, and the server didn't even bat an eye. I wasn't charged extra either, which was a nice surprise. If you're pressed for time and are looking for cheap eats in the square, give Grendel's a chance.", 'pos'), ("Shay's patio in the summer can't be beat.  But in the winter it is still a nice dive bar.  By dive I mean no frills, kind of dark, exposed pipes and bricks, floors a bit sticky.  I've also seen an actual bar fight there one night which was kind of exciting.  But for the most part its a chill place to meet for drinks.\n\nBeer and wine only but a good selection of both.", 'pos'), ('Even though Zifty adds a fee on top of the dishes offered, it has been heaven sent for our our project team this week- as we used them 3 of the 4 nights we stayed late working. \n\nThe only thing I would mention is that it takes 1.5 hours to have your food delivered (and you have to order by 9 PM) so be prepared but both of the delivery people were extremely nice and our food was handled with care. \n\nIf a group of people ever find themselves at the office late and at the office (and not wanting to run out), I would definitely recommend hitting up this place.', 'pos'), ('This is one of my favorite bars to hang out in Urbana. Whenever I feel like listening to some jazz music, I would check this place out because many local musicians play here. The food here is super CHEAP. I think the salmon burger is just $4 and 1lb fries for $2. It is excellent with their black pepper sauce. They have specials on other days as well.', 'pos'), ("Thanh Vi is one of our favorite places to go in the international district. The music is always hilarious (Alvin and the Chipmunks singing Christmas carols in October? I'm down), the decorations are pretty amusing (one of the paintings on the wall looks like it's Italian seaside rather than anything to do with Vietnam), but the food is definitely delightful and authentic. The servers are super nice (and if you look at the receipt, the servers have names like HappySmile2 instead of their names-adorable). \n\nOh, and once, they forgot to include one of my items in my takeout order, and when I came back to get it they gave me two free appetizers and a coupon for my next visit. I love places that acknowledge that they made a mistake and proactively make it better. Try the Vermicelli, the rare beef pho, or R12 (forget what it's called but it's one of my favorites).", 'pos'), ("Let me say that I have never been to Chicago, so I don't know how it's supposed to taste, but I do know how it is supposed to be prepared.\nDeep dish, thick crust, all the toppings, then sauce poured all over the top.  Also, this is the kind of pizza that must be eaten with a fork and spoon.\nThis was the first time I've had chicago style pizza and it was delicious.  Especially when paired with a beer that the guy with an awesome mustache recommended.", 'pos'), ('I really enjoy this bar a lot.  It has several rooms with lots of dark corners and plenty of tables for good conversation.  They have darts and pool and amazing plates of cheese.  The beer selection is good and there is plenty of parking on the street and in a lot that, depending on the time, is free.', 'pos'), ("I forgot what we were celebrating but we decided to come to Fleming's Steakhouse. The parking really sucks, I have been to this plaza a few times already and always forget where to walk up from the parking garage. We just sucked it up and paid for Valet because we were almost late for our reservation. The hostess was fantastic, we sat right away, the server was very nice. She answered all our questions and even gave recommendations of wines she likes best with out meat choices. \n\nWe ordered;\n-Sear Ahi Tuna with a mustard sauce\n-The Wedge Salad\n-Petite Filet Mignon\n-Prime Ribeye \nSides\n-Grilled Asparagus\n- Chipotle Mac'n'Cheese\nAnd we split a bottle of red wine that was so delicious it got me drunk after 1 1/2 glasses....\n\nThe dinner was delicious, from the ahi, salad to our steaks. The steaks were both cooked to our preference, by the time the dessert menu came we were both too stuffed. Prices are to be expected expensive but given our experience, definitely worth it. My only complaint was the lighting was a bit too low for me. But that's just me.", 'pos'), ("The only dumplings I consider good there are shrimp & pork or chicken & corn. The others are so-so. That being said, those two are quite good.\nAside from that, the service is pretty bad if you sit down and absolutely horrible when you order a delivery. They mixed up my order several times, got addresses wrong and did not refund me even when they said they would (I ended up disputing a charge on my credit card because I was fed up).\nIn short, it's a good dumpling place for the area, but save yourself grief and just call ahead and pick up (and make sure your order is correct...)\n\nEDIT: So I gave them one more star because honestly, these are the best dumplings around Columbia (if you stay away from the veggie or the mushroom ones..)\nService hasn't changed much in the sense that it's basically nonexistent.", 'pos'), ('I enjoy Fins. I got a Del Mar today (fish taco, shrimp burrito). I am surprised the combinations meals do not come with a drink though. \n\nOverall, I really enjoy Fins.', 'pos'), ("I used to love studying at Perks when the attached UCSD Bookstore didn't block off their un-purchased textbooks, and I could cheapskatingly do my readings in a nice cafe-setting without ever paying the price for required materials.\n\nSigh, I thought I was so clever, but the school administration must have caught on.\n\nAnyway, about Perks' coffee: It's decent. Think about this shop as a place to get your wiring-fix, and not so much a place to indulge. During the times I've usually ordered, I've only been half-alive, and would have been thankful for a drink a day-old, as long as it had a few pumps of espresso in it.\n\nConfession: I usually end up bringing my in-budget-purchased coffee from the Sunshine Store, here, instead. Since it's a university campus, no one minds, and even if they did, the cups are identical, and no one would be able to tell.\n\nBut really, Perks isn't so bad.\n\n(p.s. I promise I'm not as cheap as this review might have made me sound. Really.)", 'pos'), ("As a woman who works on her feet full time I regretfully say that I have never had a pedicure.  Until today that is.  What was I thinking?  I could not be happier with my experience at Queen Nail.  It was so so so clean which was very important for me.  I went late afternoon on a Monday and was the only person in there (which i enjoyed) But i suspect they'd be busier at a more high traffic time.  My pedicure was wonderful and the massage chair didn't hurt either! There is a quiet tv playing and a vast selection of trashy magazines (double thumbs up).  Worth every penny, and it wasn't that many seeing as the pedi was only 25!  You can pay on your debit/credit card but don't forget cash to tip these awesome ladies.", 'pos'), ("I was craving a bahn mi for lunch, but working in University City typically leaves me without any bahn mi options. Rather than venture into center city for my fix, I decided to wander around on campus at the lunch hour. I happened upon Chez Yasmine at 37th and Spruce in front of Vance Hall and was immediately excited to find tofu bahn mi on the menu, along with a number of other veg-friendly options. \n\nWoo, that was one spicy sandwich. I asked the food truck chef to go light on the spice and he obliged, but I also made the mistake of biting into one of the jalepenos. Yowza. It was delicious, overall. The spiced ground tofu, slices of cucumber and shredded carrots were nestled inside of a delightful crusty baguette. It was very nice, and I was especially excited to have a vegetarian sandwich to add to my work lunch options. I'll definitely come back and try out one of the other vegetarian options like the Gretchen quinoa salad or the Vegetarian Couscous. The owner/chef was very enthusiastic and warm. He took my picture for his facebook customer album and it made me feel very welcome.", 'pos'), ('Legals is known all over and I like this branch the best. It is comfortable not very big and feels less of a chain the rest. The seafood and the fish is consistently fresh.\n\nFood Rating = 4 Stars\nService Rating = 4 Stars\nDecor Rating = 4 Stars', 'pos'), ('My favorite place for lunch or brunch when I\'m in Cambridge.\n\nHenrietta\'s Table runs on the philosophy that everything should be fresh.  All of their ingredients are from local farmers and their seasonal menu changes several times to reflect seasonal ingredients.  \n\nA magnet for celebrities (Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Bill and Hill), HT is not glitzy or hip, but relazed, homey, kind of rustic with muted sophistication.  \n\nEverything on the menu is fantastic.  I always go with the crab cakes or an omelet.  French toast is amazing too!  Seasonal breads are baked fresh and will leave you craving more.  \n\nOne thing to note is that Henrietta\'s Table is very active with the Farm School - a farm in western mass. that has an apprenticeship program for area children.  How cool is that?  At your table, you will also find Farmer Cards that tell you about the farm and farmer who raised the vegetables on the menu.  Charming and fantastic!!  The front of the restaurant also has a mini retail section where you can purchase spices, kitchen gadgets and various condiments and snacks.  I\'ve bought several "Henrietta" stuffed pigs as gifts.  \n\nI absolutely recommend HT for Brunch, Lunch or Dinner.  You will not be disappointed.  A side note: Henrietta\'s Table\'s name comes from the owner of the restaurant, who had a pig named Henrietta while growing up.  How cute is that??', 'pos'), ('Epic!  One of the greatest concerts ever.  Muse and Rage were amazing.  First time hearing Rise Against.  They were powerful.    \n\nIt was fun seeing fires, crowd surfers and moshing on the floor but I am glad I had seats just to the right of the stage - front row!', 'pos'), ("I've been here one time.   My girlfriend and I were seated and greeted promptly.  The service was attentive and well-timed.  The two desserts we ordered were delivered in a reasonable amount of time.\nThey were good like I expected them to be, after viewing the prices prior to entering the restaurant.  However, no matter what restaurant I attend, I always scowl upon paying more than 6 or 7 bucks for dessert.\nUnfortunately, I guess you have to pay the price for the reassurance of receiving a dessert that is above average, and the creative display.\nThe coffee was decent too.  Will I go back......maybe.....I guess I wasn't left with a memorable impression of the place.  I give 3 stars for the decent service, dessert, and coffee.", 'pos'), ("I got the steak burrito.  It was very good!!!  I'm only giving it\na 4 stars because there was not enough cheese in it.  They give strips\nof beef which actually tasted good.  Much better than La \nBurrita", 'pos'), ("I have yet to have a better Paneer Tikka Masala! The samosas here aren't as good as Naan N Curry, but they are still worth ordering.\n\nThey also open until midnight, so it is sometimes a good idea to stop by after bears lair! But... just be careful the next morning = )", 'pos'), ("I've been a fairly serious cyclist for 15 years or so and I've never encountered a friendlier owner or staff. Charlie the owner will never sell you stuff you don't need and his prices are always fair. I bought my second bike from him (the previous one was 2 bikes and many years ago) last year and I am very happy to call this shop my cycling home again. Got a very nice deal and was able to get the bike tailored to the terrain I ride in with no hassle. Plus-what's not to love about Bianchi bikes.", 'pos'), ("I'm in the minority, I just don't get this place.  Try it once, sure, but I can't understand why people come back and wait in line again.  $1.50 for an ice cream sandwich isn't as shockingly amazing to me as it seems to be for everyone else.  Maybe it's because they looked at the Pizookie prices across the street first, which indeed make Diddy Riese look like an awesome deal.  Meh.", 'pos'), ("Love the 2 dollar side salad that comes with a dish! Not a fantastic salad, but pretty big and filling especially if you're sharing the dish with a friend. \n\nAnything not tomato-based is done strictly Paula Deen style:  all butter all the time. Chicken parmesean is pretty good, the chicken tends to get a little soggy though because it's absolutely covered with melted cheese. \n\nAgain, if you're going to get the calzone, which I highly recommend, but don't want to wait around awkwardly standing next to the drink machine, just call ahead and pick it up. Chances are you'll wait around a few minutes anyway.\n\nExtra star for convenience sake! \n\nIf you're in the Asian Ghetto, this is a pretty safe bet. Avoid it during peak dinner/lunch hours as the line can get pretty fatty.\n\nI wonder how many hours the owner works there, I see him everytime in his knitted sweater and glasses despite how stuffy and hot it gets in the back kitchen. The man must have no sweat glands.", 'pos'), ("Family Visit spot #4:\nMy family was in town this past week and we did A LOT of drinking and eating.  These reviews are a series of those drinking and eating spots.  \n\nWe had lunch at Madam Mam's on the drag because we were looking for FLAVOR!  Madam Mam's has never failed to have great flavor.  The spring rolls were amazing, as always.\nWe were all quite shocked by the amount of SALT in every entree this go-round.  Mom had the Nom Tok salad and we choaked on the salty beef.  We also shared the Tom-Kha soup which was ridiculously salty, as was the seafood Tom Yum.  Flavorful, yes...but too damn salty!", 'pos'), ("I really hate the smell of olives.  At least the little black ones that end up on pizza.  It almost reminds me of wet paint and makes me want to retch.  And this place smelt like it, strongly.\n\nIt may have made me a bit grumpy towards it.\n\nThe pizza itself is nothing special to write home about.  It has interesting ingredients true, it has more variety than dominos, but what it lacks is heart.  Soul.  \n\nThe ingredients are finely cut, but they lack freshness and richness of flavor.  It's like they were placed on the crust after waiting all day in bins to be called.  It's dull, lifeless.  Not a pleasure to eat.", 'pos'), ('3 stars because their prices are reasonable, but the food lacks flavor.', 'pos'), ("TEN STARS for this place.  \n\n1.  The atmosphere is fantastic.  We sat in the back corner with the perfect amount of sunlight and restaurant light.  It's quaintly and romantically decorated.  The front room/bar has an awesome fireplace to sit by.  \n\n2.  The service is wonderful.  Attentive, helpful and patient.  \n\n3.  The food.  Whoa.  SO GOOD.  I had the linguine con carciofi with shrimp.  It was perfectly prepared and light.  I didn't feel weighed down by eating a big pasta dish.  I had a really amazing dessert, but for some reason what it was escapes me (damn the delicious red wine...).\n\n4.  The aforementioned wine - great selection and very very nice.  \n\n5.  I'd recommend this place to anyone.  If I didn't have such a thing for trying new restaurants, I'd probably just keep going here and never expand my circle...\n\nWay to go Red House!", 'pos'), ("My boyfriend always raved about the Raven Grill so I came over here for lunch with a friend one day.\n\nThis place is pretty unique.  I really like the lay out of the restaurant and it has this super chill atmosphere.  The server was nice and I can see myself coming here having more lunch dates with my girlfriends :) \n\nOkay, food... I tried their Grilled Salmon Salad (dressing on the side of course!).  The salmon was grilled almost perfect.  I typically do not like cooked salmon, but this one was tasty.  The lemon caper vinaigrette was very flavorful and paired well with the salmon.  The serving size of this dish was huge as well.  I was pretty stuffed afterwards and was ready for a nap.  \n\nSince I was here with a friend and not my boyfriend, I acted like a lady and had one item and no appetizer nor dessert.  I know... very out of character for myself, but I'll be back to try more items :) \n\nThe parking lot here is interesting... it's a one-way and there didn't seem to be a lot of parking slots (so you might want to try street parking if there are any).  This place seems casual so I don't think there's a dress code.", 'pos'), ('We were walk-ins, and i was ready to bolt out the door (I hate that unwelcome, second-class lurker feeling when trying to scam a table at a "fully committed" restaurant). \n\nI credit the lovely waitress who saw us standing awkwardly waiting for a few seats at the bar to open up with making me stay. She greeted us warmly, gave us two glasses of water, and generally made us feel welcome and comfortable. We soon settled into our seats at the bar, ready to make it an evening. I LOVED being seated at the bar. It was better than a regular table for a jumpy, need-my-water-filled immediately type like me who hates searching for a server throughout the meal. My server was right there, behind the bar, the whole time, whirling up cool cocktails with tinctures and retro bottles of spirits. He was there when we needed him, and was so friendly and pleasant. As were the servers who brought out our 6 course vegetarian tasting menu. We aren\'t vegetarians, but I\'ve always wanted to try super-elevated veggie tasting menu by a top chef, and wow, we did it! Amazing. \n\nBut if anyone on staff is reading this: you could have served crackers and  cheese and I would have been happy b/c we were treated warmly, kindly, and sincerely by each and every person we encountered on staff. The food was flawless, but to be treated with unfailing warmth and kindness was the true magic.', 'pos'), ("A fantastic little record store, hidden in the basement of Autumn Leaves. I know better than to go down there unless I have at least an hour and $50 to spare, because I always find what I'm looking for and then some.\n\nThey have a very broad selection, and their jazz section is especially great. While the new releases are a little on the pricey side, I don't mind paying those higher prices, because I think it helps them to keep their used prices very reasonable. I've never bought a used record there that I felt was overpriced once I got it home and listened to it. \n\nThe guys are very friendly and knowledgeable, both about music and about how to take care of records. They don't mind if you browse for a long time, and they have listening stations set up where you can try out used records before you buy them. \n\nThey participate in National Record Store Day promotions, and they have a great selection of even the rarest releases on that day. This is also a great place to pick up tickets for all non-State Theater Dan Smalls Presents shows, since there's no service charge on them.\n\nIf you're a vinyl lover like I am, make sure to check this place out when you're in Ithaca!", 'pos'), ("I love Pinkberry, but this location is significantly smaller than others and understaffed -- also, they don't have some of the toppings that they do at other locations.\n\nNone-the-less it's still great and I'll be back again and again.", 'pos'), ("Oh word!\n\nI just got a deep tissue massage for a whopping $53!  \n\nThe Early Bird Special is comprised of a 60 minutes Swedish massage for $43, Mon-Fri, 9am - 2pm!  If you get a deep tissue massage, they add on $10 more.  So I paid $53 for a deep tissue massage! \n\nEva kneaded out all the knots and kinks in my shoulders and upper back!  She was professional and oh so good!  The place isn't Burke Williams ... but if you're just there for a massage, this place is the way to go!\n\nAwesome massage at a cheap price!  You can't get any better than this!", 'pos'), ("I'm not sure what I was expecting, but I know it wasn't this. \n\nGourmet heaven is like a convenience store and a deli all in one, but if I'm being honest, I saw no sign of gourmet or heaven. There's a deli counter with both pre-made and to-order sandwiches, salads and the like, and a refrigerated meat section, too. There are a few aisles of dry goods - sauces, soups, crackers, snacks - and a small selection of boxed cookies and sweets. All the way in the back, you'll find the cold beverage section with an assortment of aloe vera juice, iced teas and waters. It took me a good five minutes to find what I wanted and be done with it. \n\nThey also have a large array of condoms, gum, and even a few shower curtains, which leads me to believe it is intended to be a one-stop shopping option for JWU students who don't have a car to get to a proper grocery store. I wouldn't go out of my way to go here again.", 'pos'), ('Great product, good service.  Low on variety.  Clean store.', 'pos'), ("Dear Saag Paneer,\n\nDon't you dare try to run away. Doing so will only prolong the inevitable. Get in my mouth. Give my tongue indescribeable pleasure. \n\nLove and kisses,\nMe", 'pos'), ('Good lunch joint. Really liked the garlic eggplants (but I almost always like eggplants!), while the ginger chicken and the curry where just OK. The combination plate is a pretty good deal and the food from the buffet seem to be pretty freshly cooked (at least during rush hour).\n\nThe ambiance is very college-cafeteria like, but I guess it is to expect so close to campus..... also the lady at the counter had problems with the cashier and could not provide me with a receipt, which I kind of needed for reimbursement, I guess I could have insisted, but I just decided my time was not worth the price of the lunch.....\n\nA pretty good buffet, but always a buffet.....', 'pos'), ("Easily my favorite pizza joint in La Jolla.  It's a locally owned restaurant, and tons of students and residents come here.  It's a good place to grab some food if you're on the run (i.e. quick bite before a night of endless drinking?  haha - the good old days) \n\nTheir Chicago deep dish pizzas are delicious!  The portions are pretty big and definitely satisfying.  \n\nMy personal favorites:\n- Sopressata pizza\n- Meat lovers deep dish pizza\n- Homemade minestrone soup  \n- Rigatoni chicken pesto pasta\n- Tiramisu! (although I'm not sure if they actually MAKE it at the restaurant)\n- Cannoli!!  (super yummy)\n\nOutdoor seating is available too!\n\nOne thing I'm not too crazy about - the pizzas can get pretty oily.. runny oily.. which can be pretty gross..", 'pos'), ("Okay, everyone knows that in-n-out is amazing... so ill talk about the facility. the parking sucks because its westwood, but there's some metered parking across the street by the gas station. there's sometimes ENORMOUS lines that go into the main street because of the volume of people in the drive through which is pretty annoying.  if your'e walking though, this place is pretty good... its def one of the largest in-n-outs i've been too. probably a good choice on behalf of the owners, with the ucla and those USC students who invade westwood.\n\ngreat service, as  i think some of the people who work there are also students.", 'pos'), ("The food is alright, something I can make myself, but for a higher price -- exactly what you would expect from westwood! I agree with most reviews that the food isn't amazing , BUT, it isn't terrible either. i like the seafood pasta, i just wouldn't pay $8.50 for it....i can make a huge portion for half the price, if i just go to ralphs.\n\nthe gelato though, is yummy yummy. and pretty cheap i think. and they're pretty fast, everyone in my group of 5 got their food within 5 minutes. one star for each of this. mediocre food should get half a star, but since they don't it makes the total 3. but i would technically give it 2.5 stars.", 'pos'), ('We sampled the Takiyoku balls, little gems containing octopus and topped with bonita flakes. They had good flavor but the octopus was a little chewy. The veggie balls with mushroom were very good, and had a nice flavor "zip" from ginger and kewpie mayo. \n\nOverall, very tasty stuff.', 'pos'), ("Sometimes I foolishly forget that this is down the road from my place, but I have just recently started going again regularly, and though it's a quick trip, I always find something I need or have been craving without any problems. It is a real PA Dutch market (Though I don't think the people who run the place are Amish, maybe Mennenite? Also there is a butcher when you first come in and they wear baseball caps and are def. not Amish) and the prices are reasonable, and everything is clearly marked and displayed. I finally was able to find here the thick-cut bacon that I love to use in my recipes (after resorting to regular bacon or worse, ham) at a good price. I also love their fresh pretzels, their selection of cheese, butter (5 bucks for a sleeve the size of my arm of butter! nuts!). Their vegetable section could stand to carry more things, but I don't know how that works. Anyway, also the last Saturday of each month they have a pig roast. I've never gotten anything from the snack bar during those times, but I've seen their giant pulled pork sandwiches and people gorging themselves on them, so they can't be that bad. \n\nNote- only opened Thursday-Saturday. When I use to work at home on Thursdays, I would go and it wouldn't be that bad. Saturday mornings are nightmares, so sometimes I even wait until 2 to go when the crowds thin out.  The Saturday morning crowds are also a bit nuts, and be prepared to be pegged in the shin by many a shopping cart. They take only cash but there is an ATM there and also in the convenience store further down in the same shopping plaza.", 'pos'), ("Massive salads and tall thick sandwiches on housebaked bread.  The flavor isn't that super great, but for quantity and price it's a hungry student's dream come true.\n\nVan Halen and G n R blasting...", 'pos'), ('I think this bakery is outstanding . Hands down Sumi makes the best pastries the tarts are to die for', 'pos'), ('Summary based on many visits:\n--classic TD menu \n--ok service, so not like Southside and even somewhat better than Northside\n--parking challenging, but not impossible\n--consider avoiding weekdays at lunch when BHS students abound', 'pos'), ("I love Casey's Tavern:\n\nFood is great - staff are wonderful and sometimes charmingly quirky...many have worked there for years. Burgers are fantastic and sandwiches are high quality. Yum.\n\nTry getting a hot pastrami on rye with raw onions and Gryuere,  plus a side of their awesome garlicky ranch dressing for your fries - it will give you breath-of-death but it's sooo delicious.\n\nMy husband and I are also addicted to their fried artichoke hearts...mmm.", 'pos'), ("Probably a 3.5 star. As a Bay Area person and someone who lived in India for couple of months, I can easily tell good from bad Indian foods. This place has a variety of traditional buffet dishes such as Chicken Tikka, Tandoori, Dals, Aloos, etc., and adheres closely with the municipal sanitary standard. If this place was in the Bay Area I could only give it a 3 star, but come on, despite LA hosts a large Indian population, the quality of Indian food here is not comparable to the Bay's. Plus 0.5 stars for the sweet services you dont normally get at Buffet establishments.", 'pos'), ('Went here for valentines day last year. We were able to make VERY last minute reservations when everywhere else turned us down they said they could find room for us. The restaurant is an old two story home. Very resonable prices for five star fine dinning service. Great wine selections. Wines by the glass pour is very generous and also great prices. We only got to see the selected menu but everything we had was perfect. The ambiance is very romantic! You can sit downstairs, upstairs or near the fireplace or patio. The gentlement who sat us seemed as he was the owner very friendly energetic and helpful, LOVED EVERY MINUTE OF IT!', 'pos'), ("I was introduced to this place by my cousin. He's a regular here and the girl Amy who worked there always said hi to him by name.  Sometimes we're here a couple of time a week for lunch. The sandwiches and fries are awesome. My favorite is the chicken salad club, Cuban and BBQ pork. 5 stars for the sandwiches and for the friendly staff...especially Amy. The decor is pretty plan but whatever. The food is great. \n\nI was just starting to become a regular here and Amy actually asked my name and would say hi to me whenever I came in. But as of  Feb 2nd, they are under new ownership and Amy no longer works there. I'm sad to see her go and I just hope the place doesn't change to much. I was in today to pic up a phone order and was a little disappointed that they got our order wrong. We ordered a chicken salad club and BBQ chicken and got a tuna salad club instead. Still yummy but not what I wanted.", 'pos'), ("LOVE bacaro.\nThe place itself is pretty small, but that's part of what makes it great. The selection is pretty fantastic, and the owner's definitely know their stuff so ask them what they recommend! It's a great place to relax with a friend over a bottle of wine.", 'pos'), ("Word association.\n\nMiddlesex Lounge:\n\nRed Stripe\n\nMortar Shell\n\nRubix Cube\n\nSchrodinger's Box\n\nProjection Screen\n\nModern Furniture\n\nHallway\n\nDoor\n\nStreet\n\nTaxi", 'pos'), ('This is the best of all worlds:  Great food in the store and other great places just around the corner.   Toscano\'s is an inexpensive yet delicious sandwich shop with awsome Italian food market included.  Grab some pesto and pasta for your late evening snacking pleasure.  They have an excellent selection of packaged foods from Italy that are difficult to find elsewhere.  They also have refridergerators and freezers with prepared foods that are made in house.  If you like the sandwichs then you will not be disappointed with these items.  Also, great selection of Italian wines.  While the selection is limited in quanitiy, the selections are of a dependable high quality with resonalbe prices, like starting below $10.\n\nFollowing your soup and sandwich fare, HOP two doors down to the best craft beer store in town, "HopCity" where you can experience the best beer selection in town (both bottled and draft to go, ergo "growler"). \n\nIt\'s interesting how a business like Toscano & Sons EXCEEDS at providing a delightful experience that is a complete VALUE.', 'pos'), ("So, I visited this small dog joint last year... I probably should have written a review then, so as to capture the sensory details of the crackling and juices.\n\nNow, if I recall correctly, there is no topping (my bad) this joint: the Bockwurst has a nice snap to it when you bite into it. The interior of the building is the quaint type you'll encounter along Durant Avenue, unique to Berkeley's college town, the one with age and character. I would describe it as a no-frills, more-substance-than-style enclosed hot dog stand (more than a restaurant, as it is cramped), but that is by no means a bad thing. The condiments are nice, but overall the quality of the sausage grilled atop the flat steel tabletop is the most amazing thing about the place. My memory of the place is quite fond; perhaps the crisp Berkeley air or the munchies contributed to the overall ambiance of the Top Dog experience, but there it is.\n\nUnlike the pretentious, cookie-cutter chain restaurants of Orange County, Top Dog truly stands out. The grillmen are expert, probably from decades of experience, and take their trade seriously.\nThe food is rich in history, flavor, and texture; but cheap in price (a rare quality where I currently hail from---Irvine, I'm eyeballin' ye -_-).\n\nif I ever do visit Berkeley again, I will *most definitely* drop by Top Dog and post an updated review. :)", 'pos'), ("Love comics but don't want to deal with creepy fanboys?  This is the place to go!\n\nI was pleasantly surprised by this store!  \n\nNot only do they have a great selection of current comics, they also have many graphic novels, a bit of manga, a great selection of independent books & comics,  and friendly staff!", 'pos'), ("Curse NJ highways. \n\nCurse NJ highways with copious stoplights and no left or u-turns, with horribly dangerous situations where people are turning right at 15 mph and people in the middle and left lane are going 50. You are the reason I missed the entrance to Whole Foods and decided it wasn't worth the 20 minutes it would take to loop back around.\n\nBut I guess thanks to the horrible situation mentioned above, I turned off at the next exit and happened upon Wegmans, a worthy alternative. I discovered about 5 new types of apples (you mean there's more than fuji and gala?). \n\nTons of fresh produce and healthy foods at a reasonable price. The only problem I saw was tons of empty produce bins. I guess they switch things out around 9 pm - bad for me but good for everyone else who doesn't shop at weird hours. \n\nDefinitely will be back, though hopefully to a more convenient location that is not off the dreaded 1.", 'pos'), ('Consistently fresh and flavorful, Koja is one of my go-to lunch joints. I\'m fairly inexperienced with both Korean and Japanese, but Koja\'s dishes seem reasonably authentic. I\'m a huge fan of the flat rice noodles and the udon noodles. After they\'re boiled, the noodles are thrown on the flat top grill where they pick up the most wonderful char. And there\'s just enough oil to cook and flavor the noodles. The shredded cabbage and sesame seeds provide additional texture and flavor. I ask for "medium spicy" which has a substantial kick without being painful. Sometimes, when it\'s freezing out, the owner gives you free hot tea while you wait! The noodle portions are very generous.', 'pos'), ("My three month old baby had a fever and swelling.  Our pediatrician told us to take him to the E.R.  I understand the concept of triage, and hence I understand why, after baby's vitals were taken, we weren't their top priority.  The medical care we received was top notch.  Three doctors saw him, as did several nurses.  We eventually got a private room for him to sleep in.  Baby got his prescritpion and, 12 hours later, we were home.  \n\nRonald Reagan UCLA is ranked #3 in the nation.  The facilities are state-of-the-art, its doctors and nurses are world class.  I am grateful to have these facilities close to us.\n\nMy only criticism is that 12 hours is WAY TOO LONG for us to have been in the hospital.  We were there literally over night.  \n\nWhat would make them five stars, in my book, would be for them to open a 24 hour Urgent Care facility.  That way, when those of us with urgent medical needs show up, we don't have to constantly wait for the more life threatening patients to receive their care.", 'pos'), ("Hands down the best tri tip sandwich ever!  I also had their onion rings which was amazing as well.\n\n The only thing I didn't like was their steak cobb salad, I only got it because I saw some girl next to me eat it and it looked good, but it didn't taste all that great. \n\nNote: Please be prepared to run a few miles, crunches, lunges and a session of insanity if you decide to eat here, it's dangerously good but dangerously fattening but well worth the sweat =)", 'pos'), ("Neil is awesome. We sent a few emails back and forth about what we were looking for, and when we came in, he pulled out a tray of about 15 diamonds covering a broad spectrum of quality. He unwrapped about 5 at a time, telling us what the differences were, demonstrating how to use the magnifier to find the flaws in each diamond, and taking us outside to show how they look in natural light. As we slowly eliminated diamonds that were outside our desired parameters, he took them away and replaced them with new ones, until we found one that was perfect for us. We wouldn't have picked this stone before coming in, but Neil's demonstrations helped us discover what qualities were important to us, and we are extremely happy with our decision.\n\nThe best part about this process is that we never felt rushed at any point during the 4 hours we were there. Neil made this explicitly clear to us, and each time he was done answering our questions, he popped out to the back so we could have a private conversation about what we thought of the diamonds. We also felt like he had more stones to pull out if we were dissatisfied about any aspect, and in the end, we picked our diamond because we were sure we would not ever be able to find a better one.\n\nThe prices here are amazing - comparable to Blue Nile or Costco, but with the immeasurable benefit of having an actual jeweler. Neil's post-purchase policy was another major factor in our decision - any regular maintenance on the ring would be covered for life. He also offers upgrades on rings, although he charges a restocking fee on the diamond, which he explained is a precaution against future fluctuations in diamond prices.", 'pos'), ("There is a few things I like about this place, great atmosphere, good customer service and tons of cute USC students.\n\nWhat I don't like is the price. I think it's cheaper at Chipotle. \n\nThe first time I went, the guy at the counter was awesome, made me laugh, cracked jokes, etc. Second time I went, the girl was tired, rude and just tried to rush me off. I sat down to eat and mind you they were about to close but I didn't think it really mattered because the first time around the workers were cleaning but still offering water or napkins etc. The last time I was there, it was like they wanted me to just eat outside so they could leave. Kinda left a sour taste in my mouth. I'll stick to Chipotle.", 'pos'), ("I love this place! It is definitely my favorite Mexican restaurant in the area. I probably average a couple of visits per week. \n\nEVERYTHING here is good. I don't think I've had anything that I don't like. They have a great carnitas plate and the tacos are awesome. \n\nThey have STRONG margaritas. Seriously strong. If you're feeling especially courageous, go for the cadillac margarita. If you drink more than one, you probably won't remember much of dinner. So, in other words, thumbs up on the margaritas. \n\nParking can be a little bit annoying when it's busy, but I usually park across the street in the evening (when the other businesses are closed) and have never had an issue with this.", 'pos'), ("Total fan of this place.  The price is reasonable, the food is delicious and innovative, and make sure to grab a glass of the cucumber water. Get over the fact that it's small and you're not getting the fine dining experience of Real Food Daily. The food here is easily comparable, the workers are all cool, and you're definitely full after you eat.  I dig it.\n\nMy favorite things to get:\n\nNative Nachos\nOklahoma Burger (Bacon and Cheese)", 'pos'), ("I've lived near punjabi by nature for a while and I never took the time to try it out but I'm glad I finally did.\n\nThe first time I went here I figured they could justify such a cheap price for the buffet by charging for the naan. I was wrong, the naan is free unless you get the specialty naan, then it's a couple of bucks extra. \n\nThe food here is pretty decent, not the best indian food but it's way decent for the price. I'm a huge fan of the zucchini and, of course, the tiki masala.  \n\nThe food's a little hit or miss with the rice sometimes being overcooked, but overall, it's a way decent meal for the price.", 'pos'), ('Great Place for soup and salad and maybe a quiche at lunch. Service is great !', 'pos'), ("Small Italian pizzeria serving up the best handmade pizza and cannolis in the ATL.  Pizza is freshly made with all the best ingredients.  In the back room you can see the chefs slicing the sweet peppers, rolling the dough, picking the basil, you name it.  The pizza is also the perfect balance between soft and chewy yet crispy.  We had the San Gennaro and it was out of this world.  Sausage was tasty and flavorful, peppers were bursting with flavor, bufala you could only imagine. Since the pizza is so fresh, you don't feel stuffed and bloated when you're done with it.  They don't serve beer or wine but I've heard you can bring them in, not sure about the corkage fee though.  And the cannolis - you can't leave without trying one.  We bought the vanilla with chocolate chip, pistachio, and chocolate.  Chocolate was too rich; pistachio was very good but I think the chocolate chip was my favorite.   Wish I had an Antico in DC!", 'pos'), ('We\'re not talking food for royalty here (unlike a decent In-N-Out Double Double), but bear with me.. If the Fat Combo had a genesis myth, it would go something like this:\n\n"And the Lord said unto Moises, \'Build thee a crust of remarkable height, breadth, and width, strong enough to bear the weight of a great burden, yet yielding to the softest of palates.  Anoint it with a sauce of tomato, and adorn it with a fine coat of mozzarella.  Call forth two of every vegetable, and seven of every delicious and savory meat on Earth, and stack them, one upon another, until thy work has stretched nigh to the gates of Paradise itself.  And ye shall call it the Fat Combo.\'  Moises did as God had commanded him.  And it was Good."\n\nEverything else there is very "Meh"; but I\'m feeling generous:  5 stars for the Fat Combo, the Lord\'s great and terrible Instrument to strike down the gluttonous (albeit in sheer delight).  That\'s averages to about a 4 if you\'re scoring at home.\n\nOh, and God, in case you\'re an avid Yelper, I\'m sorry for the gratuitous use of  Your Name without Thy Express Written Consent.\n/Catholic guilt', 'pos'), ("Average, status-quo, run-of-the-mill. They can all be used to describe this Oakland stop for Mexican food. In terms of location, its convenient for those venturing from the Hillman Library looking for a cheap/quick bite to eat.\n\nThe service is always prompt and everyone working there is polite. Prices are cheap compared to the commercial chains (Qdoba/Chipotle) located nearby, and even cheaper if you mention that you're a college student.\n\nFood is standard mexican fare, though their burritos are quite bland without an extra side of salsa and loads of hot sauce. If you're starving and are short on time, stop by, but for others looking for authentic mexican with some sort of flavor look elsewhere.", 'pos'), ("Always really loud and crowded but the food is pretty reliable pub fare.  Given some of the waits you'll encounter in Harvard Square, John Harvard's is a pretty good compromise if you're looking for a relatively inexpensive meal...and quickly.  I typically stick to the burgers and sandwiches...nachos the usual.  It's actually a great place to get large groups of people together too...and it's pretty easy to get a drink at the bar.\n\nIf you're meeting friends, be sure to solidify your plans in advance.  It's like a cell phone dead zone in there - I feel like nobody can get cell phone service down there!", 'pos'), ('Wonderful!  My rear bumper was FULL of scrapes, dings, even a hole the size of a dime.  When someone backed into the corner of the bumper I took it in to have the crack and scrapes from that incident fixed.  When we picked up the car they had repaired the ENTIRE bumper for no extra charge.  It looks so great!  They were friendly and accommodated my busy work-travel schedule.\n\nThe work was done when they said it would be, looks perfect and the price could not be beat.  I will definitely go here again when I give in and decide to get my door dings fixed!', 'pos'), ("This is the University of North Carolina's one-stop shop for everything you might need whether you're  a student or a fan on campus for a game. \n\nStudent Stores has by far the best collection of Carolina apparel with Nike, New Era, and Under Armor. As far as collectables go, Johnny T-Shirt (on nearby Franklin Street)  has Student Stores beat by a bit, but not by much. The big difference between Student Stores and the Carolina Shops on Franklin Street is that, where you might find a similar set of products in the Franklin Street shops, Student Stores gives some overlap, but is mostly products you won't find on Franklin Street. \n\nThe Store also features a mini-mart, the Daily Grind coffee shop, Bull's Head Book Shop, a US Post Office, an entire floor of textbooks, and a tech shop downstairs. Student Stores is newly remodeled and they really did a great job. \n\nFor textbooks Student Stores tends to be the most expensive and the mini-mart has a slight mark-up. Other than that this is really a super store.", 'pos'), ("I agree with Brittney M. on how hard it is to find a nail place in or near Shadyside. However Shadyside Nail Salon does good job though one of my gripes is that you have to find street parking.\n\nThe salon itself is clean and you don't typically wait that long. When you enter the store, you write your name and the services that you wish to receive. Nice selection of colors from brands like Essie and OPI. The staff is really friendly though english tends to not be their first language. Good job on manicures and pedicures, and reasonably priced though I am still on a quest to find a nail salon in the area for the same prices but with hot stone massages and paraffin treatment (I have been spoiled by Cali nail salons). Note that you should bring cash for tip.", 'pos'), ("Great if you are looking for fast, cheap, and good.\n\nI get the falafel sandwich every time I'm in the area and love it! You can add some extra condiments on the side which is also great.\n\nI also love the chips (and never had any digestive issues with them). Great to dip in with some of the other sauces/dips.", 'pos'), ('Fresh Comfort Food Kicked up a Notch!\n\nWOWZA PALOOZA~ this place is simply perfect. My boyfriend found it my accident looking for this other Hot Dog place for dinner.\n\nAfter a LONG day of shopping I really needed something to refuel me. This place knows how to SET A MOOD.\n\nImmediately when you walk in, you notice how Clean and Cool it is, it\'s new age classic.\n\nThe menu is written on big chalk boards, and the first thing I noticed were the Bleu Cheese Sweet Potoato Fries. OMG are you kidding me? Sounded amazing!\n\nI knew I was gonna get the fries so on to the DOG. I Like the options that they have for toppings, and I really like the Build Your Own option..\n\nBUT..\n\nNo need for me, once I read the Master Creations that they had available already, My mouth immediately started to water. I decided to try the GRAND SLAM and WHOA was it ever!\n\nGrand Slam= \n*Huge Dog (i think they might be Hebrew National-they tasted amazing) \n*Bacon (this bacon is THICK CUT and cooked to PERFECTION)\n*Tots (TaterToTs on a hot dog, OMG)\n*Fried Egg (Fried perfectly I might add, the white part was cooked fully and the yolk was gooey and oozy but not RUNNY-aaaamazing)\n*Hawaiian Sweet Roll (Don\'t be mistaken, it was three rolls combined to create the perfect bun for this savory dog)\n\nThis combo was already glorious, but I decided to add avacado and take a trip to glory city. GOOD CHOICE ON MY PART\n\nI ordered one of the Bottled Orange Cream Sodas (sounded good, but I\'ll probably get the root beer next time)\n\nDesign:\nWe walked to a table near the back and sat down, observing the cool and sleek cozy city style of the place. \nI really liked how they chose mat paint for the walls-very modern.\nThe tables were really cool-huge dark wood slats on wheels with trendy stools to match. \nThe lighting was perfect (finally a restaurant that GETS IT) I don\'t want lights blinding me while I\'m trying to eat much less have a conversation.\nTop it off with some tunes and I\'m happy- good job Dog Haus.\n\nDidn\'t take TOO long for our food to arrive...As soon as I got my dog I was excited to check out their extensive condiments bar---NICE TOUCH!\n\nWith a little mayo and some spicy mustard I\'m good to Grub-don\'t wanna take away from the flavors.\n\nTHE DOG:\n*The Bun was Soft and Sweet...YUM!\n*The hot dog was Delicious and Juicy-no burning my tongue here!\n*The Bacon was COOKED to PERFECTION-no chewy fatty pieces, perfectly crisped, thick cut bacon-OMFG\n*Avacado-Very fresh and vibrant green-I\'m happy guys.. really.\n*The Egg was "over Medium" no white gooey parts-pure golden glaze--yumm\n*The TOTS-perfect (but lets be honest, who can screw up tots)\n\nNeedless to say the dog was demolished-completely..SOo GOOOOD\n\nBut what about the Bleu Cheese Sweet Potato Fries?? Well guys don\'t get too excited cause I\'ll never order them again-i thought it was gonna be chunks of blue cheese, but it was a dressing and it was NOT good.\n\nI\'ll get the fries again, but not the Blue Cheese Ones...\n\n$$$=super reasonable-around 6 bucks for a delicious loaded dog.\n\nThey also have brats and burgers-I\'m coming back for sure!\n\nOVERALL I wish i could rate them a 4.5 but i can\'t--so they get a 5 due to the fact they the dogs are so CREATIVE and DELICIOUS-the quality of the food is spot on and the condiment bar is very unique and diverse. (Curry Ketchup, Gray Poupon, Spicy Mustard and much much more!)\n\nI\'ll be going back SOON and I absolutely love this place...!!! You should definately go.\n\n******CHECK OUT THE 6 PHOTOS THAT I ADDED******', 'pos'), ("Nobi is friendly and enthusiastic. The store is beautiful, and their selection grew nicely when they moved. Any wine the sell under $14 is not worth buying, unfortunately. Where's the simple, drinkable $10 weeknight table wine that you can find anywhere else?", 'pos'), ('The pepperoni pizza is better here.', 'pos'), ('Nice facility. Terrible customer service. Price is good. Lack of trainers. They get the 3 star only because of price.', 'pos'), ('Fondly called "The Box".  Yummy Box has been there when we\'ve needed a quick sushi or udon fix.  Its close to our house so convenience gave it that extra star.  Its a tiny place in a strip mall near UCSD, lots of students and professor types.  Sushi is pretty standard, but this place does good box (mix of salad, soup, rolls, rice, terriaki-style meat).  Although, within the last few months they remodeled the place, and increased the prices.  The fancy chairs and light fixtures must have cost a lot. Now the box is less appealing.', 'pos'), ("I made fun of French food until I ate here.  It's that good.  And great wine....", 'pos'), ("Fun, laidback no-frills bar.  A couple of us stumbled on The Field after visiting nearby Four Burgers for our monthly dining club.  Beers were cheap and there was quite a variety on tap.\n\nThe best part is there is separate room with a pool table ($1 of quarters is all you need), darts, and flat screen TV.  The bartender was nice and the guy checking IDs entertained my question about the bar's address (we had a friend coming to meet up with us, but I had no idea what street we were even on).  Apparently neither did the bouncer so he stuck his head outside and checked for me!\n\nThe only thing I didn't enjoy was the ladies' room which was not in good shape if you know what I mean.  Oh, and tip for the gals -- the light switch is on the outside of the bathroom to the right of the door.  (It took me forever to find it so I thought I would save you the pain.)\n\nI'll definitely be back here to try their grub!", 'pos'), ('Nachos for days.', 'pos'), ("I am a Mexican food connoisseur - and this is, by far, the best Mexican place in Chapel Hill. Everything they have comes out fast, fresh, and is delicious.\n\nThe service is wonderful, they have free WI-FI (so you can get work done over lunch), and more and more! \n\nSeriously, I love Cinco De Mayo. I would recommend it to anyone.\n\nGet the Arroz con Pollo - it's my favorite. :)", 'pos'), ('Just had lunch to-go from here today, the chic pesto was good but oily and the fries very soggy. The pizza was good.', 'pos'), ("Went here on a thursday night to watch some football and tennis. Got the special tri tip sandwich with fries and a beer for $9. It was pretty good, but no Firestone. But what is?!\n\nI was with 2 other people and they got a pulled pork sandwich and a portabella mushroom sandwich. The girl that got the pulled pork did not enjoy her sandwich at all. \n\nI think the menu is pretty decent. I'd come back again to try other things.", 'pos'), ("I came in here with my sister and ordered the ahi tuna cheese melt. It was just ok. It was cooked with too much oil and the ahi tuna was overcooked. The reason for 3 stars is because my sister ordered the chicken mushroom sandwich which was the best thing ever! And the sweet potato fries were delicious!\n\nI'm definitely coming back for that chicken mushroom sandwich, and the beer which they have a great selection of!", 'pos'), ('Our favorite yogurt place so far! Not only do we love hanging out at downtown claremont, but nothing beats yogurtland!', 'pos'), ("I've been going to Beautique Salon in Rice Village since Hurricane Ike hit Houston.  To be honest, I was without power and warm water for 12 days, and I was so desperate for clean hair, so I went in for a haircut.  Immediately, I was pleasantly surprised by the salon.  It's huge, so they were able to get me an appointment at the last minute.  Up until this point, I would never have gotten a haircut without getting lots of reviews on the person first.  However, I was desperate, so it's just luck that I ended up with someone so amazing!\n\nMy husband and I loyally go to SHARA for haircuts.  She's amazing!!!  I also get the keratin hair treatment every few months.  I switched to Shara at Beautique, and I haven't looked back to my old salon, an adorable little place in Montrose.  Shara is great at styling, and I've even tried adding color.  Basically, she's awesome!\n\nI used to go to RAZA for bikini waxes.  She made what could be an awkward and uncomfortable situation quick and painless.  I loved her!  The only reason I don't still go to her is because I found a place that is a little less expensive.  I still haven't found anyone who has nearly as much talent at Raza though!\n\nI go to MARCIA for facials and she is so amazing!  I'm trying to balance my dermatologist's medicines with her treatment.  My dermatologist dries out my skin, and yes, I know that's his point.  But I don't want to walk around with skin like sand paper.  Marcia solved my problem skin and now I'm all clear!  I go to her every month and I love her!\n\nBeautique is huge, which can be good and bad.  On the bright side, you can usually get an appointment.  I also love that you can get so many services all at one location.  On the down side, because it's huge, you don't have that charming spa-like atmosphere.  If I was going to a relaxing spa day, I probably wouldn't go to Beautique.  But I would definitely go to Beautique for my regular appointments.", 'pos'), ("Hands down the best grocery store in the area. Wegmans has everything you want and many things you didn't know you wanted! I find prices in the grocery store and liquor store here to be below average. When you get to the prepared foods, you are going to start paying more, but the quality is worth it.", 'pos'), ('Yummy. Love this place. Good burgers. A little overhyped.', 'pos'), ("A great meal for the price.  I had the chicken teriyaki (leg meat) and the shrimp sticks.  Really enjoyed the sticks.  I've had better teriyaki, but still good.  I enjoyed the open air seating area.", 'pos'), ("I've come here many times, and I can't comment on the service because I am friends with some of the (former) employees and therefore my service is usually excellent.  The food is fantastic, especially the burgers.  It is a bit pricey, but lets face it, its on Thayer St and price comes with that territory.", 'pos'), ("Im in the quandry of finding a suit. Now I like the idea of getting dressed up, but I value comfort over aesthetics. I've quickly come to realize that it costs a lot of scratch to look good and be comfortable. Wanna know how Michael Weston and 007 make their way around, look stylish, and still feel great afterwards? Armani, Brioni and Zegna. The two Marks at N.M. showed me around what laying down a car downpayment (and possibly straight up the cost of an auto) could get you. I must say the Italians know what they're doing. But since I don't have an MI6 expense account, these will never be my every day wear. However consider me educated by the fine folks of N.M. on an eye opening tour of the finer things in clothing.", 'pos'), ("Woo! 5 stars! Is that possible?\n\nYeah, I think when I rate a place I consider all things: experience, location, prices, and ambiance. I am never disappointed with my time here. If you want to relax and people watch, you may. If you want to go crazy and get fuzzy, you may. If you want to jump around shouting about soccer/futbol, you may. If you've lived in Ann Arbor long enough, you'd know there aren't many places for a good beer and warm atmosphere. I would like to think Conor's is one of them. \n\nI like the crowd here. I like how friendly the service is. I like the accents. I discovered Jameson and ginger here. The vegetable burger is great. They hold events here quite often and if you catch them it can be quite fun. No busted wallets here, but of course it depends on what you get. Fun, fun, fun!", 'pos'), ("OH NO HE DIDN'T.\n\nTHE GUY MAKING THE SAUSAGE WAS TOUCHING THE BUNS ON THE GRILL, AND THEN HANDLED THE MONEY!!!!! THIS IS WHY RESTAURANTS IN THE BAY AREA NEED A RATING SYSTEM LIKE LA COUNTY. \n\n...enough of this rant. Anyways, it's a sausage/hot dog for $3 bucks. \n\n...do people like this place because of the food, or because of the fact that it's cheap? I'm a bit torn. Yeah, it tastes good, but not out-of-this-world delicious. I've definitely had better sausages (I ordered the Chicken Apple and the spicy sausage). Cheap-tastic.", 'pos'), ('Disco fires are heaven, burgers are Great, nice amount of meat, not too much. Onion strings are really really good. They have a diverse secretion of draft. And the PRICES are not high (like some in the area) I will be back with friends.   OH AND GOOD MUSIC & nice staff !', 'pos'), ('Twas a good dining experience with some good company.\n\nCame here during the last ten minutes of happy hour and pretty much ordered all that I could.\n\nThe pork belly was pretty good. They weren\'t all cooked to the same level. half of them were deliciously crispy but the other half were limp and droopy, not the most ideal situation, if you know what i mean. The rice cakes were my favorite. Plenty of sauce and perfectly gummy. The veggie one is the spicy one while the beef is not. I would have liked a beefy spicy but she said that they couldn\'t do that. We also ordered one of every bun. and they were pretty yum! The spicy chicken was my favorite, pork a close second, beef I could skip. We finished off our meal with a sizzling bimbimbap and it wasn\'t much different from all the others. Good though. \n\nThe place was pretty affordable and there\'s 2 hours free parking after 6pm with validation. They say they\'re "healthy" Korean food but I don\'t really know how. This place was good and I enjoyed myself but I definitely like the real stuff in all it\'s unhealthy glory from ktown...', 'pos'), ('have been waiting for this place to open for quite awhile and was pleasantly surprised.  they have an awesome drink and creative food menu.  we ordered the 10 course tasting menu for $45 and felt it was well worth the money.   at the 5th course i was already full!! and took the rest home.    our waitress was very nice and helpful.  Great addition to central square!!', 'pos'), ("The food is great, especially the sauces (white wine mussels!). Also, the avocado bacon, cucumber appy is amazing. As are the cocktails - they're small but so tasty! The waiting staff seems to be a good team.\n\nThe only complaints are the noise (it's always loud) and the burger-type food is not great.", 'pos'), ("The place is perfect to see any band for a concert! You can't beat the price.. $20 bucks to see two bands! Pfft..come on now!  Then to even meet the band after the show.  \n\nI think the band is getting ripped off!\n\nIf this place could clean up the bathrooms..I'd give it five stars!  I've been going here forever and it hasn't changed in about that long!  But, hey if it works..why fix it, right?", 'pos'), ("Fries are good. I can't speak about the burgers though. I wish they had cheese to dip those delicious potato sticks into, but they're great even when they're plain.", 'pos'), ("So F-ING good.  I love that you can pick whether you want pizza or rice, and that you can get everything either vegetarian or vegan. The black bean pizza (vegan) is soo soo soo good, but the portabella redhead is equally delicious. AND they have vegan breakfast pizza.  the only downside is their weird affiliation with Club Passim, and the fact that sometimes they have tons of space, and other times you're crowded into 5 tables if there is a show. i wish they were on foodler for takeout too!", 'pos'), ("Granted I don't know any other tattoo places in the nearby area, this place is the best by default.  The place is huge and downstairs is the piercing area.  My friend and I made our way up the stairs to the tattoo parlor/section. We perused the magazines and various pictures of tattoos, but had already decided what we were getting.\n\nI wanted two stars on my wrists originally smaller than the size of a dime, but the tattoo artist said the smallest they go is about dollar coin size.  I got on both wrists, and ended up paying the base price of $80.\n\nThe place is very clean-looking and sterile.  Whenever I see tattoo parlors in movies, it's always in the dingiest/sketchiest places.  Luckily, Stiehl's was nothing like that.  Everything is wrapped in sterile packaging until needed. The tentative drawing of my tattoo was placed on my arm to use as a guideline for the artist. He shaved the area (standard practice, even though I don't have a hairy wrist or anything) and got going.  It was less painful than I was expecting, except when it got sort of closer to my hands, upper wrist.  Other than that, the experience was pretty pleasant. My tattoo had some crackly, un-inked parts along the border of the star after the initial two weeks or so of basic tattoo care, so my friend and I went back to get our tattoos touched up.  They offer up to 3 free visits of re-touching, which is really nice.\n\nI would definitely recommend this place if you live in Ithaca.  Very friendly and helpful staff, and most important of all, sterile technique is practiced  here.", 'pos'), ('Very good Thai food and close to campus (good for the college student).\n\nMy favorites include:\n\nPad Thai\nChicken Pad Prik King\nPineapple Curry', 'pos'), ('Great Food, Great Service, Not so great prices.', 'pos'), ("I've eaten at Black Dog a few times now and have tried a number of things off their menu.  Among the choices, one of my favorites is the pulled pork sandwich with their signature sauce.  The pork has plenty of smoky flavor but it is not overwhelming while the sauce has a slight tang and complements the meat well.  I recently tried the pulled chicken sandwich and found it was just as good if not better than the pork.  Outside of main entrees, the sweet potato fries are fantastic as is the corn bread.  One thing to note about the sandwiches is that they all come with cole slaw on top unless you specifically ask otherwise.\n\nAs others have noted, there is not a lot of seating in the restaurant and if you happen to visit during a busy time you may end up waiting for a while.  Also, given the tight quarters, there isn't much standing room while waiting so things can get cramped rather quickly.  If you want to try Black Dog's food without waiting for a seat, they do offer carry out which is extremely quick.", 'pos'), ("amazing bbq- maybe it's bc i've never had it done right - texas style, that is.\n\nthe ribs were lean, but not so lean that it's dry. the brisket was good too, but  a distant second to the ribs. \nand, the cole slaw and potato salad (you get two sides with a 2 combo plate) are a PERFECT accompaniment to the meat. \n\ngrab a beer (they'll give you a frozen mug to pour it in), add a pecan pie (legendary i tell ya), and bring it to the checkered tables outside and you're set. \nGod I'm gonna miss this place..\n\ngoode company also does seafood, american, and mexican in other locations...", 'pos'), ('Tanino is a restaurant which really understands its customer base, in  addition to preparing food. This is, yet, another relative of Celestino Drago, Giacamino and heaven knows how many other Drago brothers. Those guys really understand what folks want to eat and what they want to spend. Good for them! \nThe restaurant is just gorgeous!! What a pleasure to walk in to this exquisite setting. The service is always fine. One can always count on ingredients being fresh and top quality. Perhaps, Mama or Papa Drago taught the sons the art of fine pasta making. The lessons were followed well. Pasta, especially the ravioli is always beautiful. Not an ounce of pretension.', 'pos'), ("Pros:  Had a great steak-frite with amazing fries.  As good as what you'd find in Paris.\n\nAmbiance is nice.  Very open, albeit small, restaurant with a good liquor and wine selection.  \n\nCons:  No website!  It wasn't too crowded but I have to imagine if it was it could be difficult to get a table.", 'pos'), ('For lunch, this is top of the line. Prices are wonderful and the quality is good and consistent. Service is very good too. Especially since at lunch you want to be in-out in less than 1 hour.  \n\nFor dinner the prices are a bit higher though.', 'pos'), ('This restaurant is okay. They serve foods commonly eaten around parts of West Africa...fufu with soups, jollof rice (which was fried rice), rice and stew, plantains, etc. Generous portions are usually served. The restaurant caters to a diverse crowd and the service was good. Prices for meals start at about $8 and up.\nLooking to return.', 'pos'), ("Great for a late breakfast (served 'til 11). 3 eggs, bacon or sausage, toast, potatoes, and coffee for $5 is a great deal and tastes great.\n\nThe diversity of the menu - calzones, sandwiches, and pasta dishes - should keep me coming back for lunch. And they just expanded their hours to include dinner til 10.", 'pos'), ("I've been here a few times, the most recent time with a large group. We ordered a ton of appetizers and they were all really good. Also a plus is that there were a lot of vegetarian options for both meals and appetizers. I ordered the ethiopian dish and it was also really good. I also had a goat cheese cheesecake which was a little questionable, but I think that was just a limited time special. Drinks wise, order a long island iced tea. They are amazing here. It is also a nice place to go since they have live music.", 'pos'), ("I love this place, not as much as the tart fro yo from yogurt harmony but its an amazing sweet treat (especially the pumpkin!!). My only complaint is the inconsistency in the amount of toppings you get. A few weeks ago I went and had sprinkles in every bite, yum!.... I went again last night and was saddened by the total of 8 sprinkles the gal put on top. The do put toppings inside which deserves recognition. Overall, I'm a fan.", 'pos'), ('This is a pretty nice place in Westwood, right by Brewco.  The ambience is nice, the decor and feel of the place is wonderful.  The price of the food and drinks definitely reflect the environment; however, the drinks are well balanced and for those who aren\'t used to drinking -- might feel quite heavy.\n\nAs for the prices, I think that many college students that come to this place usually come during happy hour to enjoy the environment and pay a decent price.  Outside of happy hour, I can see this place being a good "first-date" place.  I would recommend anybody in the area to come in and check this place out.', 'pos'), ("Review of:  Construction Management Certification.\n\nI completed the program at the end of 2010. I had wanted to update my skills, network, and learn more about parts of the industry I am not experienced in. I'd meant to do it for years, but never found time to enroll. I finally enrolled and started classes at the end of 2009 and worked straight through - which I definitely recommend if your schedule and funds permit.\n\nAt its best, the program is educational (though rarely challenging) and facilitates unmatched networking opportunities with students, instructors, and guest lecturers. Different courses touch on many aspects of the industry and the experience is as diverse as the students and instructors in the program. That said, the majority of students, instructors, and classes are based in the Public Works market. If you have a lot of Public Works experience, the program will feel very basic at times. If you're not experienced in Public Work, you're going to learn a lot.\n\nI have to give my highest regards to one instructor, Sean Leonard. He and a handful of others, including Albert Giocamazzi [sp], are tremendously gifted, passionate about their industry, and gracious enough to share their experience and time with students.\n\n At its worst, the program has classes geared towards people with no practical experience in the industry or led by professors who don't have time to fully prepare - in such cases I found myself fighting to stay awake or even show up. The courses are not challenging (except for the law class) unless you want them to be. My best experience in terms of learning new skills came with the online courses taught by Ataa Aly. I studied Revit and MS Project with him. Those classes were great; straight-forward skill building with excellent exercises.\n\nI feel like the program itself is set so students can get what they want out of it. Many people show up every class and actively contribute to the experience, just as many, however, are there because they have to be and act like high school delinquents when they bother showing up at all. Your experience and the value of the program really comes from your fellow students. There were too many classes where the same 2-3 people would participate and the remainder would sit silent. Those classes were the hardest to sit through.\n\nAll in all, I would certainly recommend the program. Still, classes are expensive, starting around $525 for a basic course and going to $750 for courses with computer labs. I think UCLA X should really take a look at their fee schedule. Having completed the course, I feel like the courses were worth maybe $350 - $400 each, nothing near the prices they charge. So if you're not able to blow through the program in one year, definitely take your time. Nothing you learn is going to catapult you to the next level professionally.", 'pos')]